Border control
From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
Jump to navigationJump to search
"Border crossing" redirects here. For other uses, see Border Crossing.

As seen from the Bhutanese side

As seen from the Indian side
The border gate between Phuentsholing, Bhutan and Jaigaon, India

The gate that borders East Nusa Tenggara in Indonesia and East Timor

A train crossing the China–Russia border, travelling from Zabaykalsk in Russia to Manzhouli in China
Different categories of borders have varying features and levels of security
Border control refers to measures taken by a state or a bloc of states to monitor[1] and regulate the movement of people, animals, and goods across its borders, including land borders as well as airports and sea ports. In some cases, it can also refer to such controls imposed on internal borders within a single state. Border controls in the 21st century are tightly intertwined with intricate systems of travel documents, visas, and increasingly complex policies that vary between countries. While some borders (including most states' internal borders and international borders within the Schengen Area) are open and completely unguarded, others (including the vast majority of borders between countries as well as some internal borders) are subject to some degree of control and may be crossed legally only at designated checkpoints.


Contents
1	History
2	Internal border controls
2.1	Asia
2.2	Europe
2.3	North America
2.3.1	Contemporary
2.3.2	Historical
2.4	Realm of New Zealand
2.5	Apartheid-era South Africa
3	Aspects
3.1	Biosecurity
3.2	Customs
3.2.1	Customs area
3.2.2	Sanitary and phytosanitary measures
3.2.3	Duty-free shops
3.3	Air and maritime borders
3.4	Border security
3.4.1	Border checkpoints
3.4.1.1	Port of entry
3.4.1.2	Quilantan entry
3.4.2	Border zones
3.5	Drugs
3.6	Immigration law and policy
3.6.1	Diaspora communities
3.6.2	Special immigration areas
3.6.3	Local border traffic
3.6.4	Immigrant investor programmes
3.6.5	Open borders
3.7	International zones
3.7.1	Airport transit areas
3.7.2	Other examples
4	Travel documents
4.1	International Certificate of Vaccination
4.2	Diplomatic and Official Passports
4.3	Laissez-passer
4.4	Identity cards
4.5	Travel documents for permanent residents
4.6	Seafarers' identity documents
4.7	Indigenous nations
4.7.1	Indigenous passports
4.7.2	Certificate of Indigenous Status
4.7.3	Enhanced Tribal Identity Cards
4.7.4	Kikapoo I-872 Native American Card
4.7.5	American Samoans
4.8	Special travel documents
4.8.1	Certificate of identity
4.8.2	Chinese Travel Document
4.8.3	Israeli Travel Document in lieu of a National Passport
4.8.4	Passports without right of abode
4.8.5	Serbian Coordination Directorate Passports in Kosovo
4.9	Visas
5	Specific requirements
5.1	Biometrics
5.2	Immigration stamps
5.3	Exit controls
5.3.1	No exit control
5.3.2	Formal exit control without passport stamping
5.3.3	Exit permits
5.4	Nationality and travel history
5.5	Prescreening
5.5.1	Informal prescreening
6	Expedited border controls
6.1	British Isles
6.2	Asia and Oceania
6.3	North America
6.4	APEC Business Travel Card (ABTC)
7	Border control organisations by country
8	Controversies
8.1	America
8.1.1	Policies targeting Muslims
8.1.2	Separation of families seeking asylum
8.2	Bhutan
8.3	Israel
8.4	Australia
8.4.1	Offshore detention centres
8.4.2	Travel restrictions on Australian citizens during the COVID-19 pandemic
8.5	China
8.6	Cyprus and the European Union
8.7	Involvement of private companies
9	Gallery
10	See also
11	Notes
12	References
13	Further reading
14	External links
History

The purpose of the Great Wall of China was to stop the "barbarians" from crossing the northern border of China.
States and rulers have always regarded the ability to determine who enters or remains in their territories as a key test of their sovereignty, but prior to World War I, border controls were only sporadically implemented.[2] In medieval Europe, for example, the boundaries between rival countries and centres of power were largely symbolic or consisted of amorphous borderlands, 'marches', and 'debatable lands' of indeterminate or contested status and the real 'borders' consisted of the fortified walls that surrounded towns and cities, where the authorities could exclude undesirable or incompatible people at the gates, from vagrants, beggars and the 'wandering poor', to 'masterless women', lepers, Romani, or Jews.[3]


Arabic papyrus with an exit permit, dated 24 January 722 AD, pointing to the regulation of travel activities. From Hermopolis Magna, Egypt

Chinese passport from the Qing Dynasty, 24th Year of the Guangxu Reign, 1898
The concept of border controls has its origins in antiquity. In Asia, the existence of border controls is evidenced in classical texts. The Arthashastra (c.  3rd century BCE) make mentions of passes issued at the rate of one masha per pass to enter and exit the country. Chapter 34 of the Second Book of Arthashastra concerns with the duties of the Mudrādhyakṣa (lit. 'Superintendent of Seals') who must issue sealed passes before a person could enter or leave the countryside.[4] Passports resembling those issued today were an important part of the Chinese bureaucracy as early as the Western Han (202 BCE-220 CE), if not in the Qin Dynasty. They required such details as age, height, and bodily features.[5] These passports (zhuan) determined a person's ability to move throughout imperial counties and through points of control. Even children needed passports, but those of one year or less who were in their mother's care may not have needed them.[5]

In the medieval Islamic Caliphate, a form of passport was the bara'a, a receipt for taxes paid. Border controls were in place to ensure that only people who paid their zakah (for Muslims) or jizya (for dhimmis) taxes could travel freely between different regions of the Caliphate; thus, the bara'a receipt was a "basic passport".[6]

In medieval Europe, passports were issued since at least the reign of Henry V of England, as a means of helping his subjects prove who they were in foreign lands. The earliest reference to these documents is found in a 1414 Act of Parliament.[7][8] In 1540, granting travel documents in England became a role of the Privy Council of England, and it was around this time that the term "passport" was used. In 1794, issuing British passports became the job of the Office of the Secretary of State.[7] The 1548 Imperial Diet of Augsburg required the public to hold imperial documents for travel, at the risk of permanent exile.[9] During World War I, European governments introduced border passport requirements for security reasons, and to control the emigration of people with useful skills. These controls remained in place after the war, becoming a standard, though controversial, procedure. British tourists of the 1920s complained, especially about attached photographs and physical descriptions, which they considered led to a "nasty dehumanisation".[10]

Starting in the mid-19th century, the Ottoman Empire established quarantine stations on many of its borders to control disease. For example, along the Greek-Turkish border, all travellers entering and exiting the Ottoman Empire would be quarantined for 9–15 days. These stations would often be manned by armed guards. If plague appeared, the Ottoman army would be deployed to enforce border control and monitor disease.[11]

One of the earliest systematic attempts of modern nation states to implement border controls to restrict entry of particular groups were policies adopted by Canada, Australia, and America to curtail immigration of Asians in white settler states in the late 19th and early 20th centuries. The first anti-East Asian policy implemented in this era was the Chinese Exclusion Act of 1882 in America, which was followed suit by the Chinese Immigration Act of 1885 in Canada, which imposed what came to be called the Chinese head tax. These policies was a sign of injustice and unfair treatment to the Chinese workers because the jobs they engaged in were mostly menial jobs.[12] Similar policies were adopted in various British colonies in Australia over the latter half of the 19th century targeting Asian immigrants arriving as a result of the region's series of gold rushes[13] as well as Kanakas (Pacific Islanders brought into Australia as indentured labourers)[14] who alongside the Asians were perceived by trade unionists and White blue collar workers as a threat to the wages of White settlers.[15] Following the establishment of the Commonwealth of Australia in 1901, these discriminatory border control measures quickly expanded into the White Australia Policy, while subsequent legislation in America (e.g. the Immigration Act of 1891, the Naturalisation Act of 1906, and the Immigration Act of 1917) resulted in an even stricter policy targeting immigrants from both Asia and parts of southern and eastern Europe.


BN(O) passports sported a burgundy red cover, identical to that of the British Citizen passports, albeit without the words "European Union" text at the top part of the cover between 1990 and March 2020.
Even following the adoption of measures such as the White Australia Policy and the Chinese Exclusion Act in English-speaking settler colonies, pervasive control of international borders remained a relatively rare phenomenon until the early 20th century, prior to which many states had open international borders either in practice or due to a lack of any legal restriction. John Maynard Keynes identified World War I in particular as the point when such controls became commonplace.[16]

Decolonisation during the twentieth century saw the emergence of mass emigration from nations in the Global South, thus leading former colonial occupiers to introduce stricter border controls.[17] In the United Kingdom this process took place in stages, with British nationality law eventually shifting from recognising all Commonwealth citizens as British subjects to today's complex British nationality law which distinguishes between British citizens, modern British Subjects, British Overseas Citizens, and overseas nationals, with each non-standard category created as a result of attempts to balance border control and the need to mitigate statelessness. This aspect of the rise of border control in the 20th century has proven controversial. The British Nationality Law 1981 has been criticised by experts,[a] as well as by the Committee on the Elimination of Racial Discrimination of the United Nations,[b] on the grounds that the different classes of British nationality it created are, in fact, closely related to the ethnic origins of their holders.

The creation of British Nationality (Overseas) status, for instance, (with fewer privileges than British citizen status) was met with criticism from many Hong Kong residents who felt that British citizenship would have been more appropriate in light of the "moral debt" owed to them by the UK.[c][d] Some British politicians[e] and magazines[f] also criticised the creation of BN(O) status. In 2020, the British government under Boris Johnson announced a programme under which BN(O)s would have leave to remain in the UK with rights to work and study for five years, after which they may apply for settled status. They would then be eligible for full citizenship after holding settled status for 12 months.[23] This was implemented as the eponymously named "British National (Overseas) visa", a residence permit that BN(O)s and their dependent family members have been able to apply for since 31 January 2021.[24][25] BN(O)s and their dependents who arrived in the UK before the new immigration route became available were granted "Leave Outside the Rules" at the discretion of the Border Force to remain in the country for up to six months as a temporary measure.[26] In effect, this retroactively granted BN(O)s a path to right of abode in the United Kingdom. Despite the COVID-19 pandemic, about 7,000 people had entered the UK under this scheme between July 2020 and January 2021.[27]

Ethnic tensions created during colonial occupation also resulted in discriminatory policies being adopted in newly independent African nations, such as Uganda under Idi Amin which banned Asians from Uganda, thus creating a mass exodus of the (largely Gujarati[28][29]) Asian community of Uganda. Such ethnically driven border control policies took forms ranging from anti-Asian sentiment in East Africa to Apartheid policies in South Africa and Namibia (then known as Southwest Africa under South African rule) which created bantustans[g] and pass laws[h] to segregate and impose border controls against non-whites, and encouraged immigration of whites at the expense of Blacks as well as Indians and other Asians. Whilst border control in Europe and east of the Pacific have tightened over time,[17] they have largely been liberalised in Africa, from Yoweri Museveni's reversal of Idi Amin's anti-Asian border controls[i] to the fall of Apartheid (and thus racialised border controls) in South Africa.

The development of border control policies over the course of the 20th century also saw the standardisation of refugee travel documents under the Convention Relating to the Status of Refugees of 1951[j] and the 1954 Convention travel document[36] for stateless people under the similar 1954 statelessness convention.

The COVID-19 pandemic in 2020 produced a drastic tightening of border controls across the globe. Many countries and regions have imposed quarantines, entry bans, or other restrictions for citizens of or recent travellers to the most affected areas.[37] Other countries and regions have imposed global restrictions that apply to all foreign countries and territories, or prevent their own citizens from travelling overseas.[38] The imposition of border controls has curtailed the spread of the virus, but because they were first implemented after community spread was established in multiple countries in different regions of the world, they produced only a modest reduction in the total number of people infected[39] These strict border controls economic harm to the tourism industry through lost income and social harm to people who were unable to travel for family matters or other reasons. When the travel bans are lifted, many people are expected to resume traveling. However, some travel, especially business travel, may be decreased long-term as lower cost alternatives, such as teleconferencing and virtual events, are preferred.[40] A possible long-term impact has been a decline of business travel and international conferencing, and the rise of their virtual, online equivalents.[41] Concerns have been raised over the effectiveness of travel restrictions to contain the spread of COVID-19.[42]

Internal border controls
Internal border controls are measures implemented to control the flow of people or goods within a given country. Such measures take a variety of forms ranging from the imposition of border checkpoints to the issuance of internal travel documents and vary depending on the circumstances in which they are implemented. Circumstances resulting in internal border controls include increasing security around border areas (e.g. internal checkpoints in America or Bhutan near border regions), preserving the autonomy of autonomous or minority areas (e.g. border controls between Peninsular Malaysia, Sabah, and Sarawak; border controls between Hong Kong, Macau, and mainland China), preventing unrest between ethnic groups (e.g. Northern Ireland's peace walls, border controls in Tibet and Northeastern India), and disputes between rival governments (e.g. between the Republic of China and the People's Republic of China).

During the COVID-19 pandemic, temporary internal border controls were introduced in jurisdictions across the globe. For instance, travel between Australian states and territories was prohibited or restricted by state governments at various points of the pandemic either in conjunction with sporadic lockdowns or as a stand-alone response to COVID-19 outbreaks in neighbouring states.[43][44][45] Internal border controls were also introduced at various stages of Malaysia's Movement Control Order, per which interstate travel was restricted depending on the severity of ongoing outbreaks. Similarly, internal controls were introduced by national authorities within the Schengen Area, though the European Union ultimately rejected the idea of suspending the Schengen Agreement per se.[46][47]

Asia
Internal border controls exist in many parts of Asia. For example, travellers visiting minority regions in India and China often require special permits to enter.[k] Internal air and rail travel within non-autonomous portions of India and mainland China also generally require travel documents to be checked by government officials as a form of interior border checkpoint. For such travel within India, Indian citizens may utilise their Voter ID, National Identity Card, passport, or other proof of Indian citizenship whilst Nepali nationals may present any similar proof of Napali citizenship. Meanwhile, for such travel within mainland China, Chinese nationals from the mainland are required to use their national identity cards.

Within China, extensive border controls are maintained for those travelling between the mainland, special administrative regions of Hong Kong and Macau, and areas controlled by the Republic of China.[l] Foreign nationals need to present their passports or other required types of travel documents when travelling between these areas. For Chinese nationals (including those with British National (Overseas) status), there are special documents[m] for travel between these territories. Similar arrangements exist for travel between territories controlled by the Republic of China and territories controlled by the People's Republic of China. [n] Internal border controls in China have also resulted in the creation of special permits allowing Chinese citizens to immigrate to or reside in other immigration areas within the country.[o]

China also maintains distinct, relaxed border control policies in the Special Economic Zones of Shenzhen, Zhuhai and Xiamen.[50][51] Nationals of most countries[p] can obtain a limited area visa upon arrival in these regions, which permit them to stay within these cities without proceeding further into other parts of Mainland China. Visas for Shenzhen are valid for 5 days, and visas for Xiamen and Zhuhai are valid for 3 days. The duration of stay starts from the next day of arrival.[53] The visa can only be obtained only upon arrival at Luohu Port, Huanggang Port Control Point, Fuyong Ferry Terminal or Shekou Passenger Terminal for Shenzhen;[54] Gongbei Port of Entry, Hengqin Port or Jiuzhou Port for Zhuhai;[55] and Xiamen Gaoqi International Airport for Xiamen.[56]

Similarly, China permits nationals of non—visa-exempt ASEAN countries[q] to visit Guilin without a visa for a maximum of 6 days if they travel with an approved tour group and enter China from Guilin Liangjiang International Airport. They may not visit other cities within Guangxi or other parts of Mainland China.[57]

Meanwhile, in Bhutan, a microstate accessible by road only through India, there are interior border checkposts (primarily on the Lateral Road) and, additionally, certain areas require special permits to enter, whilst visitors not proceeding beyond the border city of Phuentsholing do not need permits to enter for the day (although such visitors are de facto subject to Indian visa policy since they must proceed through Jaigaon). Individuals who are not citizens of India, Bangladesh, or the Maldives are not allowed to proceed past Phuentsholing by land and are instead required to arrive by air at the country's sole international airport in Paro, which has flights from India and other countries in the Greater India region such as Thailand, Singapore, and Nepal.

More generally, authorities in mainland China maintain a system of residency registration known as hukou (Chinese: 户口; lit. 'household individual'), by which government permission is needed to formally change one's place of residence. It is enforced with identity cards. This system of internal border control measures effectively limited internal migration before the 1980s but subsequent market reforms caused it to collapse as a means of migration control. An estimated 150 to 200 million people are part of the "blind flow" and have unofficially migrated, generally from poor, rural areas to wealthy, urban ones. However, unofficial residents are often denied official services such as education and medical care and are sometimes subject to both social and political discrimination. In essence, the denial of social services outside an individual's registered area of residence functions as an internal border control measure geared toward dissuading migration within the mainland.

The Hộ khẩu system in Vietnam is similar to the Hukou system in mainland China. Local authorities issue each household a "household registration book" or sổ hộ khẩu, in which the basic biographical information of each household member is recorded. The sổ hộ khẩu is the ultimate legal proof of residence in Vietnam. Together with the "citizen identification card" or giấy chứng minh nhân dân/căn cước công dân, the sổ hộ khẩu constitutes the most important legal identification document in Vietnam. Modeled after the Chinese hukou system and originally used in urban areas only, hộ khẩu functioned as a way to manage urban growth and limit how many people moved, as well as who moved in and out of the cities.[58] Gradually, the system became a universal method of control as its application expanded to the countryside.[59] Presently, the system defines four types of residence, KT1 through KT4. KT1 is the primary and permanent type of residence, and denotes a person's primary residential address. If this person moves on a semi-permanent basis to another place within the same province or national municipality (within Saigon, for example), then he or she needs to register for a KT2 residential status at that new address. If this same move happens across provincial borders, then the person has to sign up for a KT3 registration. For migrant workers and students temporarily residing outside of their province or national municipality of permanent residence, they need to apply for a KT4 registration.[58] Navigating this matrix of regulations is tough. But the public security apparatus that manages the hộ khẩu system is also difficult to deal with, especially if one is a poor migrant worker with little to no formal education. Yet hộ khẩu remains absolutely crucial, especially for the poor. It is tied to access to welfare benefits, and, in the case of children, the right to attend public school.[60] For a migrant family in Saigon with no KT3 or KT4 registration, subsidised medical care, poverty assistance, and almost-free schooling are all out of reach.[59] Much like its counterpart in mainland China, the denial of services outside an individual's place of registered residence resulting from this system of internal border control serves to dissuade internal migration.

Another example is the Malaysian states of Sabah and Sarawak, which have maintained their own border controls[61] since joining Malaysia in 1963. The internal border control is asymmetrical; while Sabah and Sarawak impose immigration control on Malaysian citizens from other states, there is no corresponding border control in Peninsular Malaysia, and Malaysians from Sabah and Sarawak have unrestricted right to live and work in the Peninsular. For social and business visits less than three months, Malaysian citizens may travel between the Peninsular, Sabah and Sarawak using the Malaysian identity card (MyKad) or Malaysian passport, while for longer stays in Sabah and Sarawak they are required to have an Internal Travel Document or a passport with the appropriate residential permit.

The most restrictive internal border controls are in North Korea. Citizens are not allowed to travel outside their areas of residence without explicit authorisation, and access to the capital city of Pyongyang is heavily restricted.[62][63] Similar restrictions are imposed on tourists, who are only allowed to leave Pyongyang on government-authorised tours to approved tourist sites.


Domestic Immigration stamp permitting entry into the Andaman and Nicobar Islands in India.

 

Sample of a One Way Travel Permit for internal emigration from mainland China to Hong Kong or Macau.

 

Sample of a Special Economic Zone visa issued on arrival in China

 

Data page of a booklet type internal travel document issued by Taiwan authorities to a Mainland Chinese resident.

 

Malaysian entry stamps specify which jurisdictions (i.e. West or Peninsular Malaysia, Sabah, and Sarawak) the bearer is permitted to enter, and there are immigration checks when entering each.

 

The entrance to the building of the Shenzhen Bay Control Point, an internal border checkpoint between Hong Kong and the Chinese mainland

 

The Tibet Travel Permit, required to enter the Tibet Autonomous Region, is an example of internal border controls in minority regions of China and India. Other similar documents include Restricted Area Permits and Protected Area permits primarily issued to enter India's northeast.

 

Front and back of mainland residence permits for Chinese citizens from Hong Kong and Macau (left) and Chinese citizens from areas administered by the Republic of China (right)

 

internal travel document issued to Chinese citizens from the mainland for travel to and from Hong Kong and Macau

 

Exit endorsements affixed to the back of an internal travel document issued to Chinese citizens from the mainland for travel to and from Hong Kong or Macau

 

An internal travel document issued to Chinese citizens from areas administered by the Republic of China to travel to and from the mainland

 

Internal travel document for Chinese citizens of Hong Kong or Macau to enter the mainland.

 

The inside pages of hukou booklet in China.

Europe

The red lines indicate temporary internal border controls within the Schengen Area. The blue area represents members of the Schengen area, the green area represents European Union members not in the Schengen Area, and the grey area represents the rest of western Europe.
An example from Europe is the implementation of border controls on travel between Svalbard, which maintains a policy of free migration as a result of the Svalbard Treaty and the Schengen Area, which includes the rest of Norway. Other examples of effective internal border controls in Europe include the closed cities of certain CIS members, areas of Turkmenistan that require special permits to enter, restrictions on travel to the Gorno-Badakhshan Autonomous Region in Tajikistan, and (depending on whether Northern and Southern Cyprus are considered separate countries) the Cypriot border. Similarly, Iraq's Kurdistan region maintains a separate and more liberal visa and customs area from the rest of the country, even allowing visa free entry for Israelis whilst the rest of the country bans them from entering. Denmark also maintains a complex system of subnational countries which, unlike the Danish mainland, are outside the European Union and maintain autonomous customs policies.[r] In addition to the numerous closed cities of Russia,[64] parts of 19 subjects[s] of the Russian Federation are closed for foreigners without special permits and are consequently subject to internal border controls.[65]

Another complex border control situation in Europe pertains to the United Kingdom. Whilst the crown dependencies are within the Common Travel Area, neither Gibraltar nor the sovereign British military exclaves of Akrotiri and Dhekelia are. The former maintains its own border control policies, thus requiring physical border security at its border with the Schengen Area as well as the implementation of border controls for travellers proceeding directly between Gibraltar and the British mainland. The latter maintains a relatively open border with Southern Cyprus, though not with Northern Cyprus. Consequently, it is a de facto member of the Schengen Area and travel to or from the British mainland requires border controls. On 31 December 2020, Spain and the United Kingdom reached an agreement in principle under which Gibraltar would join the Schengen Area,[66] clearing the way for the European Union and the UK to start formal negotiations on the matter.[67]

In the aftermath of Brexit, border controls for goods flowing between Great Britain and Northern Ireland were introduced in accordance with the Protocol on Ireland/Northern Ireland agreed to as part of the UK's withdrawal agreement with the EU.[68] Due to the thirty-year internecine conflict in Northern Ireland, the UK-Ireland border has had a special status since that conflict was ended by the Belfast Agreement/Good Friday Agreement of 1998. As part of the Northern Ireland Peace Process, the border has been largely invisible, without any physical barrier or custom checks on its many crossing points; this arrangement was made possible by both countries' common membership of both the EU's Single Market and Customs Union and of their Common Travel Area. Upon the UK's withdrawal from the European Union, the border in Ireland became the only land border between the UK and EU. EU single market and UK internal market provisions require certain customs checks and trade controls at their external borders. The Northern Ireland Protocol is intended to protect the EU single market, while avoiding imposition of a 'hard border' that might incite a recurrence of conflict and destabilise the relative peace that has held since the end of the Troubles. Under the Protocol, Northern Ireland is formally outside the EU single market, but EU free movement of goods rules and EU Customs Union rules still apply; this ensures there are no customs checks or controls between Northern Ireland and the rest of the island. In place of an Ireland/Northern Ireland land border, the protocol has created a de facto customs border down the Irish Sea for customs purposes, separating Northern Ireland from the island of Great Britain,[69][70] to the disquiet of prominent Unionists.[71] To operate the terms of the protocol, the United Kingdom must provide border control posts at Northern Ireland's ports:[71] actual provision of these facilities is the responsibility of Northern Ireland's Department of Agriculture, Environment and Rural Affairs (DAERA).[71] Temporary buildings were put in place for 1 January 2021, but in February 2021, the responsible Northern Ireland minister, Gordon Lyons (DUP), ordered officials to stop work on new permanent facilities and to stop recruiting staff for them.[72] In its half yearly financial report 26 August 2021, Irish Continental Group, which operates ferries between Great Britain and the Republic of Ireland, expressed concern at the lack of implementation of checks on goods arriving into Northern Ireland from Great Britain, as required under the protocol. The company said that the continued absence of these checks (on goods destined for the Republic of Ireland) is causing a distortion in the level playing field, since goods that arrive directly into Republic of Ireland ports from Great Britain are checked on arrival.[73] The implementation of border controls between Great Britain and Northern Ireland was the primary catalyst for the 2021 Northern Ireland riots.

An unusual example of internal border controls pertains to customs enforcement within the Schengen area. Even though borders are generally invisible, the existence of areas within the Schengen area but outside the European Union Value Added Tax Area, as well as jurisdictions such as Andorra which are not officially a part of the Schengen area but can not be accessed without passing through it, has resulted in the existence of sporadic internal border controls for customs purposes. Additionally, as per Schengen area rules,[74] hotels and other types of commercial accommodation must register all foreign citizens, including citizens of other Schengen states, by requiring the completion of a registration form by their own hand. [t] The Schengen rules do not require any other procedures; thus, the Schengen states are free to regulate further details on the content of the registration forms, and identity documents which are to be produced, and may also require the persons exempted from registration by Schengen laws to be registered. A Schengen state is also permitted to reinstate border controls with another Schengen country for a short period where there is a serious threat to that state's "public policy or internal security" or when the "control of an external border is no longer ensured due to exceptional circumstances".[76] When such risks arise out of foreseeable events, the state in question must notify the European Commission in advance and consult with other Schengen states.[77] Since the implementation of the Schengen Agreement, this provision has been invoked frequently by member states, especially in response to the European migrant crisis.[u]

The Israeli military maintains an intricate network of internal border controls within Israeli and Palestinian territory restricting the freedom of movement of Palestinians, composed of permanent, temporary, and random manned checkpoints in the West Bank; the West Bank Barrier; and restrictions on the usage of roads by Palestinians.[80] Spread throughout the State of Israel and the areas of the State of Palestine under de facto Israeli control, internal border control measures are a key feature of Israeli and Palestinian life and are among the most restrictive in the world. Additionally, the blockade of the Gaza Strip results in a de facto domestic customs and immigration border for Palestinians. In order to clear internal border controls, Palestinians are required to obtain a variety of permits from Israeli authorities depending on the purpose and area of their travel. The legality and impact of this network of internal border controls is controversial. B'Tselem, an Israeli non-governmental organisation that monitors human rights in Palestine, argues that they breach the rights guaranteed by the International Covenant on Economic, Social and Cultural Rights—in particular, the right to a livelihood, the right to an acceptable standard of living, the right to satisfactory nutrition, clothing, and housing, and the right to attain the best standard of physical and mental health.[81] B'Tselem also argues that the restrictions on ill, wounded and pregnant Palestinians seeking acute medical care is in contravention of international law that states that medical professionals and the sick must be granted open passage.[82] While Israeli Supreme Court has deemed the measures acceptable for security reasons, Haaretz's Amira Hass argues this policy defies one of the principles of the Oslo Accords, which states that Gaza and the West Bank constitute a single geographic unit.[83]

Much like relations between Jewish settlers in Israel and the native Palestinian population, strained intercommunal relations in Northern Ireland between Irish Catholics and the descendants of Protestant settlers from England and Scotland have resulted in de facto internal checkpoints. The peace lines are an internal border security measure to separate predominantly republican and nationalist Catholic neighbourhoods from predominantly loyalist and unionist Protestant neighbourhoods. They have been in place in some form or another since the end of The Troubles in 1998, with the Good Friday Agreement. The majority of peace walls are located in Belfast, but they also exist in Derry, Portadown, and Lurgan,[84] with more than 32 kilometres of walls in Northern Ireland.[85] The peace lines range in length from a few hundred metres to over 5 kilometres. They may be made of iron, brick, steel or a combination of the three and are up to 8 metres high.[86][84] Some have gates in them (sometimes staffed by police) that allow passage during daylight but are closed at night.


Banner opposing post-Brexit border controls between Great Britain and Northern Ireland seen in Sandy Row (March 2021)

 

Graffiti in Belfast opposing an "Irish Sea border" (February 2021)

 

A 5.5m high peace line along Springmartin Road in Belfast, with a fortified police station at one end

 

The peace line along Cupar Way in Belfast, seen from the predominantly Protestant side

 

The peace line at Bombay Street/Cupar Way in Belfast, seen from the predominantly Catholic side

 

Gates in a peace line in West Belfast

 

Israeli checkpoint outside the Palestinian city of Ramallah. August 2004

 

Vehicles queuing at Kalandia checkpoint in Palestine, August 2004

 

Huwwara checkpoint, south of the Palestinian city of Nablus.[87]

 

Central entry checkpoint to the closed city of Seversk, Tomsk Oblast, Russia.

 

As a consequence of Svalbard's unique immigration status and exclusion from the rest of Norway for border control purposes, the city of Barentsburg is predominantly Russian and hosts the world's second northernmost statue of Lenin (the northernmost is in Pyramiden).

 

Border post between France and Andorra, a microstate that de facto follows Schengen immigration policies and utilises the Euro as its national currency yet is not a part of the European Union VAT and customs areas.

 

The Italy-Switzerland border is an internal Schengen border, but as seen at this border crossing at Chiasso, there are border control facilities since Switzerland maintains its own customs and tax area.

North America
Contemporary
See also: Hyder-Stewart Border Crossing, Cornwall Island (Ontario), and Akwesasne

American Samoa entry stamp

Hyder, Alaska has no border controls for travellers entering from Canada, and travellers flying between Hyder and other Alaskan cities by seaplane undergo internal border control
Multiple types of internal border controls exist in America. While the American territories of Guam and the Northern Mariana Islands follow the visa policy of the United States, together, they also maintain their own visa waiver programme for certain nationalities.[88] Since the two territories are outside the customs territory of the United States, there are customs inspections when travelling between them, and the rest of America. American Samoa has its own customs and immigration regulations, thus travelling between it and other American jurisdictions involves both customs and immigration inspections. The Virgin Islands are a special case, falling within the American immigration zone and solely following American visa policy, but being a customs free territory. As a result, there are no immigration checks between the two, but travellers arriving in Puerto Rico or the American mainland directly from the Virgin Islands are subject to border control for customs inspection. America also maintains interior checkpoints, similar to those maintained by Bhutan, along its borders with Mexico and Canada, subjecting people to border controls even after they have entered the country.

The Akwesasne nation; with territory in Ontario, Quebec, and New York; features several de facto internal border controls. As a result of protests by Akwesasne residents on their rights to cross the border unimpeded, as provided under the 1795 Jay Treaty, the Canada Border Services Agency closed its post on Cornwall Island, instead requiring travellers to proceed to the checkpoint in the city of Cornwall. As a consequence of the arrangement, residents of the island are required to clear border controls when proceeding North to the Ontarian mainland, as well as when proceeding South to Akwesasne territory in New York, thus constituting internal controls both from a Canadian perspective and from the perspective of the Akwesasne nation. Similarly, travelling between Canada and the Quebec portion of the Akwesasne nation requires driving through the state of New York, meaning that individuals will be required to clear American controls when leaving Quebec proper and to clear Canadian border controls when entering Quebec proper, though Canada does not impose border controls when entering the Quebec portion of the Akwesasne nation. Nevertheless, for residents who assert a Haudenosaunee national identity distinct from Canadian or American citizenship, the intricate network of Canadian and American border controls are seen as a foreign-imposed system of internal border controls, similar to the Israeli checkpoints in Palestinian territory.[89][90]

The city of Hyder, Alaska has also been subject to internal border controls since America chose to stop regulating arrivals in Hyder from British Columbia. Since travellers exiting Hyder into Stewart, British Columbia are subject to Canadian border controls, it is theoretically possible for someone to accidentally enter Hyder from Canada without their travel documents and then to face difficulties since both America and Canada would subject them to border controls that require travel documents. At the same time, however, the northern road connecting Hyder to uninhabited mountain regions of British Columbia is equipped with neither American nor Canadian border controls, meaning that tourists from Canada proceeding northwards from Hyder are required to complete Canadian immigration formalities when they return to Stewart despite never having cleared American immigration.

Historical
Further information: Pass system (Canadian history), Slavery in the United States, and Slavery in the colonial history of the United States
In the past, internal border control measures were utilised by authorities in North America to control the movements of Indigenous or enslaved persons. Such systems typically took the form of an internal passport required for Indigenous or enslaved individuals to travel beyond their reserve or plantation.

In 1885 the "pass system" of internal border controls targeting Indigenous peoples was instituted in Canada. Introduced at the time of the North-West Rebellion, it remained in force until 1951.[91] Any Indigenous person caught outside his Indian reserve without a pass issued by an Indian agent was returned to the reserve or incarcerated.

Throughout the Thirteen Colonies before the Revolutionary War, slaves confined to homes or agricultural plantations, or whose movements were limited by curfews, could be required to furnish written evidence their owner had granted an exemption to permit their free movement. For example, the New Hampshire Assembly in 1714 passed "An Act To Prevent Disorders In The Night":[92][93]
Whereas great disorders, insolencies and burglaries are oft times raised and committed in the night time by Indian, Negro, and Molatto Servants and Slaves to the Disquiet and hurt of her Majesty, No Indian, Negro, or Molatto is to be from Home after 9 o'clock.

Notices emphasizing the curfew were published in The New Hampshire Gazette in 1764 and 1771.[92]

Internal passports were required for African Americans in the southern slave states before the American Civil War, for example, an authenticated internal passport dated 1815 was presented to Massachusetts citizen George Barker to allow him to freely travel as a free black man to visit relatives in slave states.[94] After many of these states seceded, forming the Confederate States of America, the Confederate government introduced internal passports for whites as well.[95]

Realm of New Zealand

Niue entry stamp issued at Hanan International Airport
Main article: Visa policy of New Zealand
Further information: Realm of New Zealand
Tokelau, Niue, and the Cook Islands (Cook Islands Māori: Kūki 'Āirani)[96] maintain independent and less restrictive border controls from New Zealand. The Cook Islands further maintain a separate nationality law. Additionally, border controls for Tokelau are complicated by the fact that the territory is, for the most part, only accessible via Samoa.

Apartheid-era South Africa
Main article: Pass laws

Demonstrators discarding their passbooks to protest apartheid, 1960
In South Africa prior to the end of Apartheid, pass laws were a form of internal passport system designed to segregate the population, manage urbanisation, and allocate migrant labour. Also known as the natives' law, pass laws severely limited the movements of not only black African citizens, but other people as well by requiring or designated areas. Before the 1950s, this legislation largely applied to African men, and attempts to apply it to women in the 1910s and 1950s were met with significant protests. Pass laws were one of the dominant features of the country's apartheid system until it was effectively ended in 1986. The first internal passports in South Africa were introduced on 27 June 1797 by the Earl Macartney in an attempt to prevent Africans from entering the Cape Colony.[97] The Cape Colony was merged with the two Afrikaners republics in southern Africa to form the Union of South Africa in 1910. By this time, versions of pass laws existed elsewhere. A major boost for their utilization was the rise of the mining sector from the 1880s: pass laws provided a convenient means of controlling workers' mobility and enforcing contracts. In 1896 the South African Republic brought in two pass laws which required Africans to carry a metal badge. Only those employed by a master were permitted to remain on the Rand. Those entering a "labour district" needed a special pass which entitled them to remain for three days.[98] The Natives (Urban Areas) Act of 1923 deemed urban areas in South Africa as "white" and required all black African men in cities and towns to carry around permits called "passes" at all times. Anyone found without a pass would be arrested immediately and sent to a rural area. It was replaced in 1945 by the Natives (Urban Areas) Consolidation Act, which imposed "influx control" on black men and also set up guidelines for removing people deemed to be living idle lives from urban areas. This act outlined requirements for African peoples' "qualification" to reside legally in white metropolitan areas. To do so, they had to have Section 10 rights, based on whether[99]

the person had been born there and resided there always since birth;
the person had laboured continuously for ten years in any agreed area for any employer, or lived continuously in any such area for fifteen years;
The Black (Natives) Laws Amendment Act of 1952 amended the 1945 Native Urban Areas Consolidation Act, stipulating that all black people over the age of 16 were required to carry passes and that no black person could stay in an urban area more than 72 hours unless allowed to by Section 10.[100] The Natives (Abolition of Passes and Co-ordination of Documents) Act of 1952, commonly known as the Pass Laws Act, repealed the many regional pass laws and instituted one nationwide pass law, which made it compulsory for all black South Africans over the age of 16 to carry the "passbook" at all times within white areas. The law stipulated where, when, and for how long a person could remain.[101]

The document was similar to an internal passport, containing details on the bearer such as their fingerprints, photograph, the name of his/her employer, his/her address, how long the bearer had been employed, as well as other identification information. Employers often entered a behavioural evaluation, on the conduct of the pass holder. An employer was defined under the law and could only be a white person. The pass also documented permission requested and denied or granted to be in a certain region and the reason for seeking such permission. Under the terms of the law, any government employee could strike out such entries, basically cancelling the permission to remain in the area. A passbook without a valid entry then allowed officials to arrest and imprison the bearer of the pass. These passes often became the most despised symbols of apartheid. The resistance to the Pass Law led to many thousands of arrests and was the spark that ignited the Sharpeville Massacre on 21 March 1960, and led to the arrest of Robert Sobukwe that day.

Aspects
Contemporary border control policies are complex and address a variety of distinct phenomena depending on the circumstances and political priorities of the state(s) implementing them. Consequently, there are several aspects of border control which vary in nature and importance from region to region.

Biosecurity

Quarantine operations deployed by mainland Chinese border control.

An International Certificate of Vaccination issued by the Bureau of Quarantine in the Philippines to an individual after being vaccinated with a COVID-19 vaccine in 2021.
Main articles: Biosecurity, Quarantine, Travel restrictions related to the COVID-19 pandemic, and Vaccination requirements for international travel
Biosecurity refers to measures aimed at preventing the introduction and/or spread of harmful organisms (e.g. viruses, bacteria, etc.) to animals and plants in order to mitigate the risk of transmission of infectious disease. In agriculture, these measures are aimed at protecting food crops and livestock from pests, invasive species, and other organisms not conducive to the welfare of the human population. The term includes biological threats to people, including those from pandemic diseases and bioterrorism. The definition has sometimes been broadened to embrace other concepts, and it is used for different purposes in different contexts.

The most common category of biosecurity policies are quarantine measures adopted to counteract the spread of disease and, when applied as a component of border control, focus primarily on mitigating the entry of infected individuals, plants, or animals into a country.[102] Other aspects of biosecurity related to border control include mandatory vaccination policies for inbound travellers and measures to curtail the risk posed by bioterrorism or invasive species.

Quarantine measures are frequently implemented with regard to the mobility of animals, including both pets and livestock. Notably, in order to reduce the risk of introducing rabies from continental Europe, the United Kingdom used to require that dogs, and most other animals introduced to the country, spend six months in quarantine at an HM Customs and Excise pound. This policy was abolished in 2000 in favour of a scheme generally known as Pet Passports, where animals can avoid quarantine if they have documentation showing they are up to date on their appropriate vaccinations.[103]

In the past, quarantine measures were implemented by European countries in order to curtail the Bubonic Plague and Cholera. In the British Isles, for example, the Quarantine Act 1710 (9 Ann.) established maritime quarantine policies in an era in which strict border control measures as a whole were yet to become mainstream.[104] The first act was called for due to fears that the plague might be imported from Poland and the Baltic states. The second act of 1721 was due to the prevalence of the plague at Marseille and other places in Provence, France. It was renewed in 1733 after a new outbreak in continental Europe, and again in 1743, due to an epidemic in Messina. In 1752 a rigorous quarantine clause was introduced into an act regulating trade with the Levant, and various arbitrary orders were issued during the next twenty years to meet the supposed danger of infection from the Baltic states. Although no plague cases ever came to England during that period, the restrictions on traffic became more stringent, and in 1788 a very strict Quarantine Act was passed, with provisions affecting cargoes in particular. The act was revised in 1801 and 1805, and in 1823–24 an elaborate inquiry was followed by an act making quarantine only at the discretion of the Privy Council, which recognised yellow fever or other highly infectious diseases as calling for quarantine, along with plague. The threat of cholera in 1831 was the last occasion in England of the use of quarantine restrictions. Cholera affected every country in Europe despite all efforts to keep it out. When cholera returned to England in 1849, 1853 and 1865–66, no attempt was made to seal the ports. In 1847 the privy council ordered all arrivals with a clean bill of health from the Black Sea and the Levant to be admitted, provided there had been no case of plague during the voyage and afterwards, the practice of quarantine was discontinued.[105]

In modern maritime law, biosecurity measures for arriving vessels centre around 'pratique', a licence from border control officials permitting a ship to enter port on assurance from the captain that that the vessel is free from contagious disease. The clearance granted is commonly referred to as 'free pratique'. A ship can signal a request for 'pratique' by flying a solid yellow square-shaped flag. This yellow flag is the Q flag in the set of international maritime signal flags.[106] In the event that 'free pratique' is not granted, a vessel will be held in quarantine according to biosecurity rules prevailing at the port of entry until a border control officer inspects the vessel.[107] During the COVID-19 pandemic, a controversy arose as to who granted pratique to the Ruby Princess.[108] A related concept is the 'bill of health', a document issued by officials of a port of departure indicating to the officials of the port of arrival whether it is likely that the ship is carrying a contagious disease, either literally on board as fomites or via its crewmen or passengers. As defined in a consul's handbook from 1879:

A bill of health is a document issued by the consul or the public authorities of the port which a ship sails from, descriptive of the health of the port at the time of the vessel's clearance. A clean bill of health certifies that at the date of its issue no infectious disease was known to exist either in the port or its neighbourhood. A suspected or touched bill of health reports that rumours were in circulation that an infectious disease had appeared but that the rumour had not been confirmed by any known cases. A foul bill of health or the absence of a clean bill of health implies that the place the vessel cleared from was infected with a contagious disease. The two latter cases would render the vessel liable to quarantine.[109]

Another category of biosecurity measures adopted by border control organisations is mandatory vaccination. As a result of the prevalence of Yellow Fever across much of the African continent, a significant portion of countries in the region require arriving passengers to present an International Certificate of Vaccination or Prophylaxis (Carte Jaune) certifying that they have received the Yellow Fever vaccine. A variety of other countries require travellers who have visited areas where Yellow Fever is endemic to present a certificate in order to clear border checkpoints as a means of preventing the spread of the disease. Prior to the emergence of COVID-19, Yellow Fever was the primary human disease subjected to de facto vaccine passport measures by border control authorities around the world. Similar measures are in place with regard to Polio and meningococcal meningitis in regions where those diseases are endemic and countries bordering those regions. Prior to the eradication of Smallpox, similar Carte Jaune requirements were in force for that disease around the world.


A road sign at an exit on Interstate 91 in Vermont advising individuals entering the state of a quarantine policy adopted in response to COVID-19, photographed in November 2020.

Slovakia, which otherwise maintains open borders with other Schengen Area jurisdictions, closed borders to non-residents because of the COVID-19 pandemic.
As a result of the COVID-19 pandemic, biosecurity measures have become a highly visible aspect of border control across the globe. Most notably, quarantine and mandatory COVID-19 vaccination for international travellers. Together with a decreased willingness to travel, the implementation of biosecurity measures has had a negative economic and social impact on the travel industry.[110] Slow travel increased in popularity during the pandemic, with tourists visiting fewer destinations during their trips.[111][112]

Biosecurity measures such as restrictions on cross-border travel, the introduction of mandatory vaccination for international travellers, and the adoption of quarantine or mandatory testing measures have helped to contain the spread of COVID-19.[113] While test-based border screening measures may prove effective under certain circumstances, they may fail to detect a significant quantity positive cases if only conducted upon arrival without follow-up. A minimum 10-day quarantine may be beneficial in preventing the spread of COVID-19 and may be more effective if combined with an additional control measure like border screening.[113] A study in Science found that travel restrictions could delay the initial arrival of COVID-19 in a country, but that they produced only modest overall effects unless combined with domestic infection prevention and control measures to considerably reduce transmissions.[114] (This is consistent with prior research on influenza and other communicable diseases.[115][116]) Travel bans early in the pandemic were most effective for isolated locations, such as small island nations.[116]

During the COVID-19 pandemic, many jurisdictions across the globe introduced biosecurity measures on internal borders. This ranged from quarantine measures imposed upon individuals crossing state lines within America to prohibitions on interstate travel in Australia.

Customs
Main article: Customs

North Korean customs officer at Pyongyang Sunan International Airport.

Southern edge (customs border) of Captain Cook wharf, Ports of Auckland, New Zealand. An electric fence is faintly visible behind the historical fence
Each country has its own laws and regulations for the import and export of goods into and out of a country, which its customs authority enforces. The import or export of some goods may be restricted or forbidden, in which case customs controls enforce such policies.[117] Customs enforcement at borders can also entail collecting excise tax and preventing the smuggling of dangerous or illegal goods. A customs duty is a tariff or tax on the importation (usually) or exportation (unusually) of goods.

In many countries, border controls for arriving passengers at many international airports and some road crossings are separated into red and green channels in order to prioritise customs enforcement.[118][119] Within the European Union's common customs area, airports may operate additional blue channels for passengers arriving from within that area. For such passengers, border control may focus specifically on prohibited items and other goods that are not covered by the common policy. Luggage tags for checked luggage travelling within the EU are green-edged so they may be identified.[120][121] In most EU member states, travellers coming from other EU countries within the Schengen Area can use the green lane, although airports outside the Schengen Area or with frequent flights arriving from jurisdictions within Schengen but outside the European Union may use blue channels for convenience and efficiency.

Customs area
A customs area is an area designated for storage of commercial goods that have not cleared border controls for customs purposes. It is surrounded by a customs border. Commercial goods not yet cleared through customs are often stored in a type of customs area known as a bonded warehouse, until processed or re-exported.[122][123] Ports authorised to handle international cargo generally include recognised bonded warehouses.

For the purpose of customs duties, goods within the customs area are treated as being outside the country. This allows easy transshipment to a third country without customs authorities being involved.[122] For this reason, customs areas are usually carefully controlled and fenced to prevent smuggling. However, the area is still territorially part of the country, so the goods within the area are subject to other local laws (for example drug laws and biosecurity regulations), and thus may be searched, impounded or turned back.

The term is also sometimes used to define an area (usually composed of several countries) which form a customs union, a customs territory, or to describe the area at airports and ports where travellers are checked through customs.

Sanitary and phytosanitary measures
Main article: Agreement on the Application of Sanitary and Phytosanitary Measures
Sanitary and phytosanitary (SPS) measures are customs measures to protect humans, animals, and plants from diseases, pests, or contaminants. The Agreement on the Application of Sanitary and Phytosanitary Measures is one of the final documents approved at the conclusion of the Uruguay Round of the Multilateral Trade Negotiations. It applies to all sanitary (relating to animals) and phytosanitary (relating to plants) (SPS) measures that may have a direct or indirect impact on international trade. The SPS agreement includes a series of understandings (trade disciplines) on how SPS measures will be established and used by countries when they establish, revise, or apply their domestic laws and regulations. Per the agreement, states agree to base their SPS standards on science, and as guidance for their actions, the agreement encourages countries to use standards set by international standard setting organisations. The SPS agreement seeks to ensure that SPS measures will not arbitrarily or unjustifiably discriminate against trade of certain other members nor be used to disguise trade restrictions. Per the agreement, countries maintain the sovereign right to provide the level of health protection they deem appropriate, but agree that this right will not be misused for protectionist purposes nor result in unnecessary trade barriers. A rule of equivalency rather than equality applies to the use of SPS measures.

The 2012 classification of non-tariff measures (NTMs) developed by the Multi-Agency Support Team (MAST), a working group of eight international organisations, classifies SPS measures as one of 16 non-tariff measure (NTM) chapters. In this classification, SPS measures are classified as chapter A and defined as "Measures that are applied to protect human or animal life from risks arising from additives, contaminants, toxins or disease-causing organisms in their food; to protect human life from plant- or animal-carried diseases; to protect animal or plant life from pests, diseases, or disease-causing organisms; to prevent or limit other damage to a country from the entry, establishment or spread of pests; and to protect biodiversity".[124] Examples of SPS are tolerance limits for residues, restricted use of substances, labelling requirements related to food safety, hygienic requirements and quarantine requirements.

In certain countries, sanitary and phytosanitary measures focuses extensively on curtailing and regulating the import of foreign agricultural products in order to protect domestic ecosystems. For example, Australian border controls restrict most (if not all) food products, certain wooden products and other similar items.[125][126][127] Similar restrictions exist in Canada, America and New Zealand.

Duty-free shops

Duty Free Shop at Pyongyang Sunan International Airport
Main article: Duty-free shop
Common at international airports and occasionally at seaports or land crossings, duty-free shops sell products tax-free to customers who have cleared exit border controls prior to boarding an international flight and, in some airports, to passengers arriving from overseas. Most countries impose limits on how much of each type of duty-free goods, may be purchased by each passenger. The airport with the most duty-free sales is Seoul Incheon Airport with US$1.85 billion in 2016.[128] Dubai International Airport is second, recording transactions worth $1.82 billion in 2016.[129]

Air and maritime borders
In addition to land borders, countries also apply border control measures to airspace and waters under their jurisdiction. Such measures control access to air and maritime territory as well as extractible resources (e.g. fish, minerals, fossil fuels).

Under the United Nations Convention on the Law of the Sea (UNCLOS)[130], states exercise varying degrees of control over different categories of territorial waters:

Internal waters: Waters landward of the baseline[v], over which the state has complete sovereignty: not even innocent passage[w] is allowed without explicit permission from said state. Lakes and rivers are considered internal waters.
Territorial sea: A state's territorial sea is a belt of coastal waters extending at most 22 kilometres from the baseline[v] of a coastal state. If this would overlap with another state's territorial sea, the border is taken as the median point between the states' baselines, unless the states in question agree otherwise. A state can also choose to claim a smaller territorial sea. The territorial sea is regarded as the sovereign territory of the state, although foreign ships (military and civilian) are allowed innocent passage through it, or transit passage for straits; this sovereignty also extends to the airspace over and seabed below. As a result of UNCLOS, states exercise a similar degree of control over its territorial sea as over land territory and may thus utilise coast guard and naval patrols to enforce border control measures provided they do not prevent innocent or transit passage.
Contiguous zone: A state's contiguous zone is a band of water extending farther from the outer edge of the territorial sea to up to 44 kilometres from the baseline, within which a state can implement limited border control measures for the purpose of preventing or punishing "infringement of its customs, fiscal, immigration or sanitary laws and regulations within its territory or territorial sea". This will typically be 22 kilometres wide, but could be more (if a state has chosen to claim a territorial sea of less than 22 kilometres), or less, if it would otherwise overlap another state's contiguous zone. However, unlike the territorial sea, there is no standard rule for resolving such conflicts and the states in question must negotiate their own compromise. The United States invoked a contiguous zone out to 44 kilometres from the baseline on 29 September 1999.[131]
Exclusive economic zone An exclusive economic zone extends from the baseline[v] to a maximum of 370 kilometres. A coastal nation has control of all economic resources within its exclusive economic zone, including fishing, mining, oil exploration, and any pollution of those resources. However, it cannot prohibit passage or loitering above, on, or under the surface of the sea that is in compliance with the laws and regulations adopted by the coastal State in accordance with the provisions of the UN Convention, within that portion of its exclusive economic zone beyond its territorial sea. The only authority a state has over its EEZ is therefore its ability to regulate the extraction or spoliation of resources contained therein and border control measures implemented to this effect focus on the suppression of unauthorised commercial activity.
Vessels not complying with a state's maritime policies may be subject to ship arrest and enforcement action by the state's authorities. Maritime border control measures are controversial in the context of international trade disputes, as was the case following France's detention of British fishermen in October 2021 in the aftermath of Brexit[132][133] or when the Indonesian navy detained the crew of the Seven Seas Conqueress alleging that the vessel was unlawfully fishing within Indonesian territorial waters while the Singaporean government claimed the vessel was in Singaporean waters near Pedra Branca.[134]

Similarly, international law accords each state control over the airspace above its land territory, internal waters, and territorial sea. Consequently, states have the authority to regulate flyover rights and tax foreign aircraft utilising their airspace. Additionally, the International Civil Aviation Organisation designates states to administer international airspace, including airspace over waters not forming part of any state's territorial sea. Aircraft unlawfully entering a country's airspace may be grounded and their crews may be detained.

Many countries implement air defence identification zones (ADIZs) requiring aircraft approaching within a specified distance of its airspace to contact or seek prior authorisation from its military or transport authorities.[135] An ADIZ may extend beyond a country's territory to give the country more time to respond to possibly hostile aircraft.[136] The concept of an ADIZ is not defined in any international treaty and is not regulated by any international body,[136][137] but is nevertheless a well-established aerial border control measure.[x] Usually such zones only cover undisputed territory, do not apply to foreign aircraft not intending to enter territorial airspace, and do not overlap.[137][140]

Border security

The border fence built by India, as seen from near the Hili border station on the Bangladeshi side.
Border security measures are measures taken by a country or group of countries to enforce its border control policies.[141] Such measures target a variety of issues, ranging from customs violations and trade in unlawful goods to the suppression of unauthorised migration or travel. The specific border security measures taken by a jurisdiction vary depending on the priorities of local authorities and are affected by social, economic, and geographical factors.

In India, which maintains free movement with Nepal and Bhutan, border security focuses primarily on the Bangladeshi, Pakistani, and Myanmar borders. In order to deter unlawful immigration and drug trafficking from Bangladesh,[142] India is constructing the India-Bangladesh barrier. On the Pakistani border, the Border Security Force aims to prevent the infiltration of Indian territory by terrorists from Pakistan and other countries in the west (Afghanistan, Iraq, Syria, etc.). In contrast, India's border with Myanmar is porous and the 2021 military coup in Myanmar saw an influx of refugees seeking asylum in border states including Mizoram.[143] The refoulement of Rohingya refugees is a contentious aspect of India's border control policy vis à vis Myanmar.[144]


Mexico–United States barrier in California
United States border security policy is largely centred on the country's border with Mexico. Security along this border is composed of many distinct elements; including physical barriers, patrol routes, lighting, and border patrol personnel. Former president Donald Trump's proposal to build a new wall along the border formed a major feature of his 2016 presidential campaign and, over the course of his presidency, his administration spent approximately US$15 billion on the project, with US$5 billion appropriated from US Customs and Border Protection, US$6.3 billion appropriated from anti-narcotics initiative funded by congress, and US$3.6 billion appropriated from the American military.[145] Members of both the Democratic Republican parties who opposed President Trump's border control policies, regarded the border wall as unnecessary or undesirable, arguing that other measures would be more effective at reducing illegal immigration than building a wall, including tackling the economic issues that lead to immigration being a relevant issue altogether, border surveillance or an increase in the number of customs agents.[146]

Similar to India's barrier with Bangladesh and the proposed wall between America and Mexico, Iran has constructed a wall on its frontier with Pakistan. The wall aims to reduce unauthorised border crossings[147] and stem the flow of drugs,[148] and is also a response to terrorist attacks, notably the one in the Iranian border town of Zahedan on 17 February 2007, which killed thirteen people, including nine Iranian Revolutionary Guard officials.[149]


Hungarian border barrier with Serbia
Border security has, over the first two decades of the century, also become a major concern in the Schengen Area, specifically as a result of the European migrant crisis. The walls at Melilla and at Ceuta on Spain's border with Morocco are a part of the trend towards increasing border security in response to an unprecedented rise in both refugees and economic migrants from countries in Sub Saharan Africa. Similar, though less drastic, measures have been taken on the Schengen area's borders with Turkey in response to the refugee crisis created in Syria by terrorist organisations such as Daesh and the Syrian Free Army. The creation of European Union's collective border security organisation, Frontex, is another aspect of the bloc's growing focus on border security. Within the Schengen Area, border security has become an especially prominent priority for the Hungarian government under right-wing strongman[150][151] Viktor Orbán. Hungary completed the construction of 175 kilometres of fencing between with Serbia in September 2015 and on the border with Croatia in October 2015 to stop unauthorised border crossings.[152] In April 2016, Hungarian government announced construction of reinforcements of the barrier, which it described as "temporary".[153] In July 2016, nearly 1,300 migrants were "stuck" on the Serbian side of the border.[154] In August 2016, Orbán announced that Hungary will build another larger barrier on its southern border.[155] On 28 April 2017, the Hungarian government announced it had completed a second fence, 155 kilometres long with Serbia.[156][157] On 24 September 2015, Hungary began building fence on its border with Slovenia, in the area around Tornyiszentmiklós–Pince border crossing.[158] The razor wire obstacle was removed two days later.[159] As of March 2016, everything is in place if Hungary decides to build a border barrier on the Hungarian–Romanian border – the military is "only waiting for the command from the government".[160]

Another example of border security is the Israeli anti-tunnel barrier along its border with the Gaza Strip, a part of the State of Palestine under the control of Hamas (a militant group backed by the Muslim Brotherhood, a Qatari-sponsored militant group). In order to curtail Hamas's ability to build tunnels into Israeli-controlled territory, Israel have built a slurry wall. Similarly, Saudi Arabia has begun construction of a border barrier or fence between its territory and Yemen to prevent the unauthorized movement of people and goods. The difference between the countries' economic situations means that many Yemenis head to Saudi Arabia to find work. Saudi Arabia does not have a barrier with its other neighbours in the Gulf Cooperation Council, whose economies are more similar. In 2006 Saudi Arabia proposed constructing a security fence along the entire length of its 900 kilometre long desert border with Iraq in a multimillion-dollar project to secure the Kingdom's borders in order to improve internal security, control illegal immigration, and bolster its defences against external threats.[161] As of July 2009 it was reported that Saudis will pay $3.5 billion for security fence.[162] The combined wall and ditch will be 965 kilometres long and include five layers of fencing, watch towers, night-vision cameras, and radar cameras and manned by 30,000 troops.[163] Elsewhere in Europe, the Republic of Macedonia began erecting a fence on its border with Greece in November 2015.[164] On the land border between Palestine and the portion of the Sinai peninsula administered by the African nation of Egypt, the latter began construction of a border barrier in 2009 prompted by concern that militant organisations were making use of the Gaza Strip smuggling tunnels to move weapons and personnel between Gaza and Egypt.[165]

In 2003, Botswana began building a 480 kilometre long electric fence along its border with Zimbabwe. The official reason for the fence is to stop the spread of foot-and-mouth disease among livestock. Zimbabweans argue that the height of the fence is clearly intended to keep out people. Botswana has responded that the fence is designed to keep out cattle, and to ensure that entrants have their shoes disinfected at legal border crossings. Botswana also argued that the government continues to encourage legal movement into the country. Zimbabwe was unconvinced, and the barrier remains a source of tension.[166]

Border checkpoints
Main articles: Border checkpoint, Port of entry, and International airport
Sultan Iskandar Building, Johor Bahru, Malaysia
Sultan Iskandar Building
Woodlands Checkpoint, Singapore
Woodlands Checkpoint
The Sultan Iskandar Building (Malaysia) and Woodlands Checkpoint (Singapore) on the Malaysia–Singapore border handles the busiest international land border crossing in the world, with 350,000 travellers daily prior to the COVID-19 pandemic.[167][168]

The International Terminal at San Francisco International Airport is an airport of entry for travellers entering America and has border checkpoint facilities for arriving passengers. Like most North American airports, it does not have a sterile international transit area. Domestic and international passengers are thus not clearly separated. This enables easier transfers from domestic to international flights but requires international transit passengers to clear the border checkpoint even if their final destination is outside America.
A Border checkpoint is a place where goods or individuals moving across borders are inspected for compliance with border control measures. Access-controlled borders often have a limited number of checkpoints where they can be crossed without legal sanctions. Arrangements or treaties may be formed to allow or mandate less restrained crossings (e.g. the Schengen Agreement). Land border checkpoints (land ports of entry) can be contrasted with the customs and immigration facilities at seaports, international airports, and other ports of entry.

Checkpoints generally serve two purposes:

To prevent entrance of individuals who are either undesirable (e.g. criminals or others who pose threats) or simply unauthorised to enter.
To prevent entrance of goods that are illegal or subject to restriction, or to collect tariffs in accordance with customs or quarantine policies.
Port of entry
A border checkpoint at which travellers are permitted to enter a jurisdiction is known as a port of entry. International airports are usually ports of entry, as are road and rail crossings on a land border. Seaports can be used as ports of entry only if a dedicated customs presence is posted there. The choice of whether to become a port of entry is up to the civil authority controlling the port.

An airport of entry is an airport that provides customs and immigration services for incoming flights. These services allow the airport to serve as an initial port of entry for foreign visitors arriving in a country. While the terms airport of entry and international airport are generally used interchangeably, not all international airports qualify as airports of entry since international airports without any immigration or customs facilities exist in the Schengen Area whose members have eliminated border controls with each other. Airports of entry are usually larger than domestic airports and often feature longer runways and facilities to accommodate the heavier aircraft commonly used for international and intercontinental travel. International airports often also host domestic flights, which often help feed both passengers and cargo into international ones (and vice-versa). Buildings, operations and management have become increasingly sophisticated since the mid-20th century, when international airports began to provide infrastructure for international civilian flights. Detailed technical standards have been developed to ensure safety and common coding systems implemented to provide global consistency. The physical structures that serve millions of individual passengers and flights are among the most complex and interconnected in the world. By the second decade of the 21st century, there were over 1,200 international airports and almost two billion international passengers along with 50 million tonnes of cargo passing through them annually.

In order to exempt passengers transitting between international flights from clearing border checkpoints, most international airports outside North America feature a "sterile lounge", an area after security checkpoints within which passengers are free to move freely and which is generally deemed to be outside the immigration and customs area of the country in which the airport situated. In addition to employees, only processed passengers with a valid ticket are allowed inside the sterile lounge.[169]


Sterile lounge at Changi Airport Terminal 3 in Singapore. Passengers transitting between international flights at Terminals 1, 2, and 3 of Changi Airport disembark directly into the sterile lounge, may proceed to their connecting gate without clearing the border checkpoint or completing any other border control formality, and can move between the sterile lounge areas of each terminal using the Skytrain without passing through any checkpoint.

 

A port of entry at Shir Khan Bandar in northern Afghanistan near the Tajikistan border guarded by American military personnel prior to their withdrawal from Afghanistan, following which the Taliban assumed control over border checkpoints between Afghanistan and its neighbours.

 

The Hong Kong–Macau Ferry Terminal in Sheung Wan is a sea port of entry to Hong Kong and an example of an internal border checkpoint where travellers arriving from or departing for other cities in the Pearl River Delta are subjected to border control measures.

 

The cruise-ship pier at Ocean Terminal is also a sea port of entry to Hong Kong. While the HK-Macau Ferry Terminal serves as a port of entry for travellers from other Chinese cities in the Pearl River Delta, the Ocean Terminal serves as a port of entry for visitors arriving via cruise ship from a wider variety of jurisdictions.

Quilantan entry
A 'Quilantan' or 'Wave Through' entry is a phenomenon at American border checkpoints authorising a form of non-standard but legal entry without any inspection of travel documents. It occurs when the border security personnel present at a border crossing choose to summarily admit some number of persons without performing a standard interview or document examination.[170]

Typically this can occur when an official border crossing is busy and an immigration officer waves a car through without first checking all passengers for their travel documents. If an individual can prove that they were waved through immigration in this manner, then they are considered to have entered with inspection despite not having answered any questions or received a passport entry stamp.[171]

This definition of legal entry does not apply to situations where foreigners entered America but have not crossed at a legal, manned border station. Thus it does not provide a path to legal residency for those who have entered America by crossing accidental gaps in the borders around geological formations.[172]

Border zones
Border zones are areas near borders that have special restrictions on movement. Governments may forbid unauthorised entry to or exit from border zones and restrict property ownership in the area. The zones function as buffer zones specifically monitored by border patrols in order to prevent unauthorised cross-border travel. Border zones enable authorities to detain and prosecute individuals suspected of being or aiding undocumented migrants, smugglers, or spies without necessarily having to prove that the individuals in question actually engaged in the suspected unauthorised activity since, as all unauthorised presence in the area is forbidden, the mere presence of an individual permits authorities to arrest them. Border zones between hostile states can be heavily militarised, with minefields, barbed wire, and watchtowers. Some border zones are designed to prevent illegal immigration or emigration and do not have many restrictions but may operate checkpoints to check immigration status. In most places, a border vista is usually included and/or required. In some nations, movement inside a border zone without a licence is an offence and will result in arrest. No probable cause is required as mere presence inside the zone is an offence, if it is intentional.[173] Even with a licence to enter, photography, making fires, and carrying of firearms and hunting are prohibited.

Examples of international border zones are the Border Security Zone of Russia and the Finnish border zone on the Finnish–Russian border. There are also intra-country zones such as the Cactus Curtain surrounding the Guantanamo Bay Naval Base in Cuba, the Korean Demilitarised Zone along the North Korea-South Korea demarcation line and the Frontier Closed Area in Hong Kong. Important historical examples are the Wire of Death set up by the German Empire to control the Belgium–Netherlands border and the Iron Curtain, a set of border zones maintained by the Soviet Union and its satellite states along their borders with Western states. One of the most militarised parts was the restricted zone of the inner German border. While initially and officially the zone was for border security, eventually it was engineered to prevent escape from the Soviet sphere into the West. Ultimately, the Eastern Bloc governments resorted to using lethal countermeasures against those trying to cross the border, such as mined fences and orders to shoot anyone trying to cross into the West. The restrictions on building and habitation made the area a "green corridor", today established as the European Green Belt.

In the area stretching inwards from its internal border with the mainland, Hong Kong maintains a Frontier Closed Area out of bounds to those without special authorisation. The area was established in the 1950s when Hong Kong was under British administration as a consequence of the Convention for the Extension of Hong Kong Territory prior to the Transfer of sovereignty over Hong Kong in 1997. The purposes of the area were to prevent illegal immigration and smuggling; smuggling had become prevalent as a consequence of the Korean War. Today, under the one country, two systems policy, the area continues to be used to curtail unauthorised migration to Hong Kong and the smuggling of goods in either direction.

As a result of the partition of the Korean peninsula by America and the Soviet Union after World War II, and exacerbated by the subsequent Korean War, there is a Demilitarised Zone (DMZ) spanning the de facto border between North and South Korea. The DMZ follows the effective boundaries as of the end of the Korean War in 1953. Similarly to the Frontier Closed Area in Hong Kong, this zone and the defence apparatus that exists on both sides of the border serve to curtail unauthorised passage between the two sides.

In South Korea, there is an additional fenced-off area between the Civilian Control Line (CCL) and the start of the Demilitarised Zone. The CCL is a line that designates an additional buffer zone to the Demilitarised Zone within a distance of 5 to 20 kilometres from the Southern Limit Line of the Demilitarised Zone. Its purpose is to limit and control the entrance of civilians into the area in order to protect and maintain the security of military facilities and operations near the Demilitarised Zone. The commander of the 8th US Army ordered the creation of the CCL and it was activated and first became effective in February 1954.[174] The buffer zone that falls south of the Southern Limit Line is called the Civilian Control Zone. Barbed wire fences and manned military guard posts mark the CCLe. South Korean soldiers typically accompany tourist busses and cars travelling north of the CCL as armed guards to monitor the civilians as well as to protect them from North Korean intruders. Most of the tourist and media photos of the "Demilitarised Zone fence" are actually photos of the CCL fence. The actual Demilitarised Zone fence on the Southern Limit Line is completely off-limits to everybody except soldiers and it is illegal to take pictures of the Demilitarised Zone fence.

Some border zones, referred to as border vistas, are composed of legally mandated cleared space between two areas of foliage located at an international border intended to provide a clear demarcation line between two jurisdictions. Border vistas are most commonly found along undefended international boundary lines, where border security is not as much of a necessity and a built barrier is undesired, and are a treaty requirement for certain borders. An example of a border vista is a six-metre cleared space around unguarded portions of the Canada–United States border.[175] Similar clearings along the border line are provided for by many international treaties. For example, the 2006 border management treaty between Russia and China provides for a 15-metre cleared strip along the two nations' border.[176]


The border vista along the Canada–United States border, as seen from a wayside on the Alaska Highway.

 

Control Line, Imjingak, Paju, South Korea

 

A South Korean checkpoint at the Civilian Control Line, located outside of the Demilitarised Zone

 

Korean Demilitarised Zone as seen from the North

 

Frontier Closed Area signboard at Lo Wu

 

Border zone in Brest with a security electric fence, a ploughed trace-control strip and a pillbox.

 

Border zone marked on a tree on the Finland–Russia border: no entry.

Drugs

Singapore arrival card warning visitors about the death penalty for drug trafficking.
Border control in many Asian countries prioritise mitigating trade in narcotics. For instance, Singapore, Malaysia, Thailand, and Indonesia impose mandatory death sentences on individuals caught smuggling restricted substances across their borders. For example, Muhammad Ridzuan Ali was executed in Singapore on 19 May 2017 for drug trafficking.[177] India and Malaysia are focusing resources on eliminating drug smuggling from Myanmar and Thailand respectively. The issue stems largely from the high output of dangerous and illegal drugs in the Golden Triangle as well as in regions further west such as Afghanistan.

A similar problem exists east of the Pacific, and has resulted in countries such as Mexico and America tightening border control in response to the northward flow of illegal substances from regions such as Colombia. The Mexican Drug War and similar cartel activity in neighbouring areas has exacerbated the problem.

Immigration law and policy
Main article: Immigration law
Immigration law refers to the national statutes, regulations, and legal precedents governing immigration into and deportation from a country. Strictly speaking, it is distinct from other matters such as naturalisation and citizenship, although they are often conflated. Immigration laws vary around the world, as well as according to the social and political climate of the times, as acceptance of immigrants sways from the widely inclusive to the deeply nationalist and isolationist. Countries frequently maintain laws which regulate both the rights of entry and exit as well as internal rights, such as the duration of stay, freedom of movement, and the right to participate in commerce or government. National laws regarding the immigration of citizens of that country are regulated by international law. While the United Nations' International Covenant on Civil and Political Rights mandates[178] that all countries allow entry to their own citizens, this principle is not always respected in practice. For instance, during the COVID-19 pandemic, Australia adopted a policy of denying entry to all individuals in particularly affected jurisdictions, including Australian citizens and permanent residents.[179][180] Similarly, while states within the Schengen Area typically permit freedom of movement across borders, many states within the area implemented ad hoc border controls during the pandemic.

Immigration policy is the aspect of border control concerning the transit of people into a country, especially those that intend to stay and work in the country. Taxation, tariff and trade rules set out what goods immigrants may bring with them, and what services they may perform while temporarily in the country. Investment policy sometimes permits wealthy immigrants to invest in businesses in exchange for favourable treatment and eventual naturalisation. Agricultural policy may make exemptions for migrant farm workers, who typically enter a country only for the harvest season and then return home to a country or region in the Global South (such as Mexico or Jamaica from where America and Canada, respectively, often import temporary agricultural labour).[181] An important aspect of immigration policy is the treatment of refugees,[182] more or less helpless or stateless people who throw themselves on the mercy of the state they try to enter, seeking refuge from actual or purported poor treatment in their country of origin. Asylum is sometimes granted to those who face persecution or a well-founded fear of persecution on account of race, religion, nationality, membership of a particular social group, or political opinion.

Diaspora communities

An OCI booklet exempting its bearer from usual immigration controls in India.

Karta Polaka – specimen document
Certain countries adopt immigration policies designed to be favourable towards members of diaspora communities with a connection to the country. For example, the Indian government confers Overseas Citizenship of India (OCI) status on foreign citizens of Indian origin to live and work indefinitely in India. OCI status was introduced in response to demands for dual citizenship by the Indian diaspora, particularly in countries with large populations of Indian origin. It was introduced by The Citizenship (Amendment) Act, 2005 in August 2005.[183][184] In the ASEAN region, a large portion of the Singaporean, Malaysian, and Bruneian population hold OCI status. Large OCI communities also exist in North America, the United Kingdom, Australia, and New Zealand, as well as in many African nations (particularly South Africa, Madagascar, and members of the East African Community). OCI status exempts holders from immigration controls generally imposed upon others of the same nationality.

Similarly, Poland issues the Karta Polaka to citizens of certain northeast European countries with Polish ancestry.

A British Ancestry visa is a document issued by the United Kingdom to Commonwealth citizens with a grandparent born in the United Kingdom, Channel Islands or Isle of Man who wish to work in the United Kingdom. Similar to OCI status, it exempts members of the country's diaspora from usual immigration controls. It is used mainly by Australians, New Zealanders, Canadians, and South Africans of British descent working or studying in the United Kingdom.[185]

Some nations recognise a right of return for people with ancestry in that country or a connection to a particular ethnic group. A notable example of this is the right of Sephardi Jews to acquire Spanish nationality by virtue of their community's Spanish origins. Similar exemptions to immigration controls exist for people of Armenian origin seeking to acquire Armenian citizenship. Ghana, similarly, grants an indefinite right to stay in Ghana to members of the African diaspora regardless of citizenship.[186] Similarly, Israel maintains a policy permitting members of the Jewish diaspora to immigrate to Israel regardless of prior nationality.

South Korean immigration policy is relatively unique in that, as a consequence of its claim over the territory currently administered by North Korea, citizens of North Korea are regarded by the South as its own citizens by birth.[187] Consequently, North Korean refugees in China often attempt to travel to countries such as Thailand which, while not offering asylum to North Koreans, classifies them as unauthorised immigrants and deports them to South Korea instead of North Korea.[188][189][190] At the same time, this policy has operated to prevent pro-North Korea Zainichi Koreans recognised by Japan as Chōsen-seki from entering South Korea without special permission from the South Korean authorities as, despite being regarded as citizens of the Republic of Korea and members of the Korean diaspora, they generally refuse to exercise that status.[191]

Special immigration areas
In various special immigration areas around the world, border control policies can range from severely limiting migration, as in Greece's Mount Athos, to allowing most types of migration, such as the free migration[y] policy in force in Svalbard. Similar policies are in force for Iran's Kish and Qeshm islands, and for Iraqi Kurdistan.

Local border traffic

The front of the updated version of the Border Crossing Card issued to Mexican nationals
Local border traffic or small border traffic is the flow of travellers within the area surrounding a controlled international or internal border. In many cases local border traffic is subject to bilateral regulation aimed at the simplification of border crossing for individuals travelling within a designated area surrounding the border.[193] In certain cases, this entails adopting border control policies imposing reduced border controls for frequent travellers intending to remain within a border area. Depending on the particular border in question, these measures may be restricted to local residents, implemented as a blanket regional visa waiver by one jurisdiction for nationals of the other, or available to individuals lawfully present in one jurisdiction seeking to visit the other.

For example, the relaxed border controls maintained by Bhutan for those not proceeding past Phuentsholing and certain other border cities enable travellers to enter without going through any document check whatsoever. The Border Crossing Card issued by American authorities to Mexican nationals enables Mexicans to enter border areas without a passport.[z] Both America and Bhutan maintain interior checkposts to enforce compliance.

China maintains relaxed border controls for individuals lawfully in Hong Kong or Macau to visit the surrounding Pearl River Delta visa-free, provided that the following conditions are met:[196]

The visitor is a national of a country which has diplomatic relations with the People's Republic of China
The visitor is visiting the Pearl River Delta as part of a tour group organised by a Hong Kong or Macau based travel agency
The stay is for six days or less
The visitor stays only within the cities of Guangzhou, Shenzhen, Zhuhai, Foshan, Dongguan, Zhongshan, Jiangmen, Zhaoqing, Huizhou and Shantou.
In Belarus, the "Brest – Grodno" visa free territory, established by a presidential decree signed in August 2019 has permitted local visa free access to most visitors lawfully present in the neighbouring Schengen Area since 10 November 2019.[197][198] Visitors are allowed to stay without a visa for 15 days. Entry is possible through the following checkpoints with Poland and Lithuania - Brest (Terespol), Bruzgi (Kuźnica), Damačava (Sławatycze), Bieniakoni (Šalčininkai), Bierastavica (Bobrowniki), Piasčatka (Połowce), Pryvalka (Raigardas), Piareraŭ (Białowieża), Liasnaja (Rudawka), Pryvalka (Švendubrė), Brest-Uschodni Railway Station, Grodno Railway Station, Brest Airport and Grodno Airport. Prior to travel, visitors must obtain an appropriate document[199] issued by a local travel agency registered in Belarus.

Similarly, Schengen states which share an external land border with a non-Schengen state are authorised by virtue of the EU Regulation 1931/2006 to conclude or maintain bilateral agreements with neighbouring third countries for the purpose of implementing a unilateral or reciprocal local border traffic regime.[200] Such agreements define a border area on either side of the border, and provide for the issuance of local border traffic permits to residents of the border area. Permits may be used to cross the EU external border within the border area, are not stamped on crossing the border and must display the holder's name and photograph, as well as a statement that its holder is not authorised to move outside the border area and that any abuse shall be subject to penalties.

Often, additional border crossing points are created to carry only local border traffic.

Immigrant investor programmes
Immigrant investor programmes are border control policies that offer permanent residence or citizenship in return for investment.[201][202][203] Immigrant investor programmes originated in the 1980s when tax havens in the Pacific and Caribbean began "cash-for-passport" programmes that facilitated visa-free travel and tax avoidance.[204] Such programmes have sparked controversy in several countries. A lack of demonstrable economic benefits, and security concerns, have been among the most common criticisms. In 2014 the Canadian government suspended their golden visa programme (although, as of 2017, Quebec maintains its own golden visa programme).[205] The implementation of such programmes in Europe has been criticised by the European Parliament,[206] which approved a non-binding resolution that in 2014 declaring that an EU passport, which by definition provides its bearer the right to reside in any EU or EEA jurisdiction, should not have a "price tag".[207]

Open borders
Main article: Open border
An open border is the deregulation and or lack of regulation on the movement of persons between nations and jurisdictions, this does not apply to trade or movement between privately owned land areas.[208] Most nations have open borders for travel within their nation of travel, though more authoritarian states may limit the freedom of internal movement of its citizens, as for example in the former USSR. However, only a handful of nations have deregulated open borders with other nations, an example of this being European countries under the Schengen Agreement or the open Belarus-Russia border.[209] Open borders used to be very common among all nations, however this became less common after the First World War, which led to the regulation of open borders, making them less common and no longer feasible for most industrialised nations.[210]

Open borders are the norm for borders between subdivisions within the boundaries of sovereign states, though some countries do maintain internal border controls (for example between the People's Republic of China mainland and the special administrative regions of Hong Kong and Macau, or between the United States and the unincorporated territories of Guam, the Northern Marianas and American Samoa, and the Minor Outlying Islands). Open borders are also usual between member states of federations, though (very rarely) movement between member states may be controlled in exceptional circumstances.[aa] Federations, confederations and similar multi-national unions typically maintain external border controls through a collective border control system, though they sometimes have open borders with other non-member states through special international agreements – such as between Schengen Agreement countries as mentioned above.

Presently, open border agreements of various types are in force in several areas around the world, as outlined below:

Asia and Oceania:
Under the 1950 Indo-Nepal Treaty of Peace and Friendship, India and Nepal maintain a similar arrangement to the CTA and the Union State. Indians and Nepalis are not subject to any migration controls in each other's countries and there are few controls on land travel by citizens across the border.
India and Bhutan also have a similar programme in place The border between Jaigaon, in the Indian state of West Bengal, and the city of Phuentsholing is essentially open, and although there are internal checkpoints, Indians (as outlined under the Visa policy of Bhutan are allowed to proceed throughout Bhutan with a voter's ID or an identity slip from the Indian consulate in Phuentsholing. Similarly, Bhutanese passport holders enjoy free movement in India.
Thailand and Cambodia: Whilst not as liberal as the policies concerning the Indo-Nepalese and Indo-Bhutanese borders, Thailand and Cambodia have begun issuing combined visas to certain categories of tourists applying at specific Thai or Cambodian embassies and consulates in order to enable freer border crossings between the two countries.[211] The policy is currently in force for nationals of America and several European (primarily EU, EEA, and GCC) and Oceanian countries as well as for Indian and Chinese nationals residing in Singapore.[212]
Australia and New Zealand: Similar to the agreement between India and Nepal, Trans-Tasman Travel Arrangement between Australia and New Zealand is a free movement agreement citizens of each country to travel freely between them and allowing citizens and some permanent residents to reside, visit, work, study in the other country for an indefinite period, with some restrictions.[213][214] The arrangement came into effect in 1973, and allows citizens of each country to reside and work in the other country, with some restrictions. Other details of the arrangement have varied over time. From 1 July 1981, all people entering Australia (including New Zealand citizens) have been required to carry a passport. Since 1 September 1994 Australia, has had a universal visa requirement, and to specifically cater for the continued free movement of New Zealanders to Australia, the Special Category Visa was introduced for New Zealanders.
Central America :The Central America-4 Border Control Agreement abolishes border controls for land travel between El Salvador, Honduras, Nicaragua, and Guatemala. However, this does not apply to air travel.
Europe and the Middle East
Union State of Russia and Belarus The Union State of Russia and Belarus is a supranational union of Russia and Belarus, which eliminates all border controls between the two nations. Before a visa agreement was signed in 2020, each country maintained its own visa policies, thus resulting in non-citizens of the two countries generally being barred from travelling directly between the two. However, since the visa agreement was signed, each side recognises the other's visas, which means that third-country citizens can enter both countries with a visa from either country.[215]
Western Europe: The two most significant free travel areas in Western Europe are the Schengen Area, in which very little if any border control is generally visible, and the Common Travel Area (CTA), which partially eliminates such controls for nationals of the United Kingdom and Ireland. Between countries in the Schengen Area, and to an extent within the CTA on the British Isles, internal border control is often virtually unnoticeable, and often only performed by means of random car or train searches in the hinterland, while controls at borders with non-member states may be rather strict.
Gulf Cooperation Council: Members of the Gulf Cooperation Council, or GCC, allow each other's citizens freedom of movement in an arrangement similar to the CTA and to that between India and Nepal. Between 5 June 2017 and 5 January 2021, freedom of movement in Saudi Arabia, the UAE, and Bahrain was suspended for Qataris as a result of the Saudi-led blockade of the country.

A New Zealand visa stamp issued under Trans-Tasman Travel Arrangement on an Australian travel document.

 

Visa policy of Bhutan, showing the free movement arrangement between India and Bhutan

 

Visa policy of Nepal, showing free movement between India and Nepal under the 1950 treaty

 

Irish border at Killeen (within CTA) marked only by a metric speed sign, as the Republic of Ireland uses the metric system whilst British road signs use imperial units

 

Sign often found at crossings from the Republic of Ireland into the North.

 

Open Schengen Area border crossing between Germany and the Netherlands

 

Open Schengen Area border crossing at the France-Monaco border (was open long before Schengen started)

 

Open Schengen Area border crossing at the Swiss-Lichtenstein border (was open long before Schengen started)

 

Open Schengen Area border crossing at the Slovenian-Italian border, with abandoned rain shelter.

 
Two road-signs on the side of an open stretch of a two-lane highway.
A typical Schengen internal border crossing has no border control post and only a common EU-state sign displaying the name of the country being entered, as here between Germany and Austria. The larger blue sign announces entry to the Federal Republic of Germany in German, the smaller white sign announces entry into the German state of Bavaria.

International zones
An international zone is a type of extraterritorial area not fully subject to any country's border control policies. The term most commonly refers to the areas of international airports after border exit controls or before border entry controls. These areas often contain duty-free shopping, but they are not fully extraterritorial. It is usually possible to transfer between flights without needing either the passport check or visa otherwise needed to enter the country. In areas of conflict there may be international zones called green zones that form protective enclaves to keep diplomats safe. Countries in conflict may also have international zones separating each other. Some of the international zones are subject to international law.

Airport transit areas
The international zone in an international airport is the area where arriving international passengers have not formally entered the country by clearing arrival customs and immigration controls, and departing passengers have formally exited the country by clearing exit immigration control. Transit passengers can usually take connecting international flights in the international zone without clearing customs and immigration controls, and in most cases do not require a visa.[216][217][218] Some countries, however, require transit passengers of certain nationalities to hold a direct airside transit visa[219] even when they would not need to pass through border controls. In addition, some countries, notably Canada, Russia and South Africa, perform document checks by border officers in the international transit corridor, for which a visa may (e.g. Canada) or may not (e.g. Russia) be required.

Two major exceptions are America and Canada, where airports typically have no international transit zones. All passengers arriving on international flights are subject to customs and immigration inspections. Nationals of countries other than America and Canada at an American airport requires at least a C-1 transit visa, or ESTA for eligible travellers. Meanwhile, transiting at a Canadian airport for nationals of countries other than Canada or America generally requires a visa or Electronic Travel Authorisation except for individuals proceeding to or from America who qualify for the China Transit Programme or Transit Without Visa Programme.

A common feature of the international zone is duty-free shopping for departing and transit passengers, and in some cases arriving passengers subject to duty-free allowances.

International zones in airports are fully under the jurisdiction of the country where they are located and local laws apply. Persons caught committing an unlawful act (e.g. possession of contraband such as illegal drugs) in the international zone are liable for prosecution.

Other examples
The United Nations' Headquarters are a series of complexes in New York City (United States), Geneva (Switzerland), Vienna (Austria), and Nairobi (Kenya)[220] that exist on international territories administered by the United Nations, while still subject to most local and national laws.[221]
The whole estuary of the Han River in the Korean Peninsula is deemed a "Neutral Zone" and is officially off-limits to all civilian vessels. Only military vessels are allowed within this neutral zone. According to the July 1953 Korean Armistice Agreement civil shipping was supposed to be permissible in the Han River estuary and allow Seoul to be connected to the Yellow Sea (West Sea) via the Han River.[222] However, both Koreas and the UNC failed to make this happen. The South Korean government ordered the construction of the Ara Canal to finally connect Seoul to the Yellow Sea, which was completed in 2012. Seoul was effectively landlocked from the ocean until 2012. The biggest limitation of the Ara Canal is it is too narrow to handle any vessels except small tourist boats and recreational boats, so Seoul still cannot receive large commercial ships or passenger ships in its port. In recent years Chinese fishing vessels have taken advantage of the tense situation in the Han River Estuary Neutral Zone and illegally fished in this area due to both North Korean and South Korean navies never patrolling this area due to the fear of naval battles breaking out. This has led to firefights and sinkings of boats between Chinese fishermen and South Korean Coast Guard.[223][224] On January 30, 2019, North Korean and South Korean military officials signed a landmark agreement that would open the Han River Estuary to civilian vessels for the first time since the Armistice Agreement in 1953. The agreement was scheduled to take place in April 2019 but the failure of the 2019 Hanoi Summit indefinitely postponed these plans.[225][226][227]
EuroAirport Basel Mulhouse Freiburg is an airport located in France 20 kilometres southeast of Mulhouse and 3.5 kilometres northwest of Basel (Switzerland), to which it is connected by a customs-free road that allows travellers to access the airport through Swiss and not French border control. The airport has been jointly operated by the two countries since a 1946 treaty. Geneva Airport in Switzerland has a similar French sector.[228][229]
Khmeimim Air Base in Syria is leased to the Russian government for a period of 49 years, with the Russian government having extraterritorial jurisdiction over the air base and its personnel.[230][231]
The Free City of Danzig was an international League of Nations protectorate that contained the Baltic Sea port of Danzig (now Gdańsk, Poland) and nearly 200 surrounding towns and villages that had a predominantly German population. It was created on 15 November 1920[232][233] in accordance with the 1919 Treaty of Versailles that ended World War I, which excluded the area from Weimar Germany and the new Second Polish Republic.[234] The Free City had a customs union with Poland.
The Tomb of Suleyman Shah, grandfather of the founder of the Ottoman Empire Osman I, has been located in northern Syria since the empire's collapse. The 1921 Treaty of Ankara between Turkey and France (which ruled Syria at the time) states that the tomb "shall remain, with its appurtenances, the property of Turkey, who may appoint guardians for it and may hoist the Turkish flag there".[235] The tomb was moved in 1973 as the site was to be flooded by the creation of Lake Assad, and in 2015 it was relocated unilaterally by Turkey in response to the Syrian Civil War. The Syrian government denounced the move as incompatible with the 1921 treaty; Turkey plans to move the tomb back to the second site.[236]
During the late Qing dynasty, portions of the Chinese coast were surrendered as Concessions to many Western powers and Japan. Each concession had its own legal regime which privileged the foreign power's citizens over the Chinese majority, and replaced Chinese cultural influences with those of the foreign power.
Central Baghdad has an international zone located in a crook of the Tigris River, housing foreign embassies, military headquarters and key Iraqi government institutions. The official name started as the Green Zone but was later changed to the "International Zone" in June 2004 with the restoration of Iraqi sovereignty.[237][238]
French, British, American and Soviet troops divided Vienna into four zones from 1945 to 1955. A small international zone of the historical city centre was governed in rotation by troops of those countries.
During the Cold War division of Berlin, the Friedrichstraße station was served by West Berlin S-Bahn and U-Bahn trains despite being located entirely in East Berlin. West Berliners could transfer between the S-Bahn, U-Bahn and long-distance trains to the West without passing through East German border control. The station featured an East German government-run Intershop, which sold duty-free and high-quality items at lower prices compared to the West. The station was also the site of a major border crossing where West Berliners and other travellers with appropriate papers could enter East Germany.
No country has sovereignty over international waters. All states have the freedom of fishing, navigation, overflight, laying cables and pipelines, as well as research. Oceans, seas, and waters outside national jurisdiction are also referred to as the high seas or, in Latin, mare liberum (meaning free sea). The 1958 Convention on the High Seas defined "high seas" to mean "all parts of the sea that are not included in the territorial sea or in the internal waters of a State" and where "no State may validly purport to subject any part of them to its sovereignty".[239] The convention was used as a foundation for the 1982 United Nations Convention on the Law of the Sea, which recognised Exclusive Economic Zones extending 370 kilometres from the baseline, where coastal States have sovereign rights to the water column and sea floor as well as to the natural resources found there.[240] Ships sailing the high seas are generally under the jurisdiction of the flag state (if there is one);[241] however, when a ship is involved in certain criminal acts, such as piracy,[242] any nation can exercise jurisdiction under the doctrine of universal jurisdiction. International waters can be contrasted with internal waters, territorial waters and exclusive economic zones.
The Antarctic Treaty System effectively makes the continent of Antarctica an international demilitarised zone de jure.
Under the 1947 United Nations Partition Plan for Palestine, the city of Jerusalem was supposed to become an international corpus separatum. This was never implemented; the city was the scene of fierce fighting in the 1948 war which culminated in its partition between West Jerusalem (Israel) and East Jerusalem (Jordan). In the 1967 war, East Jerusalem was captured and unilaterally annexed by Israel, in a move that has not been recognized by the international community. The idea of an international zone in Jerusalem, encompassing at least the highly sensitive Old City, continues to feature in many proposals to resolve the Israeli-Palestinian conflict.
Dejima was an island port near the Japanese city of Nagasaki that was ceded to Dutch administration between 1641 and 1854. During the Edo period, it was Japan's only point of interaction with the outside world. Border controls limited passage of foreign merchants from Dejima to Nagasaki and of Japanese from Nagasaki to Dejima.[243][244]
The United Kingdom and France established "international zones" or "control zones" at both ends of the Channel Tunnel, which crosses underneath the English Channel. British authorities exercise authority within the control zone on the French side, and French authorities exercise authority within the control zone on the UK side, under a system of juxtaposed controls. Violations in the control zone are treated as if they occurred within the territory of the adjoining state within that zone, and extradition is not required to remove a violator to the operating state for prosecution. Officers of the adjoining state may carry firearms within the control zone.[245]
The Free Territory of Trieste was an international zone around the Adriatic Sea port of Trieste, under direct responsibility of the United Nations Security Council. The area was established on 10 February 1947 by a protocol of the Treaty of Peace with Italy in order to accommodate an ethnically and culturally mixed population in a neutral environment free from the rule of either Italy or Yugoslavia, which made competing claims on the territory. The Free Territory was de facto given to its two neighbours in 1954 and this was formalised much later by the bilateral Treaty of Osimo of 1975, ratified in 1977.[246] During the late 1940s and in the years following the division of the Territory, up to 40,000 people[247] (mostly Italians) chose to leave the Yugoslav B zone and move to the A zone or Italy for various reasons: Some were intimidated into leaving, and some simply preferred not to live in Yugoslavia. In Yugoslavia, the people who left were called optanti ("choosing"), while they call themselves esuli ("exiles"). About 14,000 Italians chose to remain in the Yugoslav zone, currently divided between Slovenia and Croatia.
The Tangier International Zone was a 373 square kilometre protectorate controlled by several countries in the Moroccan city of Tangier and its environs between 1923 and 1956. Much like the Shanghai International Settlement, the government and administration of the zone was in the hands of a number of foreign powers.
The Green Line separating Southern Cyprus and Northern Cyprus is considered an International Zone because the United Nations operate and patrol within the buffer zone. The buffer zone was established in 1974 due to ethnic tensions between Greek and Turkish Cypriots. The green line is a demilitarised zone and thus acts in the same way as the 38th parallel separating the Republic of Korea and North Korea. The United Nations currently has its headquarters for the UNFICYP at the abandoned Nicosia International Airport, where the majority of peacekeepers are based and where talks between the two governments are held.

Flags of United Nations member states flying outside the United Nations Headquarters complex in New York City.

 

Nanjing Road (then romanised as Nanking Road) in Shanghai, within the Shanghai International Settlement, a concession administered by multiple foreign powers during the late Qing Dynasty.

 

The four sectors of occupation in Vienna between 1945 and 1955.

 

United Nations Partition Plan for Palestine, showing the city of Jerusalem as an international zone

 

Map of the Free Territory of Trieste, showing its two administrative zones, one of which was later absorbed by each of its two neighbours (Slovenia and Croatia were both part of Yugoslavia at the time).

Travel documents
See also: Travel document and Passport

Automated travel document inspection at Dubai Airport
Border control policies typically require travellers to present valid travel documents in order to ascertain their identity, nationality or permanent residence status, and eligibility to enter a given jurisdiction. The most common form of travel document is the passport, a booklet-form identity document issued by national authorities or the governments of certain subnational territories[ab] containing an individual's personal information as well as space for the authorities of other jurisdictions to affix stamps, visas, or other permits authorising the bearer to enter, reside, or travel within their territory. Certain jurisdictions permit individuals to clear border controls using identity cards, which typically contain similar personal information.

Different countries impose varying travel document regulations and requirements as part of their border control policies and these may vary based on the traveller's mode of transport. For instance, whilst America does not subject passengers departing by land or most boats to any border control, it does require that passengers departing by air hold a valid passport (or certain specific passport-replacing documents). Consequently, even though travellers departing America by air might not be required to have a passport to enter a certain country, they will be required to have a valid passport booklet to board their flight in order to satisfy American immigration authorities at departure.[248] Similarly, although several countries outside the European Economic Area accept national national identity cards issued by its member states for entry, Sweden and Finland do not permit their citizens to depart for countries outside the EEA using solely their identity cards.[249][250]

International Certificate of Vaccination
Main article: International Certificate of Vaccination or Prophylaxis

New cover of Carte Jaune issued by the Philippines since 2021
The International Certificate of Vaccination or Prophylaxis (ICVP), also known as the Carte Jaune, is an official vaccination report created by the World Health Organization (WHO).[251] As a travel document, it is a kind of medical passport that is recognised internationally and may be required for entry to certain countries where there are increased health risks for travellers (see section on biosecurity).[251]

Various schemes for health passports or vaccination certificates have been proposed for people who have been vaccinated against COVID-19. The IATA Travel Pass application for smartphone, introduced by the International Air Transport Association (IATA) in early 2021 is a mobile app designed to standardise the health verification process confirming whether aeroplane passengers have been vaccinated against, or tested negative for, COVID-19 prior to travel. The application is intended to eventually replace the Carte Jaune and to facilitate the verification of vaccination for Yellow Fever and other diseases prescribed by border control policies in various countries. Trials of the application are carried out by a number of airlines including Singapore Airlines, Emirates, Qatar Airways, Etihad and Air New Zealand.[252][253]

Due to the prevalence of counterfeit certificates in some places, several countries, including Zimbabwe, Zambia, and Nigeria, have been developing digital certificates to be used in conjunction with and to authenticate an ICVP.[254][255] As of July 2019, Nigeria requires its citizens to have its digital "e-Yellow Card" for travel outside the country. The card has a QR code that can be scanned to verify its validity. This requirement does not affect travellers from other countries with valid ICVPs, but those arriving in Nigeria who haven't been vaccinated for yellow fever may receive the vaccine and the e-Yellow Card upon arrival.[256][257][258]

Diplomatic and Official Passports


Left to right: diplomatic, official, and regular passport from India. Each passport type has a different cover colour.



Left to right: diplomatic, service, and public affairs passport from the People's Republic of China.
Pursuant to the Vienna Convention on Diplomatic Relations, Vienna Convention on Consular Relations, and the immunity afforded to officials of a foreign state under customary international law, diplomats and other individuals travelling on government business are entitled to reduced scrutiny at border checkpoints when travelling overseas. Consequently, such individuals are typically issued special passports indicating their status. These passports come in three distinct varieties:

Diplomatic Passports: Typically issued to accredited diplomats, senior consular staff, heads of state or government, and to senior foreign ministry employees. Individuals holding diplomatic passports are entitled to the greatest degree of immunity from border control inspections.
Official (or Service) Passports: Issued to senior government officials travelling on state business who are not eligible for diplomatic passports. Holders of official passports are typically entitled to similar immunity from border control inspections. In the United States, official and service passports are two distinct categories of passport, with official passports being issued to senior government officials while service passports are issued to government contractors.[ac]
Public affairs passports: Issued to Chinese nationals holding senior positions in state-owned companies. While public affairs passports do not usually entitle their bearers to exemption from searches at border checkpoints, they are subject to more liberal visa policies in several countries primarily in Africa and Asia (see: Visa requirements for Chinese citizens).
Laissez-passer
"Laissez-passer" redirects here. For other uses, see Laissez-passer (disambiguation).
A laissez-passer (French for "let pass") is a travel document issued by a national government or certain international organisations. A laissez-passer is often for one-way travel to the issuing country for humanitarian reasons only such as Restoring Family Links. Some national governments issue laissez-passers to their own nationals as emergency passports. Others issue them to people who are stateless, or who are unable to obtain a passport from their own government, or whose government is not recognised by the issuing country. During the COVID-19 pandemic, they were issued by French consulates to people who would otherwise be unable to enter the country due to travel restrictions, but were allowed to enter for a single trip on compassionate grounds.[262]

Historically, laissez-passers were commonly issued during wartime and at other periods, literally acting as a pass to allow travel to specific areas, or out of war zones or countries for various officials, diplomatic agents, other representatives or citizens of third countries. In these contexts, a laissez-passer would frequently include quite specific and limited freedom of movement. The form and issuing authority would be more or less standardized, depending on the circumstances. For example, during the early 1950s, the Iraqi government granted permission to its 120,000 Jewish citizens to leave (Operation Ezra and Nehemiah), conditional on their renouncing their citizenship and leaving behind all their properties and assets. The travel document that was issued was the laissez-passer, since an Iraqi passport was no longer possible.[263]

The most common laissez-passer is the United Nations laissez-passer issued by the United Nations under the provisions of Article VII of the 1946 Convention on the Privileges and Immunities of the United Nations[264] in its offices in New York and Geneva, as well as by the International Labour Organisation (ILO).[265] The UNLP is issued to UN and ILO staff as well as staff members of international organisations such as the WHO, the IAEA, the World Tourism Organisation, the Comprehensive Nuclear-Test-Ban Treaty Organisation Preparatory Commission, the Organisation for the Prohibition of Chemical Weapons (OPCW), the World Trade Organization, the International Monetary Fund, the International Organisation for Migration (IOM), the World Intellectual Property Organisation (WIPO) and the World Bank. The document is written in English and French, working languages of United Nations. The UNLP is a valid travel document, which can be used like a national passport (in connection with travel on official missions only). However, UNLP holders often encounter immigration officials who are unfamiliar with the document and require them to show a national passport in addition.[266] As with national passports, some countries/regions accept it for entry without the need for a visa (e.g., Turkmenistan,[267] Kenya, the United Kingdom, Schengen Area, Lebanon, etc.), while other countries may require a visa before it can be accepted for entry to the country (depending on the nationality of the UNLP holder).

Similarly, the European Union laissez-passer is issued to civil servants and members of the institutions of the European Union. It is proof of privileges and immunities the holders enjoy. The document is valid in all countries of the European Union as well as in over 100 other countries. In 2006, the European Commission issued or renewed 2,200 laissez-passer, and other agencies may issue the document as well.[268]

The Interpol Travel Document is a document similar to the United Nations and European Union laissez-passer and is issued to Interpol officers for travel to Interpol member countries. They are intended to reduce response times for personnel deployed to assist with transnational criminal investigations, major events or emergency situations by waiving normal visa requirements.[269] The travel documents consist of an e-Passport Booklet and an e-Identification Card identifying the holder as an Interpol officer, granting them special immigration status when travelling on official Interpol duties to participating member countries.[270]


The front cover of a blue machine-readable United Nations laissez-passer.

 

The front of the card-form Interpol Travel Document

Identity cards


Argentinian National ID card valid for travel to other Mercosur countries in lieu of a passport
Certain jurisdictions permit (or in China's case require) the use of identity cards to clear border controls. For instance, when travelling between India and Nepal or Bhutan, Indian citizens may utilise national voter ID cards, ration cards, or national identity cards. Indian citizens may also obtain identity slips at the Indian consulate in Phuentsholing if they intend to proceed beyond city limits as Phuentsholing, the financial capital of Bhutan, is de facto within India's visa and customs area. When travelling to India, citizens of Nepal and Bhutan can utilise similar documents. Children may use birth certificates as proof of identity. Similarly, many Mercosur countries reciprocally permit travel using identity cards.

In western Europe, travel using identity cards is relatively common for citizens of the European Economic Area and adjacent territories. This includes travel to and from Turkey for certain citizens of other countries in western Europe. Within the Schengen Area, there are limited border controls in place and national identity cards may be used to clear them. Since August 2021, identity cards within the European Economic Area have been standardised under EU Regulation 2019/1157.[271] The new standard is intended to replace and harmonise the various identity card models currently in use across the European Union (EU) and the European Economic Area (EEA).[ad]

In North America, American citizens may travel to Canada or certain islands in the Caribbean using the passport card while children holding Canadian or American citizenship may travel between America and Canada using birth certificates under certain circumstances. An Enhanced Driving Licence is an identity card issued by provincial and state authorities in Canada and America that, in addition to serving as a valid driving licence, enables its bearer to clear land border controls between the two countries. It is not valid for air travel and does not permit its holder to clear border controls at airports. It also serves as a valid driving licence. Certain provinces and states may issue similar enhanced versions of regional identity cards issued to individuals who do not drive. Similarly, a Border Crossing Card (BCC) is an identity document issued by the American government to nationals of Mexico. As a standalone document, the BCC allows its holder to visit the border areas of the United States when entering by land or sea directly from Mexico for up to 30 days[273][274] and, when presented with a valid Mexican passport, functions as a B1/B2 visa for entry to any part of the United States by any means of transportation.[275][276] Additionally, Mexico permits the use of identity cards issued by Mexican consulates overseas[277], voter ID cards, and CURP cards by Mexican citizens entering the country, which has the effect of enabling individuals who use the BCC or a US Permanent Resident Card as a standalone travel document when travelling to re-enter Mexico.

Travel documents for permanent residents
Further information: Permanent residency

The US re-entry permit is a travel document for permanent residents issued on request.

U.S. Green Card issued to all permanent residents.

A booklet-form Japan re-entry permit issued to special permanent residents of Japan

A sticker/stamp form Japanese Re-entry Permit issued to ordinary permanent residents
Some countries issue travel documents to permanent residents (i.e. foreign citizens permitted to reside there indefinitely) or other non-citizens, usually for re-entry but also occasionally valid for international travel.

The American Re-Entry Permit is an example of such a document. Valid for international travel, it is issued to lawful permanent residents temporarily expatriating overseas. Unlike the "Green Card" issued to all permanent residents, this document is not mandatory. The American "Green Card", on its own or in conjunction with a passport, is valid for international travel albeit not to the same extent as the re-entry permit. Both documents can be utilised to clear American border controls regardless of the bearer's nationality, thus resulting in America not requiring permanent residents to hold a passport from their home country in order to remain lawfully present or to lawfully enter.[ae]

Singapore issues national identity cards to permanent residents in the same manner as it does to citizens, but additionally requires any permanent resident travelling abroad to hold a valid electronic re-entry permit and a passport or other travel document from their home country. Similarly, Hong Kong and Macau issue permanent resident cards to all permanent residents including those without Chinese citizenship.

While Canada does not issue a mandatory national identity card to its citizens, it issues the Canada permanent resident card, which serves as a valid travel document for Canadian permanent residents to clear border controls in the country. Additionally, Canada requires any Canadian Permanent Residents entering the country by air to use their Permanent Resident Card or a special document authorising their return.[278] No such requirement is imposed on a permanent resident entering by land or sea. Canadian citizens are prohibited from using a foreign passport to enter the country.[279]

Japan issues a re-entry permit for individuals holding permanent resident status. This document is issued in one of two formats depending on the nationality status of the holder. For ordinary permanent residents holding a passport from their country of citizenship, it is issued as a stamp or sticker affixed to a page on its holder's passport. For members of the Chōsen-seki community and descendants of Taiwanese immigrants whose ancestors moved to Japan when Korea and Taiwan were Japanese colonies, who are classified as special permanent residents, a booklet-form Japan re-entry Permit is issued for international travel. While special permanent residents are treated by Japanese authorities as similar to Japanese citizens in most regards, including access to consular assistance, they are unable to participate in elections or exercise other rights reserved specifically for Japanese citizens. Nevertheless, they enjoy greater legal rights than ordinary permanent residents. For example, special permanent residents are not subject to immigration control under Article 5 of the Immigration Control Act 1951. During the coronavirus pandemic of 2020, special permanent residents were allowed the right of return, while other permanent residents were denied permission to enter Japan.[280][281]

Seafarers' identity documents
Main articles: Seafarers' Identity Documents Convention (Revised), 2003 and Seafarers' Identity Documents Convention, 1958

Comparison between a passport and a seafarers' identity document.

Data page of a seafarers' identity document.
A seafarers' identity document (also known as a seaman's identity document or merchant mariner credential) is a travel document issued to individuals authorised to serve as crew members aboard vessels engaged in international voyages. Like an ordinary passport, it contains its holder's personal information and is generally issued by the same authorities. Additionally, it contains information as to its bearer's qualifications to serve on a ship's crew. In certain jurisdictions, of seafarers' identity documents are entitled to simplified visa requirements when travelling on duty. For instance, mainland China maintains a simplified visa regime for holders of certain countries' seafarers' identity documents travelling on duty.

Indigenous nations
Indigenous passports
Various Indigenous nations in the Americas, as well as the Aboriginal Provisional Government in Australia, issue passports to their citizens as an assertion of sovereignty symbolically rejecting the legitimacy of settler authorities. Notable examples include the Haudenosaunee passport issued by the Six Nations of the Haudenosaunee confederacy, the Aboriginal passport in Australia, and various Indigenous passports in Latin America such as the Kichwa passport in Ecuador.[282] Indigenous passports are typically not recognised as valid travel documents for border control purposes. In particular, the Iroquois Nationals lacrosse team has been involved in high-profile disputes over their refusal to travel on Canadian or American passports to international lacrosse competitions, being prevented from attending the 2010 World Lacrosse Championship in the United Kingdom[283] but being permitted to attend the tournament in 2018 in Israel subject to guarantees from the Canadian and American governments that the players would be permitted to return home.[284][285]

Certificate of Indigenous Status
While Indigenous passports are generally not recognised by border control authorities, the Certificate of Indigenous Status issued by the Canadian government to individuals on the Indian Register is accepted by American and Canadian border control authorities for travel by land or sea.[286][287] In 2018, the Canadian government introduced a Secure Certificate of Indigenous Status that serves as a machine readable travel document to enable Indigenous individuals to cross the border more efficiently.[288] In order to address the desire of members of Indigenous nations not to be labelled as Canadian citizens, the Secure Certificate of Indigenous Status does not state the individual's nationality[289] The Canadian government issues Certificates of Indigenous Status to registered Indigenous individuals regardless of whether or not they are Canadian citizens or hold Canadian permanent residence[286] but, although America permits Canadian citizens exercising Jay Treaty freedom of movement rights to enter using the document,[276] Indigenous individuals holding American citizenship are instead required to use tribal identity cards[290] or other American-issued WHTI-compliant documents.

Enhanced Tribal Identity Cards
Under the Western Hemisphere Travel Initiative, Indigenous people holding American citizenship may clear land and sea border controls using machine readable enhanced tribal identity cards, which contain similar features to enhanced driving licences issued by certain states and provinces.[290] Unlike the Ceritafice of Indigenous Status, the document is only issued to American citizens.[290] The document is treated by Canadian and American border controls as equivalent to an enhanced driving licence[291] and may additionally be accepted by Mexican border control for entry up to 20–30 km from the border subject to prevailing permit requirements.[292][293].

Kikapoo I-872 Native American Card
Mexican citizens enrolled in the Texas Band of Kickapoo Indians or Kickapoo Tribe of Oklahoma may enter America by land or sea using the Form I-872 American Indian Card, which provides for freedom of movement across the border for the Kickapoo first nation regardless of citizenship.[276][290][af]

American Samoans
While the Indigenous peoples of Hawaii, the American mainland, and most American territories have been granted full American citizenship and the accompanying right to apply for a passport on the same basis as any other American, the native population of American Samoa have not. As specified in 8 U.S.C. § 1408, a person whose only connection to the America is through birth in an outlying possession (which is defined in 8 U.S.C. § 1101 as American Samoa and Swains Island (which is administered as part of American Samoa)), or through descent from a person so born, acquires American nationality but not citizenship. This was formerly the case in only four other current or former American territories.[294] The origin of this distinction in status is the United States Supreme Court’s jurisprudence in the Insular Cases, in which the court held that the Indigenous inhabitants of newly acquired territories did not automatically acquire full American citizenship. Consequently, American Samoans are issued passports containing endorsement code 9 which states: "THE BEARER IS A UNITED STATES NATIONAL AND NOT A UNITED STATES CITIZEN." on the annotations page.[295] Non-citizen American nationals may reside and work in the United States without restrictions, but must apply for citizenship under the same rules as resident aliens. Like resident aliens, they are not presently allowed by any American state to vote in federal or state elections, although, as with resident aliens, there is no constitutional prohibition against their doing so.

Special travel documents
While the majority of international travellers clear border controls using passports or national identity cards, a wide variety of travel documents are utilised by individuals in irregular situations, ranging from de jure or de facto stateless individuals to individuals affected by international border disputes, the aftermath of the fall of states such as Yugoslavia or the USSR, or other legal complexities. Such travel documents are typically subject to greater scrutiny by border control authorities, with countries such as Singapore imposing strict controls on stateless individuals and refugees regardless of the issuing country of their travel documents.

Certificate of identity
Main articles: Certificate of Identity, Refugee travel document, and 1954 Convention travel document

A 1954 Convention travel document issued in Germany in 2008

Canadian Refugee Travel Document

A certificate of identity is a travel document issued by a country to non-citizens (also called aliens) residing within their borders who are stateless persons or otherwise unable to obtain a passport from their state of nationality (generally refugees). Some states also issue certificates of identity to their own citizens as a form of emergency passport or otherwise in lieu of a passport. The visa requirements of certificates of identity may be different from those of regular passports. There are three types of certificate of identity: 1954 Convention travel documents, 1951 Convention travel documents, and non-convention travel documents.

A 1954 Convention travel document is a certificate of identity issued to a (typically, but not always, stateless) person in circumstances of any difficulties in gaining a travel document from their country of origin.[296]

Similarly, a 1951 Convention travel document (or refugee travel document) is a certificate of identity issued to a refugee by the state in which they normally reside in allowing them to travel outside that state and to return there. Refugees are unlikely to be able to obtain passports from their state of nationality (from which they have sought asylum) and therefore need travel documents so that they might engage in international travel. The 145 states which are parties to the 1951 Convention Relating to the Status of Refugees are obliged to issue travel documents to refugees lawfully resident in their territory.[297] Refugee travel documents are passport-like booklets. Their cover bears the words "Travel Document" in English and French (and often in the language of the issuing state), as well as the date of the convention: 28 July 1951. The documents were originally grey, though some countries now issue them in other colours, with two diagonal lines in the upper left corner of the front cover.

Non-Convention (or non-National) travel documents are certificates of identity issued by a country to non-citizen (also called alien) residents who do not have access to passport facilities from their own countries, are not recognised as either Convention refugees, and are not officially stateless under the 1954 Convention relating to the status of stateless persons (or the country they live in has not signed that convention). These are issued in many jurisdictions across the globe in which significant numbers of residents are stateless. For instance, Singapore permanent residents who are stateless are issued booklet-form Certificates of Identity in lieu of a passport while Indonesia issues the Paspor Orang Asing to its stateless permanent residents. The issue Hong Kong Document of Identity for Visa Purposes and Macau Travel Permit, serve a similar function in China's special administrative regions and are issued to stateless permanent residents and to Chinese citizens temporarily residing in the region who hold neither permanent residence of Hong Kong or Macau nor residence status in the mainland and are thereby ineligible for any category of Chinese passport.

The Indian government issues non-convention certificates of identity to members of the large Tibetan exile community and to other stateless residents of India. Certificates of identity are routinely issued upon request of the Dalai Lama's Tibetan government in exile based in Dharamsala. This document is accepted by most countries border control policies in lieu of a passport, although it is not a machine readable document. Tibetans travelling to areas administered by the Republic of China or People's Republic of China may be required to use a ROC passport without right of abode or a Chinese Travel Document instead. When issued to a Tibetan residing in India, a certificate of identity is invariably endorsed as being valid for return to India and therefore exempts the holder from requiring a visa to clear Indian border controls upon re-entry.

Similarly, non-citizens in Latvia and in Estonia are individuals, primarily of Russian or Ukrainian ethnicity, who are not citizens of Latvia or Estonia but whose families have resided in the area since the Soviet era, and thus have the right to a special non-citizen passport issued by the government as well as some other specific rights. Approximately two thirds of them are ethnic Russians, followed by ethnic Belarussians, ethnic Ukrainians, ethnic Poles and ethnic Lithuanians.[298][299] This form of legal discrimination has been labelled as xenophobic by the UN Special Rapporteur.[300] Per Russian visa policy, holders of the Estonian alien's passport or the Latvian non-citizen passport are entitled to visa free entry to Russia, in contrast to Estonian and Latvian citizens who must obtain an electronic visa.

Between 2000[301] and 2008, the United Nations Interim Administration Mission in Kosovo (UNMIK)[302] issued the UNMIK Travel Document, a non-convention travel document, to residents of Kosovo[ag] who were not able to obtain a passport from Yugoslavia, for the purpose of foreign travel.[303] After the government of Kosovo started to issue their own passports, the UNMIK ceased issuing them. Existing UNMIC travel documents retained their validity until expiry (the last ones expired in 2010). In light of the disputed nationality status of residents of Kosovo, the UNMIK travel document did not contain information on nationality. The document was labelled UNMIK travel document/titre de voyage on the cover, contained 32 pages, and was valid for 2 years. It contained a machine readable strip. As the issuing authority was the UNMIK, the document had the official[304] three-letter code "UNK" where normally the country code is placed. It was the only other travel document issued by the United Nations besides the United Nations Laissez-Passer, which is mainly issued to employees of the UN and its specialised agencies. As the status of Kosovo was and remains controversial, the document was not widely accepted[305] and, although America did accept the UNMIK Travel Document, it did not place visa stickers in the document itself, but on a detached sheet.[306]

Chinese Travel Document

Chinese Travel Document
The Chinese Government requires certain people to enter the mainland using a Chinese Travel Document (Chinese: 中国旅行证; pinyin: Zhōnghuá Rénmín Gònghéguó Lǚ​xíng Zhèng). Some cases include:

When it is "inconvenient", "unnecessary", or not permitted to issue a People's Republic of China passport to Chinese nationals.[307]
Chinese nationals residing in Mainland China who lost their passport while travelling abroad may apply for this document as an emergency passport for returning to China.
Chinese nationals who are permanent residents of Hong Kong and Macau intending to enter Mainland China directly from other countries without a Home Return Permit.
Residents of the areas administered by the Republic of China[l] intending to enter Mainland China or Hong Kong directly from other countries, who are Chinese nationals according to Chinese law. Travelling to Hong Kong, however, requires a separate application for a visa-like entry permit.
Chinese nationals born abroad who acquired Chinese nationality at birth in accordance with the Nationality Law of the People's Republic of China through jus sanguinis. The Chinese Travel Document is issued as a Chinese identification and travel document.
Chinese nationals born in China who do not have a Hukou in China and who have exited China using an exit permit. This could include a person who holds a non-Chinese passport.
The Chinese Travel Document may also be issued to citizens of the Republic of China for travel to countries that do not accept the Republic of China passport or in order to visit United nation's offices.

Israeli Travel Document in lieu of a National Passport
A Travel Document in Lieu of National Passport (Hebrew: תעודת מעבר במקום דרכון לאומי‎ Teudat Ma'avar bimkom Darkon Leumi)[308] may be issued to an Israeli citizen in a number of circumstances:[309]

A new immigrant to Israel acquires Israeli nationality immediately when issued with an certificate of immigration (תעודת עולה teudat oleh) upon arrival in the country, but this nationality may be waived with retroactive effect to the moment the certificate of immigration was issued if such an application is filed with the ministry of the interior within 90 days following the issuance of the certificate of immigration. During these 90 days, a new immigrant cannot apply for an Israeli passport or travel document unless they file a waiver of the right to waive the automatic acquisition of Israeli nationality. Prior to 2017, a new immigrant could not be issued with an Israeli passport until they had resided in Israel for a period of at least 270 days following the issuance of their certificate of immigration. In 2017, this restriction was lifted when the passport act was modified by the Knesset.[310][311]
Israeli citizens with criminal record.
Israeli citizens who have lost or destroyed over three passports.
Israeli citizens who have lost their passport during an overseas trip.
Israeli citizens who are returning to Israel by decision of the Israeli government.
They are normally valid for two years, and not for more than five years. The issuance of travel documents instead of passports became prevalent in the 1990s as the Israeli government reacted to a wave of Russian organised crime gangs who immigrated to Israel and began using Israeli passports for their activities.[312] Individuals holding such travel documents may face greater scrutiny by border control officers overseas as well as ineligibility for visa free entry to certain jurisdictions.


Israeli travel document front cover

 

The first page within the Israeli travel document

Passports without right of abode
Main articles: National without household registration and British nationality law

Map illustrating extra border controls placed on ROC nationals without household registration (NWOHRs). Passports issued to NWOHRs do not contain national identity card numbers and many foreign jurisdictions (as illustrated in the map) thus distinguish between ROC passports based on the presence or absence of a national ID number.

Sample ROC passport issued to NWOHRs. Note the absence of a national ID number.
Unlike most countries, the United Kingdom and the Republic of China issue various categories of passports to individuals without the right of abode in their territory. In the United Kingdom's case, these passports are typically issued to individuals connected with a former British colony while, in the ROC's case, these passports are the result of the legal distinction between ROC nationals with and without residence in the area it administers. [l] In both cases, holders of such passports are able to obtain residence on an equal footing with foreigners by applying for indefinite leave to remain (UK) or a resident certificate (ROC).

A Republic of China citizen who does not have household registration (Chinese: 戶籍; pinyin: hùjí) in the area administered by the ROC [l] is classified as a National Without Household Registration (NWOHR; Chinese: 無戶籍國民) and is subject to immigration controls when clearing ROC border controls, does not have automatic residence rights, and cannot vote in Taiwanese elections. However, they are exempt from conscription. Most individuals with this status are children born overseas to ROC citizens who do hold household registration. Additionally, because the ROC observes the principle of jus sanguinis, members of the overseas Chinese community are also regarded as citizens.[313] During the Cold War, both the ROC and PRC governments actively sought the support of overseas Chinese communities in their attempts to secure the position as the legitimate sole government of China. The ROC also encouraged overseas Chinese businessmen to settle in Taiwan to facilitate economic development and regulations concerning evidence of ROC nationality by descent were particularly lax during the period, allowing many overseas Chinese the right to settle in Taiwan.[314] About 60,000 NWOHRs currently hold Taiwanese passports with this status.[315]

The United Kingdom issues several distinct categories of passports that do not grant bearers right of abode. British National (Overseas) passports are issued to individuals connected to Hong Kong prior to its return to China, British Overseas Citizen passports are primarily issued to individuals who did not acquire the citizenship of the colony they were connected to when it obtained independence (or their stateless descendants), British Protected Person passports are issued to otherwise stateless people connected to a former British protectorate, and British subject passports are issued to otherwise stateless individuals connected to British India or to certain categories of Irish citizens (though, in the latter case, they do convey right of abode). British Overseas Citizen passports are also issued to certain categories of Malaysian nationals of Chinese origin and individuals connected to Cyprus as a result of the legislation granting independence to those former British colonies.

Border control policies in many jurisdictions distinguish between holders of passports with and without right of abode, including NWOHRs and holders of the various British passports the do not confer right of abode upon the bearer. Certain jurisdictions may additionally distinguish between holders of such British passports with and without indefinite leave to remain in the United Kingdom. NWOHRs do not, for instance, have access to the Visa Waiver Program, or to visa free access to the Schengen Area or Japan. Other countries, such as India which allows all Chinese nationals to apply for eVisas, don't make such a distinction. Notably, while Singapore does permit visa free entry to all categories of British passport holders, it reduces length of stay for British nationals without right of abode in the United Kingdom, but does not distinguish between ROC passport holders with and without household registration.

Until 31 January 2021, holders of British National (Overseas) passports were able to use their UK passports for immigration clearance in Hong Kong[316] and to seek consular protection from overseas Chinese diplomatic missions. This was a unique arrangement as it involved a passport issued by one state confereing right of abode (or, more precisely right to land) in and consular protection from another state. Since that date, the Chinese and Hong Kong governments have prohibited the use of BN(O) passports as travel documents or proof of identity and it; much like British Overseas Citizen, British Protected Person, or ROC NWOHR passports; is not associated with right of abode in any territory. BN(O)s who do not possess Chinese (or any other) nationality are required to use a Document of Identity for Visa Purposes for travel.[316] This restriction disproportionally affects ease of travel for permanent residents of Indian, Pakistani, and Nepali ethnicity,[317] who were not granted Chinese nationality in 1997. As an additional consequence, Hongkongers seeking early pre-retirement withdrawals from the Mandatory Provident Fund pension scheme may not use BN(O) passports for identity verification.[318]

Additionally, individuals connected to a British overseas territory are accorded British Overseas Territories citizenship, which in and of itself confers right of abode in no country or territory. Each territory maintains its own criteria for determining whom it grants right of abode. Consequently, individuals holding BOTC passports are not necessarily entitled to enter or reside in the territory that issued their passport. Most countries distinguish between BOTC and other classes of British nationality for border control purposes. For instance, only Bermudian passport holders with an endorsement stating that they possess right of abode or belonger status in Bermuda are entitled to enter America without an electronic travel authorisation.[319]

Serbian Coordination Directorate Passports in Kosovo
Main articles: Serbian Coordination Directorate and Serbian passport § Kosovo Residents
Under Serbian law, people born or otherwise legally settled in Kosovo[ag] are considered Serbian nationals and as such they are entitled to a Serbian passport.[320] However, these passports are not issued by the Serbian Ministry of the Interior. Instead they are issued by the Serbian Coordination Directorate.[321] These particular passports do not allow the holder to enter the Schengen Area without a visa.[322]

Visas


Tourist visas issued by India (left) and Singapore (right) in a stateless person's travel document.

Brazilian multiple entry visa in an American passport

Tourist entry visa for mainland China

Sample of printed out eNTRI slip for Indian and mainland Chinese citizens to clear Malaysian border controls without a visa.

Facilitated Rail Transit Document issued in Saint Petersburg for travel to Kaliningrad

Thai visa issued on arrival in stamp form
A visa is a travel document issued to foreign nationals enabling them to clear border controls. They traditionally take the form of an adhesive sticker or, occasionally, a stamp affixed to a page in an individual’s passport or equivalent document. Visas policies different purposes depending on the priorities of each jurisdiction, ranging from ensuring that visitors do not pose a national security risk or have sufficient financial resources to simply functioning as a tax on tourists, as is the case with countries like Mauritius and other leisure destinations which issue visas on arrival, electronic visas, or electronic travel authorisations to most or all visitors. Visas may include limits on the duration of the foreigner's stay, areas within the state they may enter, the dates they may enter, the number of permitted visits, or an individual's right to work in the state in question.

Many countries in Asia have liberalised their visa controls in recent years to encourage transnational business and tourism. For example, India, Myanmar, and Sri Lanka have introduced electronic visas to make border control less arduous for business travellers and tourists. Malaysia has introduced similar eVisa facilities, and has also introduced the eNTRI programme to expedite clearance for Indian citizens and Chinese citizens from the mainland. Thailand regularly issues visas on arrival to many non-exempt visitors at major ports of entry in order to encourage tourism. Indonesia, in recent years, has progressively liberalised its visa regime, no longer requiring visas or on-arrival visas from most nationals, while Singapore has signed visa waiver agreements with many countries in recent years and has introduced electronic visa facilities for Indians, Eastern Europeans, and mainland Chinese. This trend towards visa liberalisation in Asia is part of the regional trend toward social and economic globalisation that has been linked to heightened economic growth.[323]

Certain countries, predominantly but not exclusively in western Europe and the Americas, issue working holiday visas for younger visitors to supplement their travel funds by working minor jobs. These are especially common in members of the European Union, and elsewhere in Europe.

Saudi Arabia issues a special category visa for people on religious pilgrimage. Similar policies are in force in other countries with significant religious sites.

Certain jurisdictions impose special visa requirements on journalists in order to curtail the freedom of foreign reporters and news organisations to report on controversial topics. Countries that impose such visas include Cuba, China, North Korea, Saudi Arabia, America and Zimbabwe.

As a consequence of awkward border situations created by the fall of the Soviet Union, certain former members of the USSR and their neighbours maintain special visa exemption policies for travellers transiting across international boundaries between two points in a single country. For instance, Russia permits vehicles to transit across the Saatse Boot between the Estonian villages of Lutepää and Sesniki without any visa or border checkpoint provided that they do not stop. Similar provisions are made for the issuance of Facilitated Rail Transit Documents by Schengen Area members for travel between Kaliningrad Oblast and the Russian mainland, enabling Russian citizens to travel to and from the exclave without a passport or visa.

Many countries let individuals clear border controls using foreign visas.[ah] Notably, the Philippines permits nationals of India and China can use any of several foreign visas to clear border controls.[ai] In order to encourage tourism by transit passengers, South Korea permits passengers in transit who would otherwise require a South Korean visa to enter for up to thirty days utilising an Australian, Canadian, American, or Schengen visa. Uniquely, the British territory of Bermuda has ceased to issue its own visas and instead requires that travellers either clear immigration visa-free in one of the three countries (Canada, America, and United Kingdom) to/from which it has direct flights, or hold a visa for one of them.

Beginning in the 2000s, many countries introduced e-visas and electronic travel authorisations as an alternative to traditional visas. An electronic travel authorisation is a kind of pre-arrival registration, which may or may not officially classified as a visa depending on the issuing jurisdiction, required for foreign travellers who are exempted from obtaining a full visa. In contrast to the procedures that typically apply in regard to proper visas, per which the traveller normally has no recourse if rejected, if an ETA is rejected the traveller can choose to apply for a visa instead. In contrast, an e-visa is simply a visa that travellers can apply for and receive online without visiting the issuing state's consular mission or visa agency. The following jurisdictions require certain categories of international travellers to hold an electronic travel authorisation or e-visa in order to clear border controls upon arrival:

Australia: Australia administers two distinct categories of electronic visitor authorisations. The Electronic Travel Authority scheme is available to citizens of a variety of North America and Asian countries while the eVisitor scheme provides a similar facility for nationals of the European Union and the European Economic Area.
Electronic Travel Authority: Development of the Electronic Travel Authority system commenced in January 1996. It was first implemented in Singapore on a trial basis on 11 September 1996, for holders of Singapore and US passports travelling on Qantas and Singapore Airlines. Implementation of online applications began in June 2001.[329][330] The current ETA came into effect on 23 March 2013 replacing older ETAs (subclass 976, 977 and 956) while offering a single authorisation for both tourist and business purposes.[331] The ETA allows the holder to visit Australia for unlimited times, up to 3 months per visit, in a 12-month period for tourism or business purposes. There is no visa application charge but a service charge of AU$20 applies for applications lodged online. At the time of travel to, and entry into, Australia, all holders of an ETA must be free from tuberculosis and must not have any criminal convictions for which the sentence or sentences (whether served or not) total 12 months or more.[332] The ETA is currently available to passport holders of a handful of jurisdictions in Asia and North America.[aj]
eVistor programme: The eVisitor scheme was established to create a reciprocal short stay travel arrangement for nationals of Australia and the European Union, while still maintaining Australia's universal visa system. In essence, while nationals of the European Union and European Economic Area are still theoretically issued visas, the burden posed by the system is so minimal as to satisfy the EU's requirement for visa reciprocity on the part of states whose nationals are accorded visa free access to the Schengen Area.[334][335] The eVisitor is available to citizens of all 27 European Union member states and 9 other countries. The eVisitor is issued free of charge and allows the holder to visit Australia for unlimited times, up to 3 months per visit, in a 12-month period for tourism or business purposes. At the time of travel to, and entry into, Australia, all holders of an eVisitor must be free from tuberculosis and must not have any criminal convictions for which the sentence or sentences (whether served or not) total 12 months or more.[334] Holders of most jurisdictions[ak] in Western Europe are eligible to enter Australia under the eVisitor programme.
East African Community: From February 2014, Kenya, Rwanda and Uganda issue an East African Tourist Visa.[337] The visa costs 100 USD and has no restrictions on nationality. It is a non-extendable multiple-entry 90-day visa that has to be first used to enter the country that issued it.[338][
Hong Kong: Indian nationals and Chinese nationals from areas administered by the Republic of China[l] do not require a visa to enter Hong Kong, but must apply for a pre-arrival registration (PAR) prior to arrival. If not successful, Indian travellers may apply for a visa instead. Taiwanese people are eligible only if they were born in Taiwan or entered Hong Kong as an ROC nationals before, otherwise they should instead apply for an entry permit (a de facto visa) to enter Hong Kong using their Republic of China passport. They may alternatively enter Hong Kong using a Mainland Travel Permit for Taiwan Residents issued by Mainland Chinese authorities without any additional permit.
India: India permits nationals of most jurisdictions[al] to clear border controls using an e-visa. Travellers holding an e-Visa must arrive via 26 designated airports[am] or 3 designated seaports.[an] As of September 2021, India has suspended the issuance of e-visas to British and Canadian citizens in retaliation for what the Indian government deems discriminatory application of COVID-19 restrictions targeted at Indian nationals.[340]
Kenya: From 1 January 2021, Kenya solely issues e-visas and physical visas are no longer available.[341]
New Zealand: New Zealand has required that visa waiver travellers (other than citizens of Australia, members of a visiting force, or individuals associated with a scientific programme or expedition in Antarctica sponsored by a party to the Antarctic Treaty) obtain an Electronic Travel Authority (NZeTA) since 1 October 2019.[342]
North America: East of the Pacific, both America and Canada have introduced electronic travel authorisations. Travellers from visa-free countries entering Canada by air, except American nationals (including those with and without full citizenship), must obtain an Electronic Travel Authorisation prior to arrival but not if arriving by land or sea. Travellers under the Visa Waiver Programme are required to obtain permission through the Electronic System for Travel Authorisation if arriving in America by air or cruise but not if entering by land or by ferry, using a passport issued by the Government of Bermuda to a British Overseas Territories Citizen, or if entering as a Canadian citizen. Travellers from Brazil normally require a visa to enter Canada, but are eligible to apply for an ETA if they have held a Canadian visa within the 10 years prior to applying, or if they currently hold a valid non-immigrant American visa. Such travellers still may not enter Canada by land or sea without a valid Canadian visa.
Pakistan: Visitors from several jurisdictions may enter Pakistan for tourism without obtaining a visa in advance provided they hold an Electronic Travel Authorisation.[ao]
Sri Lanka: Travellers to Sri Lanka must obtain an Electronic Travel Authorisation prior to getting a visa on arrival at the entry port, except for a few countries where the ETA is exempted, and for a few countries where a visa must be got in advance. Citizens of India, Pakistan, and other countries in the northwestern part of Asia receive discounted ETAs.[344]
Qatar: From 27 September 2017, citizens of all nationalities who hold valid residence permits or visas from either Australia, Canada, New Zealand, the Schengen countries, the United Kingdom, the United States of America or the countries of the Gulf Cooperation Council can obtain an Electronic Travel Authorisation for up to 30 days. The visa may be extended online for 30 additional days.[345] Qatar introduced an e-Visa system on 23 June 2017. All countries except  Egypt,  Israel,  Kosovo and  Palestine that do not qualify for visa on arrival or visa free entry may apply for a tourist visa online through the eVisa system.[346] Visas are issued within four working days if all documents are submitted and are valid for a stay period up to 30 days in Qatar.[347]
United Kingdom: Citizens of Kuwait, Oman, Qatar, and the UAE can obtain an Electronic Visa Waiver, or EVW, online to enter the United Kingdom.[ap][348]
Specific requirements

American and Canadian border officers at Vancouver airport
The degree of strictness of border controls varies across countries and borders. In some countries, controls may be targeted at the traveller's religion, ethnicity, nationality, or other countries that have been visited. Others may need to be certain the traveller has paid the appropriate fees for their visas and has future travel planned out of the country. Yet others may concentrate on the contents of the traveller's baggage, and imported goods to ensure nothing is being carried that might bring a biosecurity risk into the country.

Biometrics
See also: Countries applying biometrics

A fingerprint scanner at Dulles International Airport collects biometric data on visitors, which can be used for confirming identities.
Several countries mandate that all travellers, or all foreign travellers, be fingerprinted on arrival and will refuse admission to or even arrest travellers who refuse to comply. In some countries, such as America, this may apply even to transit passengers who merely wish to quickly change planes rather than go landside.[349]

Fingerprinting countries include Afghanistan,[350][351] Argentina,[352] Brunei, Cambodia,[353] China,[354] Ethiopia,[355] Ghana, Guinea,[356] India, Japan,[357][358] Kenya (both fingerprints and a photo are taken),[359] Malaysia upon entry and departure,[360] Paraguay, Saudi Arabia,[361] Singapore, South Korea,[362] Taiwan, Thailand,[363] Uganda[364] and the United States.

Many countries also require a photo be taken of people entering the country. America, which does not fully implement exit control formalities at its land frontiers (although long mandated by domestic legislation),[365][366][367] intends to implement facial recognition for passengers departing from international airports to identify people who overstay their visa.[368]

Together with fingerprint and face recognition, iris scanning is one of three biometric identification technologies internationally standardised since 2006 by the International Civil Aviation Organisation (ICAO) for use in e-passports[369] and the United Arab Emirates conducts iris scanning on visitors who need to apply for a visa.[370][371] The United States Department of Homeland Security has announced plans to greatly increase the biometric data it collects at US borders.[372] In 2018, Singapore began trials of iris scanning at three land and maritime immigration checkpoints.[373][374]

Immigration stamps
Main article: Passport stamp
An immigration stamp is an inked impression in a passport or other travel document typically made by rubber stamp upon entering or exiting a territory. Depending on the jurisdiction, a stamp can serve different purposes. For example, in the United Kingdom, an immigration stamp in a passport includes the formal leave to enter granted to a person subject to entry control. In other countries, a stamp activates or acknowledges the continuing leave conferred in the passport bearer's entry clearance. Under the Schengen system, a foreign passport is stamped with a date stamp which does not indicate any duration of stay. This means that the person is deemed to have permission to remain either for three months or for the period shown on his visa if specified otherwise. Member states of the European Union are not permitted to place a stamp in the passport of a person who is not subject to immigration control. Stamping is prohibited because it is an imposition of a control to which the person is not subject.

Passport stamps may occasionally take the form of sticker stamps, such as entry stamps from Japan. Depending on nationality, a visitor may not receive a stamp at all (unless specifically requested), such as an EU or EFTA citizen travelling to an EU or EFTA country, Albania,[375] or North Macedonia.[376] Most countries issue exit stamps in addition to entry stamps. A few countries issue only entry stamps, including Canada, El Salvador, Ireland, Mexico, New Zealand, Singapore, United Kingdom and the America. Australia, Hong Kong, Israel, Macau and South Korea do not stamp passports upon entry nor exit. These countries or regions issue landing slips instead, with the exception of Australia who do not issue any form of physical evidence of entry. Visas may also take the form of passport stamps.

Immigration authorities usually have different styles of stamps for entries and exits, to make it easier to identify the movements of people. Ink colour might be used to designate mode of transportation (air, land or sea), such as in Hong Kong prior to 1997; while border styles did the same thing in Macau. Other variations include changing the size of the stamp to indicate length of stay, as in Singapore.

In many cases passengers on cruise ships do not receive passport stamps because the entire vessel has been cleared into port. It is often possible to get a souvenir stamp, although this requires finding the immigration office by the dock. In many cases officials are used to such requests and will cooperate.[377][378] Also, as noted below, some of the smallest European countries will give a stamp on request, either at their border or tourist office charging, at most, a nominal fee.

In some countries, there is no formal control by immigration officials of travel documents upon exit. Consequently, exit stamps are not placed in passports. Exit may be recorded by immigration authorities via information provided to them by carriers when the passenger departs from the country.


Entry and exit stamps issued at Beijing Capital International Airport in a Republic of Korea passport

 

Entry stamp issued at Chengdu Shuangliu International Airport in a Chinese passport

 

Old entry and exit stamps issued at Dongguan in a Chinese passport
(Noted that there were no English on stamps)

 

Entry and exit stamps issued at Fuzhou Changle International Airport in a Thai passport

 

American stamp from John F. Kennedy International Airport in a U.S. Passport.

 

An "entry denied" stamp from the Israeli Taba Border Crossing. (Some jurisdictions – such as Germany and Israel – have historically stamped "Entry Denied" on passports.)

 

Entry stamp issued at Chhatrapati Shivaji International Airport in an Indian passport

 

Entry stamp issued at Indira Gandhi International Airport to a citizen of Germany

 

Exit stamp in an Indian passport issued at Indira Gandhi International Airport

 

An Indian e-Visa issued at Indira Gandhi International Airport in an Romanian passport

 

Landing slip replacing existent passport stamps, (being unable to present the landing slip on departure does not affect a traveller's ability to clear immigration)

 

Entry stamp issued at juxtaposed controls at Hong Kong West Kowloon railway station

 

Exit stamp issued at juxtaposed controls at Hong Kong West Kowloon railway station in a Chinese passport

 

Entry and exit stamps issued at Shanghai Pudong International Airport in an Italian passport

 

Entry and exit stamps issued at Hong Kong International Airport and the Hong Kong–Macau Ferry Terminal in an Italian passport

 

Entry stamp issued at Hong Kong China Ferry Terminal in a Thai passport

Exit controls
Indian entry stamp at New Delhi Indira Gandhi International Airport.
Indian exit stamp at Indira Gandhi International Airport.
Chinese entry and exit stamps at Shanghai Pudong International Airport.
India and China, like most countries, implement border controls at both entry and exit, and consequently stamp passports upon exit

Entry stamp at Lewiston–Queenston Bridge, Ontario. Canada only conducts border control and stamps passports upon entry.
Whilst most countries implement border controls both at entry and at exit, some jurisdictions do not. For instance, the US and Canada do not implement exit controls at land borders and collect exit data on foreign nationals through airlines and through information sharing with neighbouring countries' entry border controls. These countries consequently don't issue exit stamps even to travellers who require stamps on entry. Similarly, Australia, Singapore and South Korea have eliminated exit stamps even though they continue to implement brief border control checks upon exit for most foreign nationals.

No exit control
United States United States of America[379]
Canada Canada
Mexico Mexico (by air)
The Bahamas Bahamas
Republic of Ireland Ireland
United Kingdom United Kingdom (Border Force officers do not carry out systematic checks of travel documents on passengers travelling to a destination outside the Common Travel Area by air, rail or sea (though from time to time spot checks are carried out – in this case passports are not stamped); instead, airline/rail/ferry companies obtain passengers' travel document information at check-in or on departure and transmit the information electronically to the UK Border Force)[380]
Formal exit control without passport stamping
Albania Albania (Entry & Exit stamp may issued upon request)
Australia Australia (Exit stamp issued upon explicit request)[381]
China China (Exit stamp issued upon request when using e-Gate)
Costa Rica Costa Rica (only at Costa Rican airports; different entry and exit stamps are made at the border crossing with Panama)
El Salvador El Salvador
Fiji Fiji
Hong Kong Hong Kong (no entry or exit stamps are issued, instead landing slips are issued upon arrival only)[382]
Iran Iran[383]
Israel Israel (no entry or exit stamps are issued at Ben Gurion Airport, instead landing slips are issued upon arrival and departure)
Japan Japan (Exit stamp issued upon request & when not using e-Gate since July 2019)[384]
Macau Macau (no entry or exit stamps are issued, instead landing slips are issued upon arrival only)
New Zealand New Zealand
South Korea South Korea (since 1 November 2016)
Panama Panama (only at Panamanian airports; different entry and exit stamps are made at the border crossing with Costa Rica)
Taiwan Republic of China (exit stamp issued upon request & when not using e-Gate)
Singapore Singapore (no exit stamps since 22 April 2019)[385]
Saint Kitts and Nevis Saint Kitts and Nevis
Europe Schengen Area countries (when the Entry Exit System becomes operational in 2022, it is anticipated that the passports of third-country nationals will not be stamped when they enter and leave the Schengen Area)[citation needed]
Exit permits
Some countries in Europe maintain controversial exit visa systems in addition to regular border controls. For instance, Uzbekistan requires its own citizens to obtain exit visas prior to leaving for countries other than fellow CIS nations in eastern Europe. Several countries in the Arabian peninsula require exit visas for foreign workers under the Kafala System meaning "sponsorship system"). Russia occasionally requires foreigners who overstay to obtain exit visas since one cannot exit Russia without a valid visa. Czechia has a similar policy.[386] Similarly, a foreign citizen granted a temporary residence permit in Russia needs an exit visa to take a trip abroad (valid for both exit and return). Not all foreign citizens are subject to that requirement. Citizens of Germany, for example, do not require this exit visa.

During the Cold War, countries in the Eastern Bloc maintained strict controls on citizens’ ability to travel abroad. Citizens of the Soviet Union, East Germany, and other communist states were typically required to obtain permission prior to engaging in international travel. Unlike most of these states, citizens of Yugoslavia enjoyed a significant freedom of international movement.[aq]

Certain Asian countries have policies that similarly require certain categories of citizens to seek official authorisation prior to travelling or emigrating. This is usually either as a way to enforce national service obligations or to protect migrant workers from travelling to places where they may be abused by employers. Singapore, for instance, operates an Exit Permit scheme in order to enforce the national service obligations of its male citizens and permanent residents.[389] These restrictions vary according to age and status.[390] South Korea and Taiwan[391] have similar policies. India, on the other hand, requires citizens who have not met certain educational requirements (and thus may be targeted by human traffickers or be coerced into modern slavery) to apply for approval prior to leaving the country and endorses their passports with "Emigration Check Required". Nepal similarly requires citizens emigrating to America on an H-1B visa to present an exit permit issued by the Ministry of Labour. This document is called a work permit and needs to be presented to immigration to leave the country.[392] In a bid to increase protection for the large amount of Indian, Bangladeshi, Chinese, and Nepali citizens smuggled through Indian airports to the Middle East as underpaid labourers, many Indian airline companies require travellers to obtain an 'OK to Board' confirmation sent directly from visa authorities in certain GCC countries directly to the airline and will bar anyone who has not obtained this endorsement from clearing exit immigration.

Eritrea requires the vast majority of its citizens to apply for special authorisation if they wish to leave, or even travel within, the country.[393][394][395]

Nationality and travel history
Many nations implement border controls restricting the entry of people of certain nationalities or who have visited certain countries. For instance Georgia refuses entry to holders of passports issued by the Republic of China.[396] Similarly, since April 2017, nationals of Bangladesh, Pakistan, Sudan, Syria, Yemen, and Iran have been banned from entering the parts of eastern Libya under the control of the Tobruk government.[396][397][398] The majority of Arab countries, as well as Iran and Malaysia, ban Israeli citizens,[396] however exceptional entry to Malaysia is possible with approval from the Ministry of Home Affairs.[399] Certain countries may also restrict entry to those with Israeli stamps or visas in their passports. As a result of tension over the Artsakh dispute, Azerbaijan currently forbids entry to Armenian citizens as well as to individuals with proof of travel to Artsakh.

Between September 2017 and January 2021, America did not issue new visas to nationals of Iran, North Korea, Libya, Somalia, Syria, or Yemen pursuant to restrictions imposed by the Trump administration,[400] which were subsequently repealed by the Biden administration on 20 January 2021.[401] While in force, the restrictions were conditional and could be lifted if the countries affected meet the required security standards specified by the Trump administration, and dual citizens of these countries could still enter if they presented a passport from a non-designated country.

Prescreening
A significant number of countries maintain prescreening facilities for passengers departing from other jurisdictions to clear border controls prior to arrival and thereby skip checkpoints upon arrival. Aside from simplifying arrival formalities, this enables border control authorities to deny entry to potentially inadmissible travellers prior to their embarking and to reduce congestion at border checkpoints located at ports of arrival.

Hong Kong and Mainland China: There are two border crossings between Hong Kong and the Chinese mainland that at which border controls imposed by the two jurisdictions are colocated:
West Kowloon Railway Station (simplified Chinese: 香港西九龙站; traditional Chinese: 香港西九龍站): A component of the Guangzhou–Shenzhen–Hong Kong Express Rail Link (Chinese: 廣深港高速鐵路; pinyin: Guǎng–Shēn–Gǎng Gāosù Tiělù), West Kowloon Station contains a "Mainland Port Area (simplified Chinese: 站内地口岸区; traditional Chinese: 站內地口岸區)", essentially enabling passengers and goods to clear mainland Chinese immigration on Hong Kong soil.
Shenzhen Bay Port (simplified Chinese: 深圳湾口岸; traditional Chinese: 深圳灣口岸): The land border checkpoint at Shenzhen Bay Port in the mainland contains a Hong Kong Port Area (simplified Chinese: 港方口岸区; traditional Chinese: 港方口岸區) which enables passengers and goods to clear Hong Kong border controls in the mainland. The checkpoint is located in the Chinese mainland on land leased from the city of Shenzhen in Guangdong province. By enabling travellers to clear both Chinese and Hong Kong border controls in one place, it eliminates any need for a second checkpoint on the Hong Kong side of the Shenzhen Bay Bridge.

Entrance of the Hong Kong Port Area of the Shenzhen Bay Port Passenger Terminal Building

 

Entrance of the Mainland Port Area at West Kowloon Station

 

Mainland Chinese police station in the Mainland Port Area

 

Mainland Chinese entry stamp issued at Hong Kong West Kowloon railway station

 

Mainland Chinese exit stamp issued at Hong Kong West Kowloon railway station in a Chinese passport


Map of the upcoming Rapid Transit system.
Singapore and Malaysia:
Woodlands Train Checkpoint (Malay: Pusat Pemeriksaan Kereta Api Woodlands, Chinese: 兀兰火车关卡, Tamil: ஊட்லண்ட்ஸ் இரயில் மசாதலைச்சாவடிப): For cross-border rail passengers, Singaporean exit and Malaysian entry preclearance border controls are co-located at the Woodlands Train Checkpoint in Singapore, whilst Malaysian exit controls are located separately at Johor Bahru Sentral railway station in Malaysia.
Johor Bahru – Singapore Rapid Transit System (Malay: Sistem Transit Aliran Johor Bahru–Singapura, Chinese: 新山－新加坡捷运系统, Tamil: ஜோகூர் பாரு - சிங்கப்பூர் விரைவான போக்குவரத்து அமைப்பு, RTS): The upcoming RTS connecting Singapore and Johor Bahru will feature border control preclearance both on the Singaporean side and on the Malaysian side. This will enable passengers arriving in Singapore from Malaysia or vice versa to proceed straight to their connecting transport, since the RTS will link to both the Singapore MRT system (Thomson-East Coast MRT Line) and Johor Bahru Sentral. Unlike the preclearance systems adopted in America and Hong Kong, but similar to the United Kingdom's juxtaposed controls, this system will mitigate arrival border controls on both sides of the border.[402][403]
Malaysia and Thailand:
Padang Besar railway station (Thai: สถานีรถไฟปาดังเบซาร์, Malay: Stesen keretapi Padang Besar): The Padang Besar railway station in Padang Besar, Malaysia has co-located border control facilities for both Malaysia and Thailand, although the station is wholly located inside Malaysian territory (albeit just 200 metres south of the Malaysia-Thailand border). The facilities for each country operate from separate counters inside the railway station building at the platform level.[404] Passengers entering Thailand clear Malaysian and Thai border formalities here in Malaysian territory before boarding their State Railway of Thailand trains which then cross the actual borderline several minutes after departing the station. Passengers from Thailand entering Malaysia are also processed here, using the same counters as there are no separate counters for processing entries and exits for either country.
United Kingdom and the Schengen Area: Border control for travel between the United Kingdom and the Schengen Area features significant prescreening under the juxtaposed controls programme for travel both by ferry and rail. This includes customs and immigration prescreening on both sides of the Eurotunnel, and immigration-only prescreening for ferry passengers and on the Eurostar between the United Kingdom and stations located in Belgium, France, and the Netherlands. Eurostar and Eurotunnel passengers departing from the Schengen area go through both French, Dutch, or Belgian exit border control and British entry border controls before departures, while passengers departing from the United Kingdom, including those departing for Belgium or the Netherlands, undergo French border controls on British soil. For travel by ferry, French entry border control for ferries between Dover and Calais or Dunkerque take place at the Port of Dover, whilst French exit and British entry border control takes place at Calais and Dunkerque. For travel by rail, twelve juxtaposed border control checkpoints are currently in operation.[ar]

Entry stamp into the Schengen Area issued by the French Border Police at St Pancras International station ('LFT' stands for 'Liaison fixe transmanche' (literally: cross-Channel fixed link))

 

Exit stamp from the Schengen Area issued by the French Border Police at Gare du Nord

 

British entry stamp issued by the UK Border Force at Gare du Nord.

 

Juxtaposed immigration controls at Brussel-Zuid/Bruxelles-Midi railway station, with the Belgian Federal Police carrying out exit immigration checks from the Schengen Area in front, and the UK Border Force carrying UK entry immigration checks behind.

 

UK Border Force checkpoint at the Eurotunnel Calais Terminal, where entry checks are carried out before boarding the train to the UK.

 

French Border Police checkpoint at London St Pancras International station, where entry immigration checks to the Schengen Area are carried out before boarding the train.

America: The American government operates border preclearance facilities at a number of ports and airports in foreign territory. They are staffed and operated by U.S. Customs and Border Protection officers. Travellers pass through American Immigration and Customs, Public Health, and Agriculture inspections before boarding their aircraft, ship, or train. This process is intended to streamline border procedures, reduce congestion at ports of entry, and facilitate travel between the preclearance location and American airports unequipped to handle international travellers. These facilities are present at the majority of major Canadian airports, as well as selected airports in Bermuda, Aruba, the Bahamas, Abu Dhabi[408] and Ireland.[409] Facilities located in Canada accept NEXUS cards and United States Passport cards (land/sea entry only) in lieu of passports. A preclearance facility is currently being planned at Dubai International Airport[410] Citizens of the Bahamas who enter America through either of the two preclearance facilities in that country enjoy an exemption from the general requirement to hold a visa as long as they can sufficiently prove that they do not have a significant criminal record in either the Bahamas or America. All Bahamians applying for admission at a port-of-entry other than the pre-clearance facilities located in Nassau or Freeport International airports are required to be in possession of a valid visa.[411] Preclearance facilities are also operated at Pacific Central Station, the Port of Vancouver, and the Port of Victoria in British Columbia, and there are plans to open one at Montreal Central Station in Quebec.

The interior of the American preclearance departures at Montréal.

 

Shannon Airport preclearance

 

Stamps in a United States passport, one from Canada Border Services Agency (right) and the other from U.S. Customs (left), both issued at Montréal-Pierre Elliott Trudeau International Airport

Informal prescreening
In some cases countries can introduce controls that functions as border controls but aren't border controls legally and don't need to be performed by government agencies. Normally they are performed and organised by private companies, based on a law that they have to check that passengers don't travel into a specific country if they aren't allowed to. Such controls can take effect in one country based on the law of another country without any formalised border control prescreening agreement in force. Even if they aren't border controls they function as such. The most prominent example is airlines which check passports and visa before passengers are allowed to board the aircraft. Also for some passenger boats such check are performed before boarding.

Expedited border controls
See also: Automated border control system
Certain countries and trade blocs establish programmes for high-frequency and/or low risk travellers to expedite border controls, subjecting them to lighter or automated checks, or priority border control facilities. In some countries, citizens or residents have access to automated facilities not available to foreigners.

British Isles
ePassport gates in the British Isles are operated by the UK Border Force and the Irish Naturalisation and Immigration Service, and are located at immigration checkpoints in the arrival halls of some airports across the British Isles, offering an alternative to using desks staffed by immigration officers. The gates use facial recognition system to verify the user's identity by comparing the user's facial features to those recorded in the photograph stored in the chip in their biometric passport.

British citizens, European Economic Area citizens and citizens of Australia, Canada, Japan, New Zealand, Singapore, South Korea, Taiwan and America as well as Chinese citizens of Hong Kong who are enrolled in the Registered Traveller Service,[412] can use ePassport gates at 14 ports of entry in the United Kingdom[as] provided that they are aged either 18 and over or 12 and over travelling with an adult and holding valid biometric passports. In Ireland, eGates are available at Dublin Airport for arrivals at Terminal 1 (Piers 1 and 2) and Terminal 2 and, in addition to Irish and British citizens, they are currently available to citizens of Switzerland and the European Economic Area with electronic passports aged 18 or over though there are proposals to extend the service to non-European citizens. Irish Passport Cards can not be used at eGates.


ePassport gates in Heathrow Airport (Terminal 4)

 

ePassport gates in Heathrow Airport (Terminal 5)

Asia and Oceania
Hong Kong & Macau The Automated Passenger Clearance System (Chinese: 自助出入境檢查閘機), colloquially known as the e-Channel) is an automated border control facility available at airports in Hong Kong and Macau, and at land borders between the mainland and the Special Administrative Regions. It is open to residents in the appropriate regions, and to selected foreign nationals.[at] In Hong Kong, the eChannel is also available to non-residents on departure, without registration, and to registered non-residents who qualify as "frequent travellers", including Chinese citizens from the Mainland, for both arrival and departure. Finally, Hong Kong's and Macuo's eChannel systems recognise each other's Permanent Resident ID card, after registration in an automated kiosk at the ferry terminal.

Japan Along with the introduction of J-BIS, an "Automated gate" (Japanese: 自動化ゲート) was set up at Terminal 1 and 2 at Narita Airport, Haneda Airport, Chubu Centrair Airport and Kansai Airport.[414] With this system, when a person enters or leaves the country, rather than having to be processed by an examiner there, a person can use a machine at the gate, thereby making both entry and departure simpler and easier, as well as more convenient.[415] Japanese people with valid passports, foreigners with both valid passports (this includes refugees with valid travel certificates and re-entry permits) and re-entry permits can use this system.[415]

Mainland China Residents in the PRC, both Chinese citizens and foreign residents (not tourists) can use the Chinese E-Channel after registration, which is done at the border, before leaving the Mainland. Chinese citizens with Hong Kong or Macao Permanent Residency, aka HKID***, can use their Home Return Permit instead of their passport to enter and leave the Mainland.

Australia SmartGates located at major Australian airports allow Australian ePassport holders and ePassport holders of a number of other countries to clear immigration controls more rapidly, and to enhance travel security by performing passport control checks electronically.[416] SmartGate uses facial recognition system to verify the traveller's identity against the data stored in the chip in their biometric passport, as well as checking against immigration databases. Travellers require a biometric passport to use SmartGate as it uses information from the passport (such as photograph, name and date of birth) and in the respective countries' databases (i.e. banned travellers database) to decide whether to grant entry or departure from Australia or to generate a referral to a customs agent.[417] These checks would otherwise require manual processing by a human which is time-consuming, costly and potentially error-prone.[418]

New Zealand In New Zealand, a SmartGate system exists at Auckland, Wellington, Christchurch and Queenstown airports,[419] enabling holders of biometric passports issued by New Zealand, Australia, Canada, China, France, Germany, Ireland and the Netherlands, the United Kingdom, and America to clear border controls using automated facilities. The system can currently only be used by travellers 12 years of age or older, however a trial is under way that may potentially lower the age of eligibility to use eGate for people with an eligible ePassport from 12 years of age to 10 years of age. New Zealand eGates utilise biometric technology, comparing the picture of your face in your ePassport with the picture it takes of you at the gate in order to confirm your identity. To make sure eGate can do this, travellers must make sure they look as similar to their ePassport photos as possible and remove glasses, scarves and hats that they were not wearing when their passport picture was taken. eGate can handle minor changes in your face, for example if the travellers' weight or hair has changed. Customs, Biosecurity and Immigration officials utilise information provided at eGates, including photos, to clear travellers and their items across New Zealand's border. Biometric information is kept for three months before destruction but other information, including about movements across New Zealand's border is kept indefinitely and handled in accordance with the Privacy Act 1993, or as the law authorises. This might include information being used by or shared with other law enforcement or border control authorities. Since 1 July 2019, visitors from the 60 Visa Waiver countries require a New Zealand electronic Travel Authority (NZeTA). This is an online application and a further toolkit and requirements for airlines and travel agents can be downloaded from the New Zealand Immigration website.[420]

Thailand The automated passport control (APC) system, which uses a facial recognition system, has been available for Thai nationals since 2012 and more than 20 million have used it. Suvarnabhumi Airport opened 8 automated immigration lanes for foreigners, but only Singaporeans were allowed to use the system initially. Since then, Singaporeans and holders of the Hong Kong SAR passport have been allowed to use the system.[413][421] Once processed, the foreign travellers can leave the automatic channel and present their passport to a Thai immigration officer to be stamped.[413]

Singapore The enhanced-Immigration Automated Clearance System (eIACS) is available at all checkpoints for Singapore citizens, permanent residents, foreign residents with long-term passes, APEC Business Travel Card holders, and other registered travellers. Foreign visitors whose fingerprints are registered on arrival may use the eIACS lanes for exit clearance. In addition, the Biometric Identification of Motorbikers (BIKES) System is available for eligible motorcyclists at the land border crossings with Malaysia. Meanwhile, all visitors who have been fingerprinted on entry at a manned counter can use the eIACS to leave Singapore by air. Additionally, nationals of certain countries[au] may register to use the eIACS system on entry, provided they meet prescribed conditions.

South Korea South Korea maintains a programme known as the Smart Entry Service, open for registration by South Koreans aged 7 or above and by registered foreigners[av] aged 17 or above.[423] Furthermore, visitors aged 17 or older may use the Smart Entry Service on exit at international airports, as long as they have provided their biometrics on arrival.

Taiwan A similar automated entry system, eGate, exists in Taiwan providing expedited border control for Taiwanese nationals [l] as well as certain classes of residents and frequent visitors. Users simply scan their travel documents at the gate and are passed through for facial recognition.[424] As of 2019, there have been instances of foreign non-registered travellers allowed to use the eGate system to depart, notably at Taipei Taoyuan Airport Terminal 1, but not Terminal 2, using a passport scan and fingerprints.


e-Channel machines at Hong Kong International Airport

 

Smartgate Departures at Sydney Airport

 

Automatedimmigration at Narita Airport

North America
North America has a wide variety of expedited border control programmes:

Caribbean Community CARIPASS: CARIPASS is a voluntary travel card programme that will provide secure and simple border crossings for citizens and legal residents of participating[aw] Caribbean Community (CARICOM) jurisdictions.[426] The CARIPASS initiative is coordinated by the Implementation Agency for Crime and Security (CARICOM IMPACS), and seeks to provide standardised border control facilities within participating Caribbean communities.[427] CARIPASS is accepted as a valid travel document within and between participating member states and will allow cardholders to access automated gate facilities at immigration checkpoints that will use biometric technology to verify the user.[428]
United States Global Entry: Global Entry is an programme for frequent travellers that enables them to utilise automated border control facilities and priority security screening. In addition to American citizens and Permanent Residents, the programme is open to Indian,[429] Singaporean,[430] and South Korean citizens among others. Global Entry members are eligible to use automated Global Entry facilities at certain airports to clear border control more efficiently. Enrolled users must present their machine-readable passport or permanent residency card, and submit their fingerprints to establish identity. Users then complete an electronic customs declaration, and are issued a receipt instructing them to either proceed to baggage claim, or to a normal inspection booth for an interview.[431] Participants may utilise automated kiosks to clear American border controls at participating airports.[ax]
Canada CANPASS: Canadian citizens and Permanent Residents can apply for CANPASS which, in its present form, provides expedited border controls for individuals entering Canada on corporate and private aircraft.
United States Canada NEXUS and FAST: NEXUS is a joint Canadian-American expedited border control programme for low risk travellers holding Canadian or U.S. citizenship or permanent residence. Membership requires approval by Canadian and American authorities and entitles members to dedicated RFID-enabled lanes when crossing the land border. A NEXUS card can also be utilised as a travel document between the two countries and entitles passengers to priority border control facilities in Canada and Global Entry facilities in America. Free and Secure Trade (FAST) is a similar programme for commercial drivers and approved importers, reducing the amount of customs checks conducted at the border and expediting the border control process. When entering America by air, holders of NEXUS cards may use Global Entry kiosks to clear border controls at participating airports[ax]
United States SENTRI: SENTRI is a programme similar to NEXUS for American and Mexican citizens that additionally allows members to register their cars for expedited land border controls. Unlike NEXUS, SENTRI is administered solely by the American government and does not provide expedited controls when entering Mexico. When entering America by land from Canada, it can be used as a NEXUS card, but not the other way around. Individuals holding a NEXUS card may additionally register their cars for expedited land border controls under SENTRI. When entering America by air, holders of SENTRI cards may use Global Entry kiosks to clear border controls at participating airports[ax]
United States TSA PreCheck: TSA PreCheck is a trusted traveller programme initiated in December 2013 and administered by the American Transportation Security Administration that allows selected members of select frequent flyer programs, members of Global Entry, NEXUS, and SENTRI, members of the US military, and cadets and midshipmen of the United States service academies[433] After completing a background check, being fingerprinted,[434] and paying an $85 fee, travellers will get a Known Traveler Number. TSA does not issue an ID card like Global Entry, NEXUS, and SENTRI do.[435] Travelers are notified if they have PreCheck by having an indicator printed on their boarding pass that may say "TSAPRECHK", "TSA PRE", or "TSA Pre✓®" depending on the airline and type of boarding pass.[435] As of December 2019, a total of 73 airlines were participating in the program.[436]
Mexico Viajero Confiable: Viajero Confiable is a Mexican trusted traveller programme which allows members to pass securely through customs and immigration controls in reduced time,[437] using automated kiosks at participating airports. Viajero Confiable was introduced in three airports in 2014 and has since expanded to additional sites. Like the NEXUS, Global Entry, and TSA PreCheck programs, Viajero Confiable members traveling via participating airports may use designated lanes which allow them to speedily and securely clear customs, because the Mexican government has already performed a background check on them, and they are considered a trusted traveller. At the participating airports, members may use automated kiosks to scan their passport and fingerprints, and complete an electronic immigration form.[citation needed] The programme is targeted at Mexican citizens, as well as American or Canadian citizens who are members of the Global Entry or NEXUS programme and are lawful permanent residents of Mexico.[438]

Countries whose citizens are eligible for Global Entry

 

Sample NEXUS card

 

A NEXUS lane at the American side of the Ambassador Bridge

APEC Business Travel Card (ABTC)

  Full members of the scheme
  Transitional members (America and Canada)
Main article: APEC Business Travel Card
The APEC Business Travel Card, or ABTC, is an expedited border control programme for business travellers from APEC economies (excluding Canada and America). It provides visa exemptions and access to expedited border control facilities. ABTC holders are eligible for expedited border control at Canadian airports but not for any visa exemptions.

ABTCs are generally issued only to citizens of APEC member countries, however Hong Kong issues them to Permanent Residents who are not Chinese citizens, a category primarily consisting of British, Indian, and Pakistani citizens.

The use of ABTCs in China is restricted as a result of the One Country, Two Systems and One China policies. Taiwanese nationals, and Chinese citizens from Hong Kong, and Macau are required to use special internal travel documents to enter the mainland. Similar restrictions exist on the use of ABTC for Chinese citizens of other regions entering Taiwan. (see: Internal border controls).

Border control organisations by country
Border control is generally the responsibility of specialised government organisations which oversee various aspects their jurisdiction's border control policies, including customs, immigration policy, border security, biosecurity measures. Official designations, division of responsibilities, and command structures of these organisations vary considerably and some countries split border control functions across multiple agencies.

United States America

Most aspects of American border control are handled by various divisions of the Department of Homelend Security (DHS).

US Customs and Border Protection: U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP), a division of the DHS, is the country's primary border control organisation, charged with regulating and facilitating international trade, collecting import duties, and enforcing America trade, customs and immigration regulations.[439][440] It has a workforce of more than 58000 employees.[ay] Every individual entering America is subject to inspection by Customs and Border Protection (CBP) officers for compliance with immigration, customs and agriculture regulations.[443] Travellers are screened for a variety of prohibited items ranging from gold, silver, and precious metals to alcoholic beverages, firearms, and narcotics.[444]
Transport Security Administration: The Transport Security Administration, or TSA, is a division of the DHS responsible for conducting security checks at American airports and other transport hubs, including overseas preclearance facilities (with the notable exception of those in Canada, where CATSA conducts security checks prior to CBP immigration screening). For passengers departing by air from America, TSA screening is the only physical check conducted upon departure.
Immigration and Customs Enforcement: Immigration and Customs Enforcement, or ICE, is the organisation responsible for enforcing immigration laws within America, focusing largely on deporting undocumented migrants. ICE operates detention centres throughout the country and approximately 34,000 undocumented migrants are imprisoned by ICE on any given day,[445] in over 500 detention centres, jails, and prisons nationwide.[446]
United States Citizenship and Immigration Services: United States Citizenship and Immigration Services is responsible for various aspects of border control relating to immigration, including reviewing visa petitions and applications as well as processing asylum claims.
State and local law enforcement agencies: Officers from police forces established by state, county, and municipal governments across America are deputised by ICE to detain undocumented migrants pursuant to Immigration and Nationality Act Section 287(g). Under section 287(g), ICE trains and authorises state and local law enforcement officers to identify, process, and detain undocumented migrants they encounter during their daily law-enforcement activity.[447] The 287(g) programme has been criticised for increasing racist profiling by police and undermining community safety as the fear of deportation discourages undocumented migrants from reporting crimes or talking to law enforcement officers.[448]
 Canada

Immigration, Refugees and Citizenship Canada: Immigration, Refugees and Citizenship Canada (IRCC; French: Immigration, Réfugiés et Citoyenneté Canada) is the department of the Government of Canada with responsibility for matters dealing with immigration to Canada, refugees, and Canadian citizenship. IRCC's mandate emanates from the Department of Citizenship and Immigration Act. The Minister of IRCC is the key person to uphold and administer the Citizenship Act of 197 and its subsequent amendments. The minister will work closely with the Minister of Public Safety in relation to the administration of the Immigration and Refugee Protection Act.[449]
Canada Border Services Agency: The Canada Border Services Agency (CBSA; French: Agence des services frontaliers du Canada) is the primary organisation tasked with maintaining Canada's border controls. The Agency was created on 12 December 2003, though its creation was formalised by the Canada Border Services Agency Act,[450] which received Royal Assent on 3 November 2005. amalgamating Canada Customs (from the now-defunct Canada Customs and Revenue Agency) with border and enforcement personnel from the Department of the CIC and the Canadian Food Inspection Agency (CFIA).
Canadian Air Transport Security Authority: The Canadian Air Transport Security Authority (CATSA; (French: Administration canadienne de la sûreté du transport aérien) is the Canadian Crown corporation responsible for security screening of people and baggage and the administration of identity cards at the 89 designated airports in Canada. CATSA is answerable to Transport Canada and reports to the Government of Canada through the Minister of Transport.[451]
China

Border control in China is the responsibility of a variety of entities in each of the country's four distinct immigration areas. In the Special Administrative Regions of Hong Kong and Macau, agencies tracing their lineage to British and Portuguese colonial authorities, respectively, perform border control functions based on the policies and practices in force before those territories' return to the People's Republic of China. Areas administered by the Republic of China are subject to border controls distinct from those in the People's Republic of China.

China People's Republic of China:
 Hong Kong: The Immigration Department (Chinese: 入境事務處) of Hong Kong is responsible for border controls of the Hong Kong Special Administrative Regions, including internal controls with the rest of China. After the People's Republic of China resumed sovereignty of the territory in July 1997, Hong Kong's immigration system remained largely unchanged from its British predecessor model. In addition, visa-free entry acceptance regulations into Hong Kong for passport holders of some 170 countries remain unchanged before and after 1997.
 Macau: The Immigration Department of Macau, under the Public Security Police Force, is the government agency responsible for immigration matters, whilst the Public Security Police Force itself is responsible for enforcing immigration laws in Macau.[452]
China Mainland China: Border control in Mainland China is the responsibility of National Immigration Administration (NIA; Chinese: 国家移民管理局; pinyin: Guójiā Yímín Guǎnlǐ Jú)[453]), a unit of the Ministry of Public Security (MPS; Chinese: 公安部; pinyin: Gōng'ānbù). Customs related border controls are largely within the purview of the General Administration of Customs of the People's Republic of China.
Taiwan Republic of China: In areas controlled by the Republic of China[l] the National Immigration Agency (NIA; Chinese: 內政部移民署; pinyin: Nèizhèngbù Yímínshǔ), a subsidiary organisation of the Ministry of the Interior is responsible for border control. The agency is headed by the Director General. The current Director-General is Chiu Feng-kuang.[454] The agency was established in early 2007 and its job includes the care and guidance of new immigrants, exit and entry control, the deportation of undocumented migrants, and the prevention of human trafficking.[455] The agency also deals with persons from Mainland China, Hong Kong and Macau who do not hold household registration in the areas controlled by the ROC.
 India

Border control in India is performed by a variety of organisations, each focusing on a distinct section of its external borders.

Border Security Force: The Border Security Force, or BSF, is the primary border defence organisation of India. It is one of the five Central Armed Police Forces of the Union of India, it was raised in the wake of the 1965 War on 1 December 1965, "for ensuring the security of the borders of India and for matters connected there with".[456][457] From independence in 1947 to 1965, the protection of India's international boundaries was the responsibility of local police belonging to each border state, with little inter-state coordination. BSF was created as a Central government-controlled security force to guard all of India's borders, thus bringing greater cohesion in border security. BSF is charged with guarding India's land border during peacetime and preventing transnational crime. It is a Union Government Agency under the administrative control of the Ministry of Home Affairs.[458] It currently stands as the world's largest border guarding force.[459]
Assam Rifles: The Assam Rifles, one of India's oldest continuously existent paramilitary units, has been responsible for physical controls on the border between India and Myanmar since 2002.[460] The border area between India, Myanmar, and China is largely made up of minority groups, many of which are transboundary communities. Consequently, enforcing border controls is a challenge for all three countries, and porous sections of the border between India and Myanmar have historically been common since Myanmar was formerly a part of the British Indian Empire.
Indo–Tibetan Border Police: The Indo-Tibetan Border Police (ITBP) is charged with maintaining border controls on India's side of the extensive border between minority regions of India and China. In September 1996, the Parliament of India enacted the "Indo-Tibetan Border Police Force Act, 1992" to "provide for the constitution and regulation" of the ITBP "for ensuring the security of the borders of India and for matters connected therewith".[461][462] The first head of the ITBP, designated Inspector General, was Balbir Singh, a police officer previously belonging to the Intelligence Bureau. The ITBP, which started with 4 battalions, has since restructuring in 1978, undergone expansion to a force of 56 battalions as of 2017 with a sanctioned strength of 89,432.[463]
 Indonesia

The Directorate General of Immigration ((Indonesian: Direktorat Jenderal Imigrasi) is the primary agency tasked with border control in Indonesia.

 Iran

Iranian Immigration & Passport Police: The Immigration & Passport Police Office is a subdivision of Law Enforcement Force of Islamic Republic of Iran with the authority to issue Iranian passports and deals with Immigrants to Iran.[464] The agency is member of ICAO's Public Key Directory (PKD).[465]
Islamic Republic of Iran Border Guard Command: Islamic Republic of Iran Border Guard Command, commonly known as NAJA Border Guard, is a subdivision of Law Enforcement Force of Islamic Republic of Iran (NAJA) and Iran's sole agency that performs border guard and control in land borders, and coast guard in maritime borders. The unit was founded in 2000, and from 1991 to 2000, the unit's duties was done by of Security deputy of NAJA. Before 1991, border control was Gendarmerie's duty.[466]
 Malaysia

The Immigration Department of Malaysia is a department of the Federal Government of Malaysia which provides services to Malaysian Citizens, Permanent Residents and Foreign Visitors.[467]

The functions of the department are as follows:

1. Issuing of passports and travel documents to Malaysian Citizens and Permanent Residents.

2. Issuing of visas, passes and permits to Foreign Nationals entering Malaysia.

3. Administering and managing the movement of people at authorised entry and exit points.

4. Enforcing the Immigration Act 1959/63, Immigration Regulations 1963 and Passport Act 1966.

 North Korea

Border Security Command and Coastal Security Bureau are collectively responsible for restricting unauthorised cross-border (land and sea) entries and exits, in the early 1990s the bureaux responsible for border security and coastal security were transferred from the State Security Department to the Ministry of People's Armed Forces. Sometime thereafter, the Border Security Bureau was enlarged to corps level and renamed the Border Security Command. Previously headquartered in Chagang Province, the Border Security Command was relocated to Pyongyang in 2002.[468]

 Pakistan

Physical controls on the internationally recognised portions of Pakistan's international borders are managed by dedicated paramilitary units (the Pakistan Rangers on the border with India, Frontier Corps with Afghanistan and Iran) and the Gilgit−Baltistan Scouts with China, Pakistan-administered side of the Line of Control is guarded and patrolled by Pakistan Army.

Pakistan Rangers: The Pakistan Rangers are a paramilitary law enforcement organisation in Pakistan and have a primary mission of securing important sites such as Pakistan's International Border with India as well as employed in internal security operations, and providing assistance to the police in maintaining law and order. Rangers is an umbrella term for the Pakistan Rangers – Punjab, headquartered in Lahore, responsible for guarding Punjab Province's 1,300 km long IB with India, and the Pakistan Rangers – Sindh, headquartered in Karachi, defending Sindh Province's ~912 km long IB with India. The forces operate under their own separate chains of command and wear distinct uniforms. Most famously each evening, the Pakistan Rangers – Punjab together with their Indian counterparts in the BSF, participate in an elaborate flag lowering ceremony at Wagah border crossing near Lahore.
Frontier Corps: The Frontier Corps, is an umbrella term for the two western provincial auxiliary forces part of the paramilitary forces of Pakistan along the western provinces of Balochistan and Khyber Pakhtunkhwa and are the direct counterparts to the Rangers of the eastern provinces (Sindh and Punjab). The Frontier Corps comprises two separate organisations: FC NWFP stationed in Khyber Pakhtunkhwa province (formerly known as the North-West Frontier Province), and includes the Federally Administered Tribal Areas, and FC Balochistan stationed in Balochistan province. Each subdivision is headed by a seconded inspector general, who is a Pakistan Army officer of at least major-general rank, although the force itself is under the jurisdiction of the Interior Ministry.[469] With a total manpower of approximately 80,000,[470] the task of the Frontier Corps is to help local law enforcement in the maintenance of law and order, and to carry out border patrol and anti-smuggling operations.[471] Some of the FC's constituent units such as the Chitral Scouts, the Khyber Rifles, Swat Levies, the Kurram Militia, the Tochi Scouts, the South Waziristan Scouts, and the Zhob Militia have regimental histories dating back to British colonial times and many, e.g. the Khyber Rifles, have distinguished combat records before and after 1947.
Gilgit−Baltistan Scouts: The Gilgit−Baltistan Scouts are part of the Paramilitary forces of Pakistan, under the direct control of the Ministry of the Interior of the Pakistan Government. The Scouts are an internal and border security force with the prime objective to protect the China–Pakistan border and support Civil Administration in ensuring maintenance of law and order in Gilgit-Baltistan and anywhere else in Pakistan.[citation needed] The force was formerly known as the Northern Areas Scouts but was renamed to the Gilgit−Baltistan Scouts in 2011.[472]
Pakistan Customs: Customs-related border security measures in Pakistan are the responsibility of Pakistan Customs.
Schengen Area

Border control in the Schengen Area is primarily performed by the national authorities of individual member states. Consequently, there are many distinct organisations involved with border control along the area's external frontiers and at sea and air ports of entry within its members states.

European Union European Border and Coast Guard Agency (Frontex): Frontex[473][474] is the Schengen Area's multilateral border control organisation. It is headquartered in Warsaw and operates in coordination with the border and coast guards of individual Schengen Area member states. According to the European Council on Refugees and Exiles (ECRE) and the British Refugee Council, in written evidence submitted to the UK House of Lords inquiry, Frontex fails to demonstrate adequate consideration of international and European asylum and human rights law including the 1951 Convention relating to the Status of Refugees and EU law in respect of access to asylum and the prohibition of refoulement.[475] In September 2009, a Turkish military radar issued a warning to a Latvian helicopter conducting an anti-migrant and anti-refugee patrol in the eastern Aegean Sea to leave the area as it is in Turkish airspace. The Turkish General Staff reported that the Latvian Frontex aircraft had violated Turkish airspace west of Didim.[476] According to a Hellenic Air Force announcement, the incident occurred as the Frontex helicopter —identified as an Italian-made Agusta A109— was patrolling a common route used by people smugglers near the small isle of Farmakonisi.[477] Another incident took place in October 2009 in the airspace above the eastern Aegean sea, off the island of Lesbos.[478] On 20 November 2009, the Turkish General Staff issued a press note alleging that an Estonian Border Guard aircraft Let L-410 UVP taking off from Kos on a Frontex mission had violated Turkish airspace west of Söke.[476] As part of the Border and Coast Guard a Return Office was established with the capacity to repatriate immigrants residing illegally in the union by deploying Return Intervention Teams composed of escorts, monitors, and specialists dealing with related technical aspects. For this repatriation, a uniform European travel document would ensure wider acceptance by third countries. In emergency situations such Intervention Teams will be sent to problem areas to bolster security, either at the request of a member state or at the agency's own initiative. It is this latter proposed capability, to be able to deploy specialists to member states borders without the approval[az] of the national government in question that is proving the most controversial aspect of this European Commission plan.[479]
France Direction centrale de la police aux frontières: The Direction centrale de la police aux frontières (DCPF) is a directorate of the French National Police that is responsible for border control at certain border crossing points and border surveillance in some areas in France.[480] They work alongside their British counterparts at Calais, and along the Channel Tunnel Rail Link with the British Transport Police. The DCPF is consequently largely responsible for Schengen Area border controls with the United Kingdom.
France Direction générale des douanes et droits indirects: Direction générale des douanes et droits indirects (DGDDI), commonly known as les douanes, is a French law enforcement agency responsible for levying indirect taxes, preventing smuggling, surveilling borders and investigating counterfeit money. The agency acts as a coast guard, border guard, sea rescue organisation and a customs service.[481] In addition, since 1995, the agency has replaced the Border Police in carrying out immigration control at smaller border checkpoints, in particular at maritime borders and regional airports.[482]
Finland Finnish Border Guard: The Finnish Border Guard, including the coast guard, is the agency responsible for border control related to persons, including passport control and border patrol. The Border Guard is a paramilitary organisation, subordinate to the Ministry of the Interior in administrative issues and to the President of the Republic in issues pertaining to the president's authority as Commander-in-Chief (e.g. officer promotions). The Finland-Russia border is a controlled external border of the Schengen Area, routinely patrolled and protected by a border zone enforced by the Border Guard. Finland's borders with Norway and Sweden are internal Schengen borders with no routine border controls, but the Border Guard maintains personnel in the area owing to its search and rescue (SAR) duties. There are two coast guard districts for patrolling maritime borders. In peacetime, the Border Guard trains special forces and light infantry and can be incorporated fully or in part into the Finnish Defence Forces when required by defence readiness. The Border Guard has police and investigative powers in immigration matters and can independently investigate immigration violations. The Border Guard has search and rescue (SAR) duties, both maritime and inland. The Guard operates SAR helicopters that are often used in inland SAR, in assistance of a local fire and rescue department or other authorities. The Border Guard shares border control duties with Finnish Customs, which inspects arriving goods, and the Finnish Police, which enforces immigration decisions such as removal.
Sweden Swedish border police: Border control duties in Sweden are handled by a special group in the police force. Sweden has natural land borders only to Norway and Finland, where there are no border controls, so border surveillance is not done there apart from customs control. Therefore, border control is focused on some fixed control points, during the border control-less Schengen period until 2015 mainly airports. The introduction of full border control from Denmark and the continent in 2015 put a heavy load on the border police who had to check 8000 cars and 50 trains per day coming over the Öresund Bridge, and 3000 cars in Helsingborg and more in other ferry ports. The police quickly educated several hundred semi-authorised border control guards who had to ask the real officers to take over any doubtful case. The customs office and the coast guard can not do formal border controls, but can stop people in doubtful cases and ask police to take over.
 Singapore

The Immigration and Checkpoints Authority, or ICA, is the border control agency of Singapore under the Ministry of Home Affairs.[483] The ICA is responsible for border control, border customs services, and immigration enforcement in Singapore.[484][485] ICA is accountable to Parliament through the Minister for Home Affairs. The agency is in charge of maintaining all border checkpoints[ba] in Singapore. In addition, ICA handles anti-terrorism operations and is responsible for many visa and residence related aspects of border control.

 United Kingdom

HM Revenue and Customs: Customs administration related to border controls in the United Kingdom largely fall within the jurisdiction of HM Revenue and Customs.
UK Visas and Immigration (UKVI): UKVI operates the visa aspect of the United Kingdom's border controls, managing applications from foreign nationals seeking to visit or work in the UK, and also considers applications from businesses and educational institutions seeking to become sponsors for foreign nationals. It also considers applications from foreign nationals seeking British citizenship.
Border Force: The Border Force is in charge[bb] of physical controls and checkpoints at airports, land borders, and ports. Since 1 March 2012, Border Force has been a law-enforcement command within the Home Office, accountable directly to ministers. Border Force is responsible for immigration and customs at 140 rail, air and sea ports in the UK and western Europe, as well as thousands of smaller airstrips, ports and marinas.[488] The work of the Border Force is monitored by the Independent Chief Inspector of Borders and Immigration.
Immigration Enforcement: Immigration Enforcement is the organisation responsible for enforcing border control policies within the United Kingdom, including pursuing and removing undocumented migrants.

Canadian Border Security Agency officers and police in Vancouver

 

Automated passport control kiosks at Toronto Pearson International Airport

 

National Immigration Agency headquarters in Taipei.

 

Ski Contingent of the Indo-Tibetan Border Police during their 53rd Raising Day Parade, 2014

 

Insignia of the Indian Border Security Force

 

Protests against Frontex in Warsaw in 2008

 

Emblem of the Department of Homeland Security, the umbrella agency responsible for border control in America

Controversies
Certain border control policies of various countries have been the subject of controversy and public debate.

America
Policies targeting Muslims
Since the implementation of added security measures in the aftermath of the 2001 World Trade Centre attacks, reports of discrimination against people perceived to be Muslim by American border security officers have been prevalent in the media.[489] The travel restrictions implemented during the Trump presidency primarily against Muslim majority countries have provoked controversy over whether such measures are a legitimate Border security measure or unethically discriminatory.

Separation of families seeking asylum
File:Crying children who have been separated from their families at the U.S. border.webm
ProPublica recording of crying children separated from their families.

Children abducted by the American government pictured in a wire-mesh cage. (Photo taken by United States Customs and Border Protection)
In April 2018, as part of its "zero tolerance" policy, the American government ordered the separation of the children of refugees and asylum seekers from their parents (Spanish: Política de separación de familias inmigrantes en los Estados Unidos). As a consequence of popular outrage,[bc] and criticism from the medical[bd] and religious[be] communities, the policy was put on hold by an executive order signed by President Trump on 20 June 2018. Under the policy, federal authorities separated children from their parents, relatives, or other adults who accompanied them in crossing the border, whether apprehended during an illegal crossing or, in numerous reported cases, legally presenting themselves for asylum.[500] The policy involved prosecuting all adults detained at the Mexican border, imprisoning parents, and handing minors to the American Department of Health and Human Services (Spanish: Departamento de Salud y Servicios Sociales de los Estados Unidos).[501] The federal government reported that the policy resulted in the separation of over 2300 children from their parents.[502][503]

The Trump administration blamed Congress for the atrocity and labelled the change in policy as "the Democrats' law", even though Congress had been overwhelmingly dominated by Republicans since 2016. Regardless, members of both parties criticised the policy and detractors of the Trump administration emphasise the fact there does not seem to be any written law that required the government to implement such a policy.[504][505] Attorney General Jeff Sessions, in defending the policy, quoted a passage from the Bible, notwithstanding the fact that religious doctrine carries absolutely no weight in American law.[505] Other officials praised the policy as a deterrent to unlawful immigration.[506][507]

The costs of separating migrant children from their parents and keeping them in "tent cities" are higher than keeping them with their parents in detention centres.[508] To handle the large amount of immigration charges brought by the Trump administration, federal prosecutors had to divert resources from other crime cases.[509] It costs $775 per person per night to house the children when they are separated but $256 per person per night when they are held in permanent HHS facilities and $298 per person per night to keep the children with their parents in immigration detention centres.[508] The head of the Justice Department's major crimes unit in San Diego diverted staff from drug smuggling cases.[509] Drug smuggling cases were also increasingly pursued in state courts rather than federal courts, as federal prosecutor were increasingly preoccupied with pursuing charges against illegal border crossings.[509] The Kaiser Family Foundation said that costs associated with the policy may also divert resources from programmes within the Department of Health and Human Services.[510] In July 2018, it was reported that HHS had diverted at least $40 million from its health programs to care for and reunify migrant children, and that the HHS was preparing to shift more than $200 million from other HHS accounts.[511]

Bhutan
Main articles: Lhotshampa and Bhutanese refugees

Lhotshampa refugees in Beldangi camp in Nepal. The man is holding a Bhutanese passport.
Starting primarily in the 1990s, the Bhutanese government implemented strict restrictions on Nepali residents and implemented internal border control policies to restrict immigration or return of ethnic Nepalis. This policy shift effectively ended previously liberal immigration policies with regards to Nepalis and counts among the most racialised border control policies in Asia.

Israel
Border control, both on entry and on exit, at Israeli airports rate passengers' potential threat to security using factors including nationality, ethnicity, and race.[512][513] Instances of discrimination against Arabs, people perceived to be Muslim, and Russian Jews among others have been reported in the media.[514][515] Security at Tel Aviv's Ben Gurion Airport relies on a number of fundamentals, including a heavy focus on what Raphael Ron, former director of security at Ben Gurion, terms the "human factor", which he generalised as "the inescapable fact that terrorist attacks are carried out by people who can be found and stopped by an effective security methodology."[516] As part of its focus on this so-called "human factor", Israeli security officers interrogate travellers, profiling those who appear to be Arab based on name or physical appearance.[517] Even as Israeli authorities argue that racist, ethnic, and religious profiling are effective security measures, according to Boaz Ganor, Israel has not undertaken any known empirical studies on the efficacy of the technique of racial profiling.[518]

Australia
Offshore detention centres
Main articles: Pacific Solution, Nauru Regional Processing Centre, and Manus Regional Processing Centre
Beginning in 2001, Australia implemented border control policies featuring the detention of asylum seekers and economic migrants who arrived unlawfully by boat in nearby islands in the Pacific. These policies are controversial and in 2017 the Supreme Court of Papua New Guinea declared the detention centre at Manus Island to be unconstitutional.[519][520] The adherence of these policies to international human rights law is a matter of controversy.

Travel restrictions on Australian citizens during the COVID-19 pandemic
During the COVID-19 pandemic, Australia adopted a policy of denying entry to its own citizens arriving from jurisdictions perceived to pose a high risk of COVID-19 transmission.[179] Additionally, Australia adopted a broad policy of restricting entry to the country for all individuals located overseas, including Australian citizens, resulting in a large number of Australian citizens stranded abroad.[180] Australia's policies with regard to its own citizens undermined the principle in international law that a state must permit entry to its own citizens, as enshrined in the International Covenant on Civil and Political Rights. At the same time, the Australian government prohibited the majority of Australian citizens from exiting the country, even if they ordinarily reside overseas.[521]

China
Main article: North Korean defectors § China
China does not currently recognise North Korean defectors as refugees and subjects them to immediate deportation if caught. The China-DPRK border is fortified and both sides aim to deter refugees from crossing. This aspect of Chinese border control policy has been criticised by human rights organisations.[522][523]

Cyprus and the European Union
As a result of Northern Cyprus's sovereignty dispute with Southern Cyprus, the South (a member of the European Union) has imposed restrictions on the North's airports, and pressure from the European Union has resulted in all countries other than Turkey recognising the South's ability to impose a border shutdown on the North, thus negating the right to self determination of the predominantly Turkish Northern Cypriot population and subjecting their airports to border controls imposed by the predominantly Greek South.[524] As a result, Northern Cyprus is heavily dependent on Turkey for economic support and is unable to develop a functioning economy.[525]

Involvement of private companies
Border security is increasingly being outsourced to private companies, with the border security market growing at a rate of 7% per year.[526] In its Border Wars series, the Transnational Institute showed that the arms and security industry helps shape European border security policy through lobbying, regular interactions with EU’s border institutions and its shaping of research policy.[527] The institute critisises that the border security industry has a vested interest in increasing border militarisation and thus increasing its profits. Furthermore, the same companies are also often involved in the arms trade and thus profit twice: first from fuelling the conflicts, repression and human rights abuses that have led refugees to flee their homes and later from intercepting them along their migration routes.[528]

Gallery

Korean border

 

The winding border between Pakistan and India is lit by security lights. It is one of the few places on Earth where an international boundary can be seen at night.

 

The Peace Arch at the Canada–United States border, the longest common border in the world.

 

Thailand-Cambodia

 

The Wagah border crossing between India and Pakistan along the Radcliffe Line.

 

Border at Tijuana, Mexico and San Ysidro, California, United States with memorial coffins for those killed crossing this border. A straight-line border surveyed when the region was thinly populated.

 

Elbe at the German-Czech border crossing

 

Vaalimaa's border crossing along the European route E18 on the Finnish side of the Russian border in Virolahti, Finland

 

House on Chaamseweg street in Baarle, village that is divided between Belgium and Netherlands. State border is marked by the line of white plates on the sidewalk

 

Jordan-Israel (Aquaba-Arava)

 

Car of the German Border Patrol

 

Cyclepath on the border of The Netherlands (cyclepath) and Germany (gravelroad)

See also
Asylum seeker
Border barrier
Airspace
Air sovereignty
Illegal entry
United States Border Patrol
Security guard
Illegal immigration
Immigration law
Maritime boundary
Freedom of movement
Refugees
Notes
 For example, Ann Dummett, an activist for racial equality, criticised the legislation, saying that "there is no indication at all in our nationality law of ethnic origin being a criterion. But the purpose of the law since 1981, and the manner in which it is implemented, make sure that ethnic origin is in fact and in practice a deciding factor."[18] Ms Dummett also said that "the 1981 Nationality Act in effect gave full British citizenship to a group of whom at least 96% are white people, and the other, less favourable forms of British nationality to groups who are at least 98% non-white"[19]
 In March 1996, there was a submission to the Committee on the Elimination of Racial Discrimination of United Nations. The committee criticised the arrangements of the BN(O) nationality under "Principal subjects of concern": "The Government's statement that South Asian residents of Hong Kong are granted some form of British nationality, whether that of a British National Overseas (BNO) or a British Overseas Citizen (BOC), so that no resident of Hong Kong would be left stateless following the transfer of sovereignty is noted with interest. It is, however, a matter of concern that such status does not grant the bearer the right of abode in the United Kingdom and contrasts with the full citizenship status conferred upon a predominantly white population living in another dependent territory. It is noted that most of the persons holding BNO or BOC status are Asians and that judgements on applications for citizenship appear to vary according to the country of origin, which leads to the assumption that this practice reveals elements of racial discrimination."[20]
 For example, the legislative councilor Dr Henrietta Ip criticised the idea of British National (Overseas) and again urged the UK Parliament, to grant full British citizenship to Hong Kong's British nationals in the council meeting held on 5 July 1989, saying that "we were born and live under British rule on British land.... It is therefore... our right to ask that you should give us back a place of abode so that we can continue to live under British rule on British land if we so wish.... I represent most of all those who live here to firmly request and demand you to grant us the right to full British citizenship so that we can, if we so wish, live in the United Kingdom, our Motherland... I say to you that the right of abode in the United Kingdom is the best and the only definitive guarantee.... With your failure to give us such a guarantee, reluctant as I may, I must advise the people of Hong Kong, and urgently now, each to seek for themselves a home of last resort even if they have to leave to do so. I do so because, as a legislator, my duty is with the people first and the stability and prosperity of Hong Kong second, although the two are so interdependent on each other...."
 The legislation is sometimes compared with Macau, a former colony of Portugal, where many residents of Chinese descent were granted right of abode in Portugal when Macau was still under colonial rule. They were not deprived of their right of abode after the transfer of sovereignty of Macau in 1999, their Portuguese passports and citizenship are valid and inheritable, and it turned out that many of them still choose to stay in Macau.
 Then Shadow Home Secretary, Jack Straw, said in a letter to the then Home Secretary Michael Howard dated 30 January 1997 that a claim that British National (Overseas) status amounts to British nationality "is pure sophistry".[21]
 The Economist also wrote critically in an article published on 3 July 1997 that "the failure to offer citizenship to most of Hong Kong's residents was shameful", and "it was the height of cynicism to hand 6m people over to a regime of proven brutality without allowing them any means to move elsewhere." The article commented that the real reason that the new Labour government still refused to give full British citizenship to other British Dependent Territories Citizens in around 1997 – because the United Kingdom was waiting until Hong Kong had been disposed of – "would be seen as highly cynical", as Baroness Symons, a Foreign Office minister, has conceded.[22]
 Bantustans within the borders of South Africa were classified as "self-governing" or "independent" and theoretically had some sovereign powers. Independent Bantustans (Transkei, Bophuthatswana, Venda, and Ciskei; also known as the TBVC states) were intended to be fully sovereign. In reality, they had no economic infrastructure worth mentioning and with few exceptions encompassed swaths of disconnected territory. This meant all the Bantustans were little more than puppet states controlled by South Africa. Throughout the existence of the independent Bantustans, South Africa remained the only country to recognise their independence. Nevertheless, internal organisations of many countries, as well as the South African government, lobbied for their recognition. For example, upon the foundation of Transkei, the Swiss-South African Association encouraged the Swiss government to recognise the new state. In 1976, leading up to a United States House of Representatives resolution urging the President to not recognise Transkei, the South African government intensely lobbied lawmakers to oppose the bill. While the bill fell short of its needed two-thirds vote, a simple majority of lawmakers nevertheless supported the resolution.[30] Each TBVC state extended recognition to the other independent Bantustans while South Africa showed its commitment to the notion of TBVC sovereignty by building embassies in the TBVC capitals.
 In South Africa, pass laws were designed to segregate the population, manage urbanisation, and allocate migrant labour. Also known as the natives law, pass laws severely limited the movements of not only blacks, but other peoples as well (e.g. Asians) by requiring them to carry pass books when outside their homelands or designated areas. Before the 1950s, this legislation largely applied to African men, and attempts to apply it to women in the 1910s and 1950s were met with significant protests. Pass laws would be one of the dominant features of the country's apartheid system, until it was effectively ended in 1986. The first internal passports in South Africa were introduced on 27 June 1797 by the Earl Macartney in an attempt to prevent natives from entering the Cape Colony.[31] In 1896 the South African Republic brought in two pass laws which required Africans to carry a metal badge and only those employed by a master were permitted to remain on the Rand. Those entering a "labour district" needed a special pass which entitled them to remain for three days.[32] The Natives (Urban Areas) Act of 1923 deemed urban areas in South Africa as "white" and required all black African men in cities and towns to carry around permits called "passes" at all times. Anyone found without a pass would be arrested immediately and sent to a rural area. It was replaced in 1945 by the Natives (Urban Areas) Consolidation Act, which imposed "influx control" on black men, and also set up guidelines for removing people deemed to be living idle lives from urban areas. This act outlined requirements for African peoples' "qualification" to reside legally in white metropolitan areas.[33]
 Thousands of Gujaratis returned to Uganda after Yoweri Museveni, the subsequent head of state of Uganda, criticised Idi Amin's policies and invited them to return.[29] According to Museveni, "Gujaratis have played a lead role in Uganda's social and industrial development. I knew that this community can do wonders for my country and they have been doing it for last many decades." The Gujaratis have resurfaced in Uganda and helped rebuild the economy of East Africa, and are financially well settled.[29][34]
 The 145 states which are parties to the convention are required to provide travel documents to refugees lawfully residing within their territory as per Article 28 of the convention. Refugee travel documents issued pursuant to Article 28 by certain states cannot be used for travel to the bearer's country of citizenship,[35]
 In India, special permits are required to travel across much of the country's north-east and requirements may vary within a given state. Special provisions are occasionally made for individuals from Bhutan or Nepal proceeding to or from their home country. Additionally, individuals arriving in the Andaman and Nicobar Islands from elsewhere in India receive passport stamps (see gallery at end of section), even though only foreigners are typically subject to permit requirements. Permits issued for minority regions in India include:
Restricted Area Permits and Protected Area Permits for foreigners in portions of north-eastern India and the Andaman and Nicobar Islands
Inner Line Permits for Indian citizens
In the Tibet Autonomous Region (Tibetan: བོད་རང་སྐྱོང་ལྗོངས། ; Chinese: 西藏自治区), two categories of permits are issued:
The Tibet Travel Permits (Chinese: 外国人入藏函 foreigners' entrance letter) required for all foreigners (as well as Chinese citizens from the Republic of China]]) to enter the region
The Alien Travel Permit required for holders of the Tibet Travel Permit to travel outside major urban and tourist areas of the region
The Military Permit (or Border Permit)[48] is required for travel to Ngari (Tibetan: མངའ་རིས་ས་ཁུལ་; Chinese: 阿里), Nyingchi (Tibetan: ཉིང་ཁྲི་ས། ; Chinese: 林芝) , and Nagqu (Tibetan: ནག་ཆུ།; Chinese: 那曲)
Additionally, special permits are issued to nationals of India and Bhutan for religious pilgrimages to Hindu and Buddhist holy sites in the Tibet Autonomous Region.[49][48]
 The area under the definition consists of the island groups of Taiwan, Penghu (the Pescadores), Kinmen (Quemoy), Matsu Islands and other islands.
 For example, Hong Kong Permanent Identity Card or Macau Identity Card and Home Return Permit (simplified Chinese: 回乡证; traditional Chinese: 回鄉證; pinyin: Huíxiāngzhèng) are required for Hong Kong or Macau Permanent Residents who are Chinese citizens to cross the border, whilst mainlanders require a Two-Way Permit (Chinese: 双程证).
 Documents required for travel between the PRC and ROC are:
The Mainland Travel Permit for Taiwan Residents (simplified Chinese: 台胞证; traditional Chinese: 臺胞證; pinyin: Táibāozhèng) issued by the PRC for entry to the mainland, which is also valid but not mandatory for entry to Hong Kong and Macau
The Taiwan Entry Permit (Chinese: 入臺證; pinyin: Rùtáizhèngg) issued to mainlanders by the ROC
The Kinmen-Matsu Permit (traditional Chinese: 金馬證; simplified Chinese: 金马证; pinyin: JīnMǎ zhèng; Pe̍h-ōe-jī: Kim-Má-chèng) issued to residents of Kinmen and Matsu (ROC-administered territories in Fujian as well as Penghu for travel to and from the mainland.
 The following documents are currently issued for this purpose:
For mainlanders emigrating to either of the two Special Administrative Regions, authorities in the mainland issue the One Way Travel Permit (Chinese: 单程证; pinyin: Dānchéngzhèng). As the policy is designed to curtail emigration from the mainland rather than immigration to either SAR, issuance is exclusively the responsibility of authorities in the mainland.
Since September 2018, authorities in the mainland have issued the Residence Permit for Hong Kong, Macao, and Taiwan Residents (Chinese: 港澳台居民居住证; pinyin: Gǎng-Aò-Tái Jūmín Jūzhùzhèng) authorising Chinese citizens from Hong Kong, Macau, and areas administered by the Republic of China to reside in the mainland. The permit is designed to resemble the national identity card issued to individuals with household registration in the mainland and enables holders to access public and private sector services that require a national identity card number.
 Nationals of the following countries are ineligible for the SEZ visa:[52]
 Afghanistan
 Algeria
 Bahrain
 Cameroon
 Egypt
 Iran
 Iraq
 Jordan
 Kuwait
 Lebanon
 Liberia
 Libya
 Morocco
 Oman
 Pakistan
 Palestine
 Saudi Arabia
 Somalia
 Sri Lanka
 Sudan
 Syria
 Turkey
 Uganda
 Yemen
 Non-visa-exempt ASEAN countries are:
 Cambodia
 Indonesia
 Laos
 Malaysia
 Myanmar
 Philippines
 Thailand
 Vietnam
 These are Greenland and the Faroe Islands. These areas do not maintain strict immigration controls with the Schengen Area, but border controls are sporadically enforced for customs purposes.
Chukotka Autonomous Okrug, all
In Leningrad Oblast – all Russian islands of Gulf of Finland, except Gogland, and 20-km strip along South coast of Gulf of Finland.
The Republic of North Ossetia-Alania, 85% of territory. Transit to border with Georgia and to border with South Ossetia are possible along the main roads. Tsey Gorge is opened for foreigners from 2012.
Part of Kaliningrad Oblast, approx. 15%.
Part of Moscow Oblast, approx. 10%.
Part of Arkhangelsk Oblast, include Novaya Zemlya, approx. 30%.
Part of Murmansk Oblast, approx. 15%. Transit to/from Norway is possible by main road.
Part of Kamchatka Krai.
Part of Primorsky Krai.
 This does not apply to accompanying spouses and minor children or members of travel groups. In addition, a valid identification document has to be produced to the hotel manager or staff.[75]
 For example, in April 2010, Malta introduced temporary checks due to Pope Benedict XVI's visit.[78] It reimposed checks in 2015 in the weeks surrounding the Commonwealth Heads of Government Meeting. In response to the European migrant crisis, several countries set up internal controls. In 2019, Denmark, worried about the bombings in Sweden, introduced passport controls to Swedish citizens for the first time since the 1950s.[79]
 Normally, the baseline from which the territorial sea is measured is the low-water line along the coast as marked on large-scale charts officially recognized by the coastal state. This is either the low-water mark closest to the shore, or alternatively it may be an unlimited distance from permanently exposed land, provided that some portion of elevations exposed at low tide but covered at high tide (like mud flats) is within 5.6 km of permanently exposed land. Straight baselines can alternatively be defined connecting fringing islands along a coast, across the mouths of rivers, or with certain restrictions across the mouths of bays. In this case, a bay is defined as "a well-marked indentation whose penetration is in such proportion to the width of its mouth as to contain land-locked waters and constitute more than a mere curvature of the coast. An indentation shall not, however, be regarded as a bay unless its area is as large as, or larger than, that of the semi-circle whose diameter is a line drawn across the mouth of that indentation". The baseline across the bay must also be no more than 44 km in length.
 All "archipelagic waters" within the outermost islands of an archipelagic state such as Indonesia or the Philippines are also considered internal waters, and are treated the same with the exception that innocent passage through them must be allowed. However, archipelagic states may designate certain sea lanes through these waters.
 About 20 countries and regions now have such zones including Canada, India,[138] Japan, Pakistan, Bangladesh, Finland, Norway, the United Kingdom, People's Republic of China, South Korea, Republic of China, United States, Sweden, Iceland and Iran. Russia and North Korea have unofficial ADIZs as well.[135][136][139]
 Uniquely, the archipelago is an entirely visa-free zone under the terms of the Svalbard Treaty,[192] which recognises the sovereignty of Norway over the Arctic archipelago of Svalbard but subjects it to certain stipulations and consequently not all Norwegian law applies, including border controls. The treaty regulates the demilitarisation of the archipelago. The signatories were given equal rights to engage in commercial activities (mainly coal mining) on the islands. As of 2012, Norway and Russia are making use of this right.
 As a standalone document, the BCC allows Mexican citizens to visit border areas in America when entering by land or sea directly from Mexico for less than 72 hours.[194] The document also functions as a full B1/B2 visa when presented with a valid Mexican passport.[195]
 For example, inter-state travel in Australia was restricted in 2020 due to the COVID-19 epidemic, for the first time since the 1918 flu pandemic.
 The local governments of most inhabited British Overseas Territories issue passports to British Overseas Territories citizens resident holding belonger status in the territory concerned, while the Chinese Special Administrative Regions of Hong Kong and Macau issue passports to Chinese citizens holding permanent residence in the region concerned.
 US Service Passports are issued by the Department of State to "certain non-personal services contractors who travel abroad in support of and pursuant to a contract with the U.S. government", to demonstrate the passport holder is travelling "to conduct work in support of the U.S. government while simultaneously indicating that the traveler has a more attenuated relationship with the U.S. government that does not justify a diplomatic or official passport."[259][260][261]
 The legal acquis has been identified as EEA-relevant by the EU Commission, which makes it under scrutiny for incorporation into the EEA Agreement by Iceland, Liechtenstein and Norway. However, the legal basis rely on Article 21 of the Treaty on the Functioning of the European Union, an article which is not reflected in the EEA Agreement.[272]
 Since Mexico permits the use of identity cards issued by Mexican consulates overseas[277] and other documents demonstrating Mexican citizenship for its citizens entering the country, Mexicans holding permanent residence in America are effectively not required by either country to hold a Mexican passport when travelling between the two countries
 Since Mexico permits the use of identity cards issued by Mexican consulates overseas[277] and other documents demonstrating Mexican citizenship for its citizens entering the country, Mexican citizens holding membership in the Kickapoo first nation are effectively not required by either country to hold a passport or Border Crossing Card when travelling between the two countries by land or sea
 Kosovo is the subject of a territorial dispute between the Republic of Kosovo and the Republic of Serbia. The Republic of Kosovo unilaterally declared independence on 17 February 2008. Serbia continues to claim it as part of its own sovereign territory. The two governments began to normalise relations in 2013, as part of the 2013 Brussels Agreement. Kosovo is currently recognised as an independent state by 97 out of the 193 United Nations member states. In total, 112 UN member states have recognised Kosovo at some point, of which 15 later withdrew their recognition.
 For instance, the following jurisdictions permit visitors to use American visas to clear border controls:
 Albania — 90 days;
 Antigua and Barbuda — 30 days; USD 100 visa waiver fee applies.
 Belize — 30 days; USD 50 visa waiver fee applies.
 Bosnia and Herzegovina — 30 days;[324]
 Canada — up to 6 months; only for citizens of Brazil, arriving by air with Electronic Travel Authorisation (eTA).
 Chile — 90 days; for nationals of China only.
 Colombia — 90 days; applicable to certain nationalities only.
 Costa Rica — 30 days or less if the visa is about to expire; must hold a multiple entry visa.
 Dominican Republic — 90 days;
 El Salvador — 90 days; not applicable to all nationalities.
 Georgia — 90 days within any 180-day period;
 Guatemala — 90 days; not applicable to all nationalities.
 Honduras — 90 days; not applicable to all nationalities.
 Jamaica — 30 days; not applicable to all nationalities.
 Mexico — 180 days;[325][326]
 Montenegro — 30 days;
 Nicaragua — 90 days; not applicable to all nationalities.
 North Macedonia — 15 days;
 Oman — certain nationalities can obtain an electronic Omani visa if holding a valid US visa.
 Panama — 30/180 days; must hold a visa valid for at least 2 more entries.
 Peru — 180 days; applicable to nationals of China and India only.
 Philippines — 7 days for nationals of China from the mainland; 14 days for nationals of India.
 Qatar — Non-visa-free nationals can obtain an electronic travel authorisation for 30 days if holding a valid US visa.
Taiwan Republic of China[l] (Taiwan) — certain nationalities can obtain an online travel authorisation if holding a valid American visa.
 São Tomé and Príncipe — 15 days;
 Serbia — 90 days;
 South Korea — 30 days;
 Turkey — certain nationalities can obtain an electronic Turkish visa if holding a valid US visa.
 UAE — Visa on arrival for 14 days; for nationals of India only. (Applicable for Indian citizens holding US Green Card.)[327]
 Nationals of China from the Mainland travelling as tourists and holding a valid visa issued by Australia, Canada, Japan, America, or a Schengen Area state may enter and stay without a visa for up to 7 days. Nationals of India holding a valid tourist, business or resident visa issued by Australia, Canada, Japan, Singapore, United Kingdom, America, or a Schengen Area state may enter and stay without a visa for up to 14 days. They may enter from any port of entry.[328]
 Eligible jurisdictions are:[333]
Brunei Brunei
Canada Canada
Hong Kong Hong Kong
Japan Japan
Malaysia Malaysia
Singapore Singapore
South Korea South Korea
United States United States
 Holders of the following passports are eligible:[336]
European Union European Union
Andorra Andorra
Iceland Iceland
Liechtenstein Liechtenstein
Monaco Monaco
 This includes nationals of[339]:
European Union All European Union citizens
 British Overseas Territories citizens of:
 Anguilla
 Cayman Islands
 Montserrat
 Turks and Caicos Islands
 Afghanistan
 Albania
 Andorra
 Angola
 Antigua and Barbuda
 Argentina
 Armenia
 Australia
 Azerbaijan
 Bahamas
 Barbados
 Belarus
 Belize
 Benin
 Bolivia
 Bosnia and Herzegovina
 Botswana
 Brazil
 Brunei
 Burundi
 Cambodia
 Cameroon
 Cape Verde
 Chile
 Colombia
 Comoros
 Costa Rica
 Cuba
 Djibouti
 Dominica
 Dominican Republic
 East Timor
 Ecuador
 El Salvador
 Equatorial Guinea
 Eritrea
 Eswatini
 Fiji
 Gabon
 Gambia
 Georgia
 Ghana
 Grenada
 Guatemala
 Guinea
 Guyana
 Haiti
 Honduras
 Iceland
 Israel
 Ivory Coast
 Jamaica
 Japan
 Jordan
 Kenya
 Kiribati
 Laos
 Lesotho
 Liberia
 Liechtenstein
 Madagascar
 Malawi
 Mali
 Marshall Islands
 Mauritius
 Mexico
 Micronesia
 Moldova
 Monaco
 Mongolia
 Montenegro
 Mozambique
 Myanmar
 Namibia
 Nauru
 New Zealand
 Cook Islands
 Niue
 Nicaragua
 Niger
 North Macedonia
 Norway
 Oman
 Palau
 Palestine
 Panama
 Papua New Guinea
 Paraguay
 Peru
 Philippines
 Russia
 Rwanda
 Saint Kitts and Nevis
 Saint Lucia
 Saint Vincent and the Grenadines
 Samoa
 San Marino
 Senegal
 Serbia
 Seychelles
 Sierra Leone
 Singapore
 Solomon Islands
 South Africa
 South Korea
 Suriname
  Switzerland
 Taiwan
 Tanzania
 Thailand
 Togo
 Tonga
 Trinidad and Tobago
 Tuvalu
 Uganda
 Ukraine
 United Arab Emirates
 United States
 Uruguay
 Vanuatu
  Vatican City
 Venezuela
 Vietnam
 Zambia
 Zimbabwe
Ahmedabad
Amritsar
Bagdogra
Bengaluru
Chandigarh
Chennai
Coimbatore
Delhi
Gaya
Goa
Guwahati
Hyderabad
Jaipur
Kochi
Kolkata
Kozhikode
Lucknow
Madurai
Mangaluru
Mumbai
Nagpur
Pune
Thiruvananthapuram
Tiruchirappalli
Varanasi
Visakhapatnam
Cochin
Goa
Mangalore
 Eligible jurisdictions are as follows:[343]
 Angola
 Argentina
 Australia
 Austria
 Azerbaijan
 Bahamas
 Bahrain
 Barbados
 Botswana
 Brunei
 Canada
 China
 Costa Rica
 Finland
 France
 Germany
 Ghana
 Iceland
 Indonesia
 Iran
 Italy
 Japan
 A holder of an EVW authorisation can visit and/or study in the UK for up to 6 months without a visa. An EVW is only valid for one entry, and a new EVW must be obtained each time an eligible person wishes to enter the UK to visit and/or study for up to 6 months without a visa. The EVW is valid for visits up to 90 days to Ireland once a holder has cleared immigration in the United Kingdom.
 In 1960, local border traffic on the Yugoslavia — Italy border in Istria registered almost seven million crossings in both directions.[387] In 1977 Yugoslavia had 55 local border traffic agreements with the neighboring countries, including 7 with Italy, 11 with Austria, 8 with Hungary, 10 with Romania, 8 with Bulgaria, 5 with Greece.[388]
 Currently operational rail checkpoints include:
In Belgium[405]
Brussel-Zuid/Bruxelles-Midi
In France[406]
Bourg-Saint-Maurice
Calais-Fréthun
Coquelles
Gare du Nord
Lille-Europe
Moûtiers
In the Netherlands[407]:
Rotterdam Centraal station
Amsterdam Centraal station
In the UK[406]
Ashford International
Ebbsfleet International
St Pancras International
Birmingham Airport
Bristol Airport
Cardiff Airport
East Midlands Airport
Edinburgh Airport
Eurostar St Pancras Terminal
Eurostar Brussels-Zuid Terminal
Gatwick Airport (North and South Terminals)
Glasgow Airport
Heathrow Airport (Terminals 2, 3, 4 and 5)
London City Airport
Luton Airport
Manchester Airport (Terminals 1, 2 and 3)
Stansted Airport
 Holders of the following foreign passports are eligible:[413]
Australia Australian passport
Germany German passport
South Korea Republic of Korea passport
Singapore Singapore passport
Thailand Thai passport
 Australia Australian passport
Hong Kong Hong Kong Special Administrative Region passport
Japan Japan passport
Malaysia Malaysia passport
New Zealand New Zealand passport
China People's Republic of China passport
South Korea Republic of Korea passport
Thailand Thailand passport
United Kingdom United Kingdom passport
United States United States passport
 Foreign passport holders eligible to register include:
Hong Kong Hong Kong Special Administrative Region passport
Macau Macao Special Administrative Region passport
Singapore Singapore passport
Taiwan Republic of China passport
United States United States passport[422]
 The following CARICOM jurisdictions are participating in the programme:[425]
Antigua and Barbuda
Barbados
Dominica
Grenada
Guyana
Jamaica
St. Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
St. Vincent and the Grenadines
Trinidad and Tobago
 The following airports are equipped with automated kiosks (except where otherwise stated, all participating airports are located in United States or its territories):[clarification needed][432]
United Arab Emirates Abu Dhabi International Airport (AUH)‡
Anchorage – Ted Stevens Anchorage International Airport (ANC)
Atlanta – Hartsfield-Jackson Atlanta International Airport (ATL)
Austin-Bergstrom International Airport (AUS)
Baltimore/Washington International Thurgood Marshall Airport (BWI)
Boston – Logan International Airport (BOS)
Burlington International Airport (BTV)‡
Canada Calgary International Airport (YYC)
Charlotte-Douglas International Airport (CLT)
Chicago Midway International Airport (MDW)‡
Chicago O'Hare International Airport (ORD)
Cincinnati/Northern Kentucky International Airport (CVG)
Cleveland Hopkins International Airport (CLE)
Dallas/Fort Worth International Airport (DFW)
Daniel K. Inouye International Airport (HNL)
Denver International Airport (DEN)
Detroit Metropolitan Airport (DTW)
Republic of Ireland Dublin Airport (DUB)‡
Canada Edmonton International Airport (YEG)
Fairbanks International Airport (FAI)
Fort Lauderdale/Hollywood International Airport (FLL)
Guam International Airport (GUM)
Canada Halifax Stanfield International Airport (YHZ)
Houston George Bush Intercontinental Airport (IAH)
John F. Kennedy International Airport, New York City (JFK)
John Wayne Airport (SNA)‡
Lambert-St. Louis International Airport (STL)
Los Angeles International Airport (LAX)
Luis Muñoz Marín International Airport (SJU)
The Bahamas Lynden Pindling International Airport, Bahamas (NAS)‡
McCarran International Airport, Las Vegas (LAS)
Miami International Airport (MIA)
Milwaukee Mitchell International Airport, Milwaukee (MKE)
Minneapolis/St. Paul International Airport (MSP)
Canada Montréal–Pierre Elliott Trudeau International Airport (YUL)
Newark Liberty International Airport (EWR)
Oakland International Airport (OAK)‡
Orlando International Airport (MCO)
Orlando-Sanford International Airport (SFB)
Canada Ottawa Macdonald–Cartier International Airport (YOW)
Philadelphia International Airport (PHL)
Phoenix Sky Harbor International Airport (PHX)
Pittsburgh International Airport (PIT)
Portland International Airport (PDX)
Aruba Queen Beatrix International Airport, Aruba (AUA)‡
Raleigh-Durham International Airport (RDU)‡
Saipan International Airport (SPN)‡
Salt Lake City International Airport (SLC)
San Antonio International Airport (SAT)
San Diego International Airport (SAN)
San Francisco International Airport (SFO)
San Jose International Airport (SJC)‡
Seattle-Tacoma International Airport – SeaTac (SEA)
Republic of Ireland Shannon Airport (SNN)‡
Tampa International Airport (TPA)
Canada Toronto Pearson International Airport (YYZ)
Canada Vancouver International Airport (YVR)
Washington-Dulles International Airport (IAD)
Canada Winnipeg James Armstrong Richardson International Airport (YWG)
The ‡ indicates there are no Global Entry enrollment centres at these sites. Note that enrolment centres in Canada are NEXUS enrolment centres staffed by American and Canadian border control officers

More than 21,180 CBP Officers inspect and examine passengers and cargo at over 300 ports of entry.
Over 2,200 CBP Agriculture Specialists work to curtail the spread of harmful pests and plant and animal diseases that may harm America's farms and food supply or cause bio- and agro-terrorism.
Over 21,370 Border Patrol Agents protect and patrol over 3000 kilometres of border with Mexico and over 8000 kilometres of border with Canada.
Nearly 1,050 Air and Marine Interdiction Agents prevent people, weapons, narcotics, and conveyances from illegal entry by air and water.
Nearly 2,500 employees in CBP revenue positions collect over $30 billion annually in entry duties and taxes through the enforcement of trade and tariff laws. In addition, these employees fulfill the agency's trade mission by appraising and classifying imported merchandise. These employees serve in positions such as import specialist, auditor, international trade specialist, and textile analyst.
The primary goal of the CBP Canine Programme is terrorist detection and apprehension. The programme conducts the largest number of working dogs of any federal law enforcement agency. K-9 teams are assigned to 73 commercial ports and 74 Border Patrol stations throughout the nation.[441][442]
 When deficiencies in the functioning of the border management system of a Member State are identified by Frontex, the Agency will be empowered to require that Member States to take timely corrective action. In urgent situations that put the functioning of the Schengen area at risk or when deficiencies have not been remedied, the Agency will be able to step in to ensure that action is taken on the ground even where there is no request for assistance from the Member State concerned or where that Member State considers that there is no need for additional intervention.
Land Commands
Tuas Command
Woodlands Command
Woodlands Train Checkpoint
Old Woodlands Checkpoint (Closed to most traffic except for motorcycles and lorries carrying cargo.)
Airport Command
Singapore Changi Airport
Seletar Airport
Air Cargo Command
Airport Logistics Park of Singapore
Changi Airfreight Centre
Parcel Post Section
Ports Command
Port of Singapore
Sembawang Port
Jurong Port
Keppel Distripark
Ports Command HQ
Coastal Command
Singapore Cruise Centre
Marina Bay Cruise Centre Singapore
Tanah Merah Ferry Terminal
Changi Ferry Terminal
Changi Point Ferry Terminal
Jurong Fishery Port
Marina South Pier
West Coast Pier
 The organisation's primary responsibilities are:[486][487]
checking the immigration status of people arriving in and departing the UK
searching baggage, vehicles and cargo for unlawful goods or unauthorised migrants
patrolling the British coastline and searching vessels
gathering intelligence
alerting the police and security services to people of interest
 The policy proved extremely unpopular with the public, with approximately 25% of Americans supporting the policy, less than any recent major piece of legislation.[490] The detainment of children by the U.S. government has been compared to the Nazi concentration camps by some observers and politicians.[491][492]
 The policy has been condemned by the American Academy of Pediatrics, the American College of Physicians and the American Psychiatric Association.[493] Together, they represent more than 250,000 doctors in the United States.[494] Dr. Irwin Redlener, who co-founded Children's Health Fund, called the policy "dehumanising" and described it as a form of child abuse.[495] A number of concerned researchers and clinicians signed an open letter to Homeland Security Secretary Nielsen calling on her to end the migrant child separations, writing, "Decades of psychological and brain research have demonstrated that forced parental separation and placement in incarceration-like facilities can have profound immediate, long-term, and irreparable harm on infant and child development."[496]
 The policy has been condemned or criticised by:
The United States Conference of Catholic Bishops
The National Association of Evangelicals[497]
The Greek Orthodox Archdiocese of America[498]
Episcopal Church
United Methodist Church
African Methodist Episcopal Church
Presbyterian Church
Evangelical Lutheran Church
The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints (LDS Church)[499]
Presidency of Donald Trump
From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
Jump to navigationJump to search
For a chronological guide to this subject, see Timeline of the Donald Trump presidency.
Donald Trump
Presidency of Donald Trump
January 20, 2017 – January 20, 2021
Cabinet	See list
Party	Republican
Election	2016
Seat	White House
← Barack ObamaJoe Biden →
Seal of the President of the United States.svg
Seal of the President
Archived website
Library website
Portrait of Donald Trump	
This article is part of
a series about
Donald Trump
Political positionsElectoral historyPublic image
Business and personal
45th President of the United States
Presidency timelineTransitionInauguration
Tenure
Executive actions proclamationspardonsTrips internationalNorth Korea summits SingaporeHanoiDMZHelsinki summitRiyadh summitShutdowns January 20182018–2019PollsLawsuitsProtests federal law enforcement deploymentSt. John's Church photo opSocial mediaVeracity of statementsKillings al-BaghdadiSoleimaniTrumpismTikTok controversy
Policies
Economy tax cutstariffsChina trade warfarmer bailoutsEnvironment Paris withdrawalForeign policy America FirstSaudi Arabia arms dealIran dealGulf crisisJerusalemGolan HeightsPalestine peace planAbraham AccordsUSMCADoha AgreementImmigration travel banwallfamily separationmigrant detentionstroop deploymentsnational emergencyInfrastructureSocial issues First Step ActcannabisSpace
Appointments
Cabinet formationAmbassadorsFederal judges GorsuchKavanaughBarrettSupreme Court candidatesExecutivesU.S. Attorneys
Presidential campaigns
Impeachments
EffortsFirst impeachment Trump–Ukraine scandalHouse inquirySenate trialSecond impeachment Capitol attackSenate trial
Interactions involving Russia
COVID-19 pandemic
TaskforceCommunicationGovernment response Stimulus bills CARES ActConsolidated Appropriations Act, 2021Operation Warp SpeedWhite House outbreakInterference with science agencies
Donald Trump's signature
Seal of the President of the United States
vte
Donald Trump's tenure as the 45th president of the United States began with his inauguration on January 20, 2017, and ended on January 20, 2021. Trump, a Republican originally from New York City, took office following his Electoral College victory over Democratic nominee Hillary Clinton in the 2016 presidential election, in which he did not win a plurality of the popular vote. Trump made an unprecedented number of false or misleading statements during his campaign and presidency. His presidency ended with his defeat in the 2020 presidential election by Democrat Joe Biden after one term in office. It was the first presidency since that of Herbert Hoover in which a president was not reelected and his party lost its majorities in both chambers of Congress.[1]

Trump was unsuccessful in his efforts to repeal the Affordable Care Act (ACA) but rescinded the individual mandate and took measures to hinder the ACA's functioning. Trump sought substantial spending cuts to major welfare programs, including Medicare and Medicaid. He signed the Great American Outdoors Act, pursued energy independence, reversed numerous environmental regulations, and withdrew from the Paris Agreement on climate change. He signed criminal justice reform through the First Step Act and successfully appointed Neil Gorsuch, Brett Kavanaugh, and Amy Coney Barrett to the Supreme Court. In economic policy, he partially repealed the Dodd–Frank Act and signed the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017. He enacted tariffs, triggering retaliatory tariffs from China, Canada, Mexico, and the EU. He withdrew from the Trans-Pacific Partnership negotiations and signed the USMCA, a successor agreement to NAFTA. The federal deficit increased under Trump due to spending increases and tax cuts.

He implemented a controversial family separation policy for migrants apprehended at the U.S.–Mexico border. Trump's demand for the federal funding of a border wall resulted in the longest US government shutdown in history. He deployed federal law enforcement forces in response to the racial unrest in 2020. Trump's "America First" foreign policy was characterized by unilateral actions, disregarding traditional allies. The administration implemented a major arms sale to Saudi Arabia; denied citizens from several Muslim-majority countries entry into the U.S; recognized Jerusalem as the capital of Israel; and brokered the Abraham Accords, a series of normalization agreements between Israel and various Arab states. His administration withdrew U.S. troops from northern Syria, allowing Turkey to occupy the area. His administration also made a conditional deal with the Taliban to withdraw U.S. troops from Afghanistan in 2021. Trump met North Korea's leader Kim Jong-un three times. Trump withdrew the U.S. from the Iran nuclear agreement and later escalated tensions in the Persian Gulf by ordering the assassination of General Qasem Soleimani.

Robert Mueller's Special Counsel investigation (2017–2019) concluded that Russia interfered to favor Trump's candidacy and that while the prevailing evidence "did not establish that members of the Trump campaign conspired or coordinated with the Russian government," possible obstructions of justice occurred during the course of that investigation.

Trump attempted to pressure Ukraine to announce investigations into his political rival Joe Biden, triggering his first impeachment by the House of Representatives on December 18, 2019, but he was acquitted by the Senate on February 5, 2020.

Trump reacted slowly to the COVID-19 pandemic, ignored or contradicted many recommendations from health officials in his messaging, and promoted misinformation about unproven treatments and the availability of testing.

Following his loss in the 2020 presidential election to Biden, Trump refused to concede and initiated an aggressive pursuit to overturn the results, alleging unproven claims of widespread electoral fraud. On January 6, 2021, during a rally at The Ellipse, Trump urged his supporters to "fight like hell" and march to the Capitol, where the electoral votes were being counted by Congress in order to formalize Biden's victory. A mob of Trump supporters stormed the Capitol, suspending the count as Vice President Mike Pence and other members of Congress were evacuated. On January 13, the House voted to impeach Trump an unprecedented second time for "incitement of insurrection," but he was later acquitted by the Senate again on February 13, after he had already left office.


Contents
1	2016 election
2	Transition period, inauguration, and first 100 days
3	Administration
3.1	Cabinet
3.2	Dismissal of James Comey
4	Judicial appointments
4.1	Supreme Court nominations
5	Leadership style
5.1	False and misleading statements
5.2	Rule of law
5.3	Relationship with the news media
5.4	Twitter
6	Domestic affairs
6.1	Agriculture
6.2	Consumer protections
6.3	Criminal justice
6.3.1	Presidential pardons and commutations
6.3.2	Drug policy
6.3.3	Capital punishment
6.4	Disaster relief
6.4.1	Hurricanes Harvey, Irma and Maria
6.4.2	California wildfires
6.5	Economy
6.5.1	Taxation
6.5.2	Trade
6.6	Education
6.7	Election integrity
6.8	Energy
6.9	Environment
6.10	Government size and regulations
6.11	Guns
6.12	Health care
6.12.1	Reproductive rights
6.12.2	Opioid epidemic
6.12.3	COVID-19 pandemic
6.13	Housing and urban policy
6.14	Immigration
6.14.1	Family separation policy
6.14.2	Travel bans
6.14.3	2018–2019 federal government shutdown
6.15	LGBT rights
6.16	George Floyd protests
6.16.1	Photo-op at St. John's Episcopal Church
6.16.2	Deployment of federal law enforcement to cities
6.17	Science
6.18	Space
6.19	Surveillance
6.20	Veterans affairs
6.21	Voting rights
6.22	White nationalists and Charlottesville rally
7	Foreign affairs
7.1	Afghanistan
7.2	China
7.3	Cuba
7.4	North Korea
7.5	Turkey
7.6	Iran
7.7	Saudi Arabia
7.8	Israel / Palestine
7.9	United Arab Emirates
7.10	Defense
8	Russia and related investigations
8.1	Special Counsel's report
8.2	Counter-investigations
9	Ethics
9.1	Role of lobbyists
9.2	Potential conflicts of interest
9.3	Saudi Arabia
9.4	Transparency and data availability
9.5	Hatch Act violations
9.6	Security clearances
9.7	Impeachment inquiry
9.8	Use of the Office of President
9.8.1	Cost of trips
10	Elections during the Trump presidency
10.1	2018 mid-term elections
10.2	2020 re-election campaign
10.2.1	Transition
10.2.2	Storming of the U.S. Capitol
10.2.3	Farewell address
11	Historical evaluations and public opinion
11.1	Popular polling
11.2	Democratic backsliding
12	See also
13	References
14	Further reading
15	External links
2016 election
Main article: 2016 United States presidential election
Further information: 2016 United States elections, Donald Trump 2016 presidential campaign, 2016 Republican Party presidential primaries, and 2016 Republican National Convention

The 2016 presidential electoral vote. Five individuals besides Trump and Clinton received electoral votes from faithless electors.
On November 9, 2016, Republicans Donald Trump of New York and Governor Mike Pence of Indiana won the 2016 election, defeating Democrats former Secretary of State Hillary Clinton of New York and Senator Tim Kaine of Virginia. Trump won 304 electoral votes compared to Clinton's 227, though Clinton won a plurality of the popular vote, receiving nearly 2.9 million more votes than Trump. Trump thus became the fifth person to win the presidency while losing the popular vote.[2] In the concurrent congressional elections, Republicans maintained majorities in both the House of Representatives and the Senate.

Transition period, inauguration, and first 100 days
Main articles: Presidential transition of Donald Trump and Inauguration of Donald Trump
See also: First 100 days of Donald Trump's presidency

Outgoing President Barack Obama and President-elect Donald Trump in the Oval Office on November 10, 2016

Inauguration swearing-in ceremony
Trump was inaugurated on January 20, 2017. He was sworn in by Chief Justice John Roberts.[3] In his seventeen-minute inaugural address, Trump painted a dark picture of contemporary America, pledging to end "American carnage" caused by urban crime and saying America's "wealth, strength, and confidence has dissipated" by jobs lost overseas.[4] He declared his strategy would be "America First."[3] At the age of 70, Trump surpassed Ronald Reagan to become the oldest person to assume the presidency until that point[5] and was also the first without any prior government or military experience.[6] The largest single-day protest in U.S. history, the Women's March, took place the day after his inauguration and was driven by opposition to Trump and his policies and views.[7]

One of Trump's major first year accomplishments, made as part of a "100‑day pledge," was the confirmation of Neil Gorsuch as an associate justice of the Supreme Court. Despite the Republican Party holding a majority in both houses of Congress, however, he was unable to fulfill another hundred-day promise, repealing the Affordable Care Act ("Obamacare").[8]

Administration
The Trump Cabinet
Office	Name	Term
President	Donald Trump	2017–2021
Vice President	Mike Pence	2017–2021
Secretary of State	Rex Tillerson	2017–2018
Mike Pompeo	2018–2021
Secretary of the Treasury	Steven Mnuchin	2017–2021
Secretary of Defense	Jim Mattis	2017–2019
Mark Esper	2019–2020
Attorney General	Jeff Sessions	2017–2018
William Barr	2019–2020
Secretary of the Interior	Ryan Zinke	2017–2019
David Bernhardt	2019–2021
Secretary of Agriculture	Sonny Perdue	2017–2021
Secretary of Commerce	Wilbur Ross	2017–2021
Secretary of Labor	Alexander Acosta	2017–2019
Eugene Scalia	2019–2021
Secretary of Health and
Human Services	Tom Price	2017
Alex Azar	2018–2021
Secretary of Housing and
Urban Development	Ben Carson	2017–2021
Secretary of Transportation	Elaine Chao	2017–2021
Secretary of Energy	Rick Perry	2017–2019
Dan Brouillette	2019–2021
Secretary of Education	Betsy DeVos	2017–2021
Secretary of Veterans Affairs	David Shulkin	2017–2018
Robert Wilkie	2018–2021
Secretary of Homeland Security	John F. Kelly	2017
Kirstjen Nielsen	2017–2019
Chad Wolf (acting)	2019–2021
Administrator of the
Environmental Protection Agency	Scott Pruitt	2017–2018
Andrew Wheeler	2018–2021
Director of the Office of
Management and Budget	Mick Mulvaney	2017–2020
Russell Vought	2020–2021
Director of National Intelligence	Dan Coats	2017–2019
John Ratcliffe	2020–2021
Director of the
Central Intelligence Agency	Mike Pompeo	2017–2018
Gina Haspel	2018–2021
United States Trade Representative	Robert Lighthizer	2017–2021
Ambassador to the United Nations	Nikki Haley	2017–2018
Kelly Craft	2019–2021
Administrator of the
Small Business Administration	Linda McMahon	2017–2019
Jovita Carranza	2020–2021
Chief of Staff	Reince Priebus	2017
John F. Kelly	2017–2019
Mark Meadows	2020–2021
Further information: Political appointments by Donald Trump
The Trump administration was characterized by record turnover, particularly among White House staff. 2018, 43% of senior White House positions had turned over.[9] The administration had a higher turnover rate in the first two and a half years than the five previous presidents did over their entire terms.[10]

By October 2019, one in 14 of Trump's political appointees were former lobbyists; less than three years into his presidency, Trump had appointed more than four times as many lobbyists than Obama did over the course of his first six years in office.[11]

Cabinet
Main articles: Cabinet of Donald Trump and List of Trump administration dismissals and resignations
Days after the presidential election, Trump selected RNC Chairman Reince Priebus as his Chief of Staff.[12] Trump chose Alabama Senator Jeff Sessions for the position of Attorney General.[13]

In February 2017, Trump formally announced his cabinet structure, elevating the Director of National Intelligence and Director of the CIA to cabinet level. The Chair of the Council of Economic Advisers, which had been added to the cabinet by Obama in 2009, was removed from the cabinet. Trump's cabinet consisted of 24 members, more than Obama at 23 or George W. Bush at 21.[14]

On February 13, 2017, Trump fired Michael Flynn from the post of National Security Advisor on grounds that he had lied to Vice President Pence about his communications with Russian Ambassador Sergey Kislyak; Flynn later pleaded guilty to lying to the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) about his contacts with Russia.[15] Flynn was fired amidst the ongoing controversy concerning Russian interference in the 2016 election and accusations that Trump's electoral team colluded with Russian agents.

In July 2017, John F. Kelly, who had served as secretary of Homeland Security, replaced Priebus as Chief of Staff.[16] In September 2017, Tom Price resigned as Secretary of HHS amid criticism over his use of private charter jets for personal travel.[17] Kirstjen Nielsen succeeded Kelly as Secretary in December 2017.[18] Secretary of State Rex Tillerson was fired via a tweet in March 2018; Trump appointed Mike Pompeo to replace Tillerson and Gina Haspel to succeed Pompeo as the Director of the CIA.[19] In the wake of a series of scandals, Scott Pruitt resigned as Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) in July 2018.[20]

Secretary of Defense Jim Mattis informed Trump of his resignation following Trump's abrupt December 19, 2018 announcement that the remaining 2,000 American troops in Syria would be withdrawn, against the recommendations of his military and civilian advisors. In his resignation letter, Mattis appeared to criticize Trump's worldview, praising NATO, which Trump often derided, as well as the Defeat-ISIS coalition Trump had just decided to abandon. Mattis's resignation became effective on December 31, 2018.[21]

Trump fired numerous Inspectors General of agencies, including those who were probing the Trump administration and close Trump associates. In 2020, he fired five inspectors general in two months. The Washington Post wrote, "For the first time since the system was created in the aftermath of the Watergate scandal, inspectors general find themselves under systematic attack from the president, putting independent oversight of federal spending and operations at risk."[22]

Dismissal of James Comey
Main article: Dismissal of James Comey
Trump dismissed FBI Director James Comey on May 9, 2017, saying he had accepted the recommendations of Attorney General Sessions and Deputy Attorney General Rod Rosenstein to dismiss Comey. Sessions's recommendation was based on Rosenstein's, while Rosenstein wrote that Comey should be dismissed for his handling of the conclusion of the FBI investigation into the Hillary Clinton email controversy.[23] On May 10, Trump met Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov and Russian Ambassador Sergey Kislyak. Based on White House notes of the meeting, Trump told the Russians, "I just fired the head of the FBI. He was crazy, a real nut job ... I faced great pressure because of Russia. That's taken off."[24] On May 11, Trump said in a videoed interview, "... regardless of recommendation, I was going to fire Comey ... in fact, when I decided to just do it, I said to myself, I said, you know, this Russia thing with Trump and Russia is a made-up story."[25] On May 18, Rosenstein told members of the U.S. Senate that he recommended Comey's dismissal while knowing Trump had already decided to fire Comey.[26] In the aftermath of Comey's firing, the events were compared with those of the "Saturday Night Massacre" during Richard Nixon's administration and there was debate over whether Trump had provoked a constitutional crisis, as he had dismissed the man leading an investigation into Trump's associates.[27] Trump's statements raised concerns of potential obstruction of justice.[28] In Comey's memo about a February 2017 meeting with Trump, Comey said Trump attempted to persuade him to abort the investigation into General Flynn.[29]

Judicial appointments
Further information: Donald Trump Supreme Court candidates, List of federal judges appointed by Donald Trump, and Donald Trump judicial appointment controversies

Supreme Court nominee Amy Coney Barrett and her family with Trump on September 26, 2020
Senate Republicans, led by Senate Majority Leader Mitch McConnell, prioritized confirming Trump's judicial appointees, doing so rapidly.[30] By November 2018, Trump had appointed 29 judges to the U.S. courts of appeals, more than any modern president in the first two years of a presidential term.[31] Trump ultimately appointed 226 Article III federal judges and 260 federal judges in total.[32] His appointees, who were usually affiliated with the conservative Federalist Society, shifted the judiciary to the right.[33] A third of Trump's appointees were under 45 years old when appointed, far higher than under previous presidents.[33] Trump's judicial nominees were less likely to be female or ethnic minority than those of the previous administration.[34] Of Trump's judicial appointments to the U.S. courts of appeals (circuit courts), two-thirds were white men, compared to 31% of Obama nominees and 63% of George W. Bush nominees.[33][35]

Supreme Court nominations
Trump made three nominations to the Supreme Court: Neil Gorsuch, Brett Kavanaugh, and Amy Coney Barrett:

Trump nominated Neil Gorsuch in January 2017 to fill the vacancy left by the death of Justice Antonin Scalia in February 2016, which had not been filled by Obama because the Republican-majority Senate did not consider the nomination of Merrick Garland. Gorsuch was confirmed in April 2017 in a mostly party-line vote of 54–45.[36]
Trump nominated Brett Kavanaugh in July 2018 to replace retiring Justice Anthony Kennedy, who was considered a key swing vote on the Supreme Court. The Senate confirmed Kavanaugh in a mostly party-line vote of 50–48 in August 2018 after allegations that Kavanaugh had attempted to rape another student when they were both in high school; Kavanaugh denied the allegation.[37][38]
Trump nominated Amy Coney Barrett in September 2020 to fill the vacancy left by the death of Justice Ruth Bader Ginsburg. Ginsburg was considered part of the Court's liberal wing and her replacement with a conservative jurist substantially changed the ideological composition of the Supreme Court.[39] Democrats opposed the nomination, arguing that the court vacancy should not be filled until after the 2020 presidential election. On October 26, 2020, the Senate confirmed Barrett by a mostly party-line vote of 52–48, with all Democrats opposing her confirmation.[40]
Leadership style
Trump's own staffers, subordinates, and allies frequently characterized Trump as infantile.[41] Trump reportedly eschewed reading detailed briefing documents, including the President's Daily Brief, in favor of receiving oral briefings.[42][43] Intelligence briefers reportedly repeated the President's name and title in order to keep his attention.[44][45] He was also known to acquire information by watching up to eight hours of television each day, most notably Fox News programs such as Fox & Friends and Hannity, whose broadcast talking points Trump sometimes repeated in public statements, particularly in early morning tweets.[46][47][48] Trump reportedly expressed anger if intelligence analyses contradicted his beliefs or public statements, with two briefers stating they had been instructed by superiors to not provide Trump with information that contradicted his public statements.[45]

Trump had reportedly fostered chaos as a management technique, resulting in low morale and policy confusion among his staff.[49][50] Trump proved unable to effectively compromise during the 115th U.S. Congress, which led to significant governmental gridlock and few notable legislative accomplishments despite Republican control of both houses of Congress.[51] Presidential historian Doris Kearns Goodwin found Trump lacked several traits of an effective leader, including "humility, acknowledging errors, shouldering blame and learning from mistakes, empathy, resilience, collaboration, connecting with people and controlling unproductive emotions."[52]

In January 2018, Axios reported Trump's working hours were typically around 11:00 a.m. to 6:00 p.m. (a later start and an earlier end compared to the beginning of his presidency) and that he was holding fewer meetings during his working hours in order to accommodate Trump's desire for more unstructured free time (labelled as "executive time").[53] In 2019, Axios published Trump's schedule from November 7, 2018, to February 1, 2019, and calculated that around sixty percent of the time between 8:00 a.m. and 5:00 p.m. was "executive time."[54]

False and misleading statements
Main article: Veracity of statements by Donald Trump

Fact-checkers from The Washington Post,[55] (orange) the Toronto Star,[56] and CNN[57] (blue) compiled data on "false or misleading claims" and "false claims," respectively. The peaks in late 2018 correspond to the midterm elections, in late 2019 to his impeachment inquiry, and in late 2020 to the presidential election. The Post reported 30,573 false or misleading claims in 4 years,[55] an average of more than 20.9 per day.
The number and scale of Trump's statements in public speeches, remarks, and tweets identified as false by scholars, fact-checkers, and commentators were characterized as unprecedented for an American president[58][59] and even unprecedented in U.S. politics.[60] The New Yorker called falsehoods a distinctive part of his political identity,[61] and they have also been described by Republican political advisor Amanda Carpenter as a gaslighting tactic.[62] His White House had dismissed the idea of objective truth[63] and his campaign and presidency have been described as being "post-truth"[64] and hyper-Orwellian.[65] Trump's rhetorical signature included disregarding data from federal institutions that was incompatible to his arguments; quoting hearsay, anecdotal evidence, and questionable claims in partisan media; denying reality (including his own statements); and distracting when falsehoods were exposed.[66]

During the first year of Trump's presidency, The Washington Post's fact-checking team wrote that Trump was "the most fact-challenged politician" it had "ever encountered ... the pace and volume of the president's misstatements means that we cannot possibly keep up."[67] As president, Trump made more than 5,000 false or misleading claims by September 2018,[68] and by April 2020, Trump had made 18,000 false or misleading claims while in office, an average of more than 15 claims daily.[69] The rate of Trump's false and misleading statements increased in the weeks preceding the 2018 midterm elections[70] and in the first half of 2020.[69] The most common false or misleading claims by Trump involved the economy and jobs, his border wall proposal, and his tax legislation;[69] he had also made false statements regarding prior administrations[69] as well as other topics, including crime, terrorism, immigration, Russia and the Mueller probe, the Ukraine probe, immigration, and the COVID-19 pandemic.[71] Senior administration officials had also regularly given false, misleading, or tortured statements to the news media,[72][73] which made it difficult for the news media to take official statements seriously.[72]

Rule of law
Shortly before Trump secured the 2016 Republican nomination, The New York Times reported "legal experts across the political spectrum say" Trump's rhetoric reflected "a constitutional worldview that shows contempt for the First Amendment, the separation of powers and the rule of law," adding "many conservative and libertarian legal scholars warn that electing Mr. Trump is a recipe for a constitutional crisis."[74] Political scientists warned that candidate Trump's rhetoric and actions mimicked those of other politicians who ultimately turned authoritarian once in office.[75] Some scholars have concluded that during Trump's tenure as president and largely due to his actions and rhetoric, the U.S. has experienced democratic backsliding.[76][77] Many prominent Republicans have expressed similar concerns that Trump's perceived disregard for the rule of law betrayed conservative principles.[78][79][80][81]

During the first two years of his presidency, Trump repeatedly sought to influence the Justice Department to investigate his political adversaries – specifically, Hillary Clinton, the Democratic National Committee, and FBI Director James Comey, whom he saw as his adversary. He persistently repeated a variety of allegations, at least some of which had already been investigated or debunked.[82][83] In spring 2018, Trump told White House counsel Don McGahn he wanted to order the DOJ to prosecute Clinton and Comey, but McGahn advised Trump such action would constitute abuse of power and invite possible impeachment.[84] In May 2018, Trump demanded that the DOJ investigate "whether or not the FBI/DOJ infiltrated or surveilled the Trump Campaign for Political Purposes," which the DOJ referred to its inspector general.[85] Although it is not unlawful for a president to exert influence on the DOJ to open an investigation, presidents have assiduously avoided doing so to prevent perceptions of political interference.[85][86]

Attorney General Jeff Sessions resisted several demands by Trump and his allies for investigations of political opponents, causing Trump to repeatedly express frustration, saying at one point, "I don't have an attorney general."[87] While criticizing the special counsel investigation in July 2019, Trump falsely claimed that the Constitution ensures that "I have to the right to do whatever I want as president."[88] Trump had on multiple occasions either suggested or promoted views of extending his presidency beyond normal term limits.[89][90]

Trump frequently criticized the independence of the judiciary branch for unfairly interfering in his administration's ability to decide policy.[91] In November 2018, in an extraordinary rebuke of a sitting president, Supreme Court Chief Justice John Roberts criticized Trump's characterization of a judge who had ruled against his policies as an "Obama judge," adding "That's not law."[92] In October 2020, twenty Republican former U.S. attorneys, who were appointed by every GOP president dating to Eisenhower, characterized Trump as "a threat to the rule of law in our country." Greg Brower, who worked in the Trump administration, asserted, "It's clear that President Trump views the Justice Department and the FBI as his own personal law firm and investigative agency."[93]

Relationship with the news media

Trump talks to the press in the Oval Office on March 21, 2017, before signing S.422 (the NASA Transition Authorization Act)

Trump speaks to reporters on the White House South Lawn in June 2019
Early into his presidency, Trump developed a highly contentious relationship with the news media, repeatedly referring to them as the "fake news media" and "the enemy of the people."[94] As a candidate, Trump had refused press credentials for offending publications but said he would not do so if elected.[95] Trump both privately and publicly mused about taking away critical reporters' White House press credentials.[96] At the same time, the Trump White House gave temporary press passes to far-right pro-Trump fringe outlets, such as InfoWars and The Gateway Pundit, which are known for publishing hoaxes and conspiracy theories.[96][97][98]

On his first day in office, Trump falsely accused journalists of understating the size of the crowd at his inauguration and called the news media "among the most dishonest human beings on earth." Trump's claims were notably defended by Press Secretary Sean Spicer, who claimed the inauguration crowd had been the biggest in history, a claim disproven by photographs.[99] Trump's senior adviser Kellyanne Conway then defended Spicer when asked about the falsehood, saying it was an "alternative fact," not a falsehood.[100]

The administration frequently sought to punish and blocked access for reporters that broke stories about the administration.[101][102][103][104] Trump frequently criticized right-wing media outlet Fox News for being insufficiently supportive of him,[105] threatening to lend his support for alternatives to Fox News on the right.[106] On August 16, 2018, the Senate unanimously passed a resolution affirming that "the press is not the enemy of the people."[107]

The relationship between Trump, the news media, and fake news has been studied. One study found that between October 7 and November 14, 2016, while one in four Americans visited a fake news website, "Trump supporters visited the most fake news websites, which were overwhelmingly pro-Trump" and "almost 6 in 10 visits to fake news websites came from the 10% of people with the most conservative online information diets."[108][109] Brendan Nyhan, one of the authors of the study, said in an interview, "People got vastly more misinformation from Donald Trump than they did from fake news websites."[110]


During a joint news conference, Trump said he was "very proud" to hear Brazilian president Jair Bolsonaro use the term "fake news."[111]
In October 2018, Trump praised U.S. Representative Greg Gianforte for assaulting political reporter Ben Jacobs in 2017.[112] According to analysts, the incident marked the first time the president has "openly and directly praised a violent act against a journalist on American soil."[113] Later that month, as CNN and prominent Democrats were targeted with mail bombs, Trump initially condemned the bomb attempts but shortly thereafter blamed the "Mainstream Media that I refer to as Fake News" for causing "a very big part of the anger we see today in our society."[114]

The Trump Justice Department obtained by court order the 2017 phone logs or email metadata of reporters from CNN, The New York Times, The Washington Post, BuzzFeed, and Politico as part of investigations into leaks of classified information.[115]

Twitter
Main articles: Donald Trump on social media and Donald Trump presidential campaign, 2016 § Use of Twitter
See also: List of nicknames used by Donald Trump
Trump continued his use of Twitter following the presidential campaign. He continued to personally tweet from @realDonaldTrump, his personal account, while his staff tweet on his behalf using the official @POTUS account. His use of Twitter was unconventional for a president, with his tweets initiating controversy and becoming news in their own right.[116] Some scholars have referred to his time in office as the "first true Twitter presidency."[117] The Trump administration described Trump's tweets as "official statements by the President of the United States."[118] A federal judge ruled in 2018 that Trump's blocking of other Twitter users due to opposing political views violated the First Amendment and he must unblock them.[119] The ruling was upheld on appeal.[120][121]


Twitter activity of Donald Trump from his first tweet in May 2009 to September 2017. Retweets are not included.
His tweets have been reported as ill-considered, impulsive, vengeful, and bullying, often being made late at night or in the early hours of the morning.[122][123][124] His tweets about a Muslim ban were successfully turned against his administration to halt two versions of travel restrictions from some Muslim-majority countries.[125] He has used Twitter to threaten and intimidate his political opponents and potential political allies needed to pass bills.[126] Many tweets appear to be based on stories Trump has seen in the media, including far-right news websites such as Breitbart and television shows such as Fox & Friends.[127][128]

Trump used Twitter to attack federal judges who ruled against him in court cases[129] and to criticize officials within his own administration, including then-Secretary of State Rex Tillerson, then-National Security Advisor H. R. McMaster, Deputy Attorney General Rod Rosenstein, and, at various times, Attorney General Jeff Sessions.[130] Tillerson was eventually fired via a tweet by Trump.[131] Trump also tweeted that his Justice Department is part of the American "deep state";[132] that "there was tremendous leaking, lying and corruption at the highest levels of the FBI, Justice & State" Departments;[130] and that the special counsel investigation is a "WITCH HUNT!"[133] In August 2018, Trump used Twitter to write that Attorney General Jeff Sessions "should stop" the special counsel investigation immediately; he also referred to it as "rigged" and its investigators as biased.[134]

Twitter Safety	Twitter
@TwitterSafety
After close review of recent Tweets from the @realDonaldTrump account and the context around them we have permanently suspended the account due to the risk of further incitement of violence.

January 8, 2021[135]

In February 2020, Trump tweeted criticism of the prosecutors' proposed sentence for Trump's former aide Roger Stone. A few hours later, the Justice Department replaced the prosecutors' proposed sentence with a lighter proposal. This gave the appearance of presidential interference in a criminal case and caused a strong negative reaction. All four of the original prosecutors withdrew from the case; more than a thousand former DOJ prosecutors signed a letter condemning the action.[136][137] On July 10, Trump commuted the sentence of Stone days before he was due to report to prison.[138]

In response to the mid-2020 George Floyd protests, some of which resulted in looting,[139] Trump tweeted on May 25 that "when the looting starts, the shooting starts." Not long after, Twitter restricted the tweet for violating the company's policy on promoting violence.[140] On May 28, Trump signed an executive order which sought to limit legal protections of social media companies.[141]

On January 8, 2021, Twitter announced that they had permanently suspended Trump's personal account "due to the risk of further incitement of violence" following the storming of the Capitol Building.[142] Trump announced in his final tweet before the suspension that he would not attend the inauguration of Joe Biden.[143] Other social media platforms like Facebook, Snapchat, YouTube and others also suspended the official handles of Donald Trump.[144][145]

Domestic affairs
See also: Social policy of Donald Trump
Agriculture
Due to Trump's trade tariffs combined with depressed commodities prices, American farmers faced the worst crisis in decades.[146] Trump provided farmers $12 billion in direct payments in July 2018 to mitigate the negative impacts of his tariffs, increasing the payments by $14.5 billion in May 2019 after trade talks with China ended without agreement.[147] Most of the administration's aid went to the largest farms.[148] Politico reported in May 2019 that some economists in the Agriculture Department were being punished for presenting analyses showing farmers were being harmed by Trump's trade and tax policies, with six economists having more than 50 years of combined experience at the Service resigning on the same day.[149] Trump's fiscal 2020 budget proposed a 15% funding cut for the Agriculture Department, calling farm subsidies "overly generous".[146]

Consumer protections
The administration reversed a Consumer Financial Protection Bureau (CFPB) rule that had made it easier for aggrieved consumers to pursue class actions against banks; the Associated Press characterized the reversal as a victory for Wall Street banks.[150] Under Mick Mulvaney's tenure, the CFPB reduced enforcement of rules that protected consumers from predatory payday lenders.[151][152] Trump scrapped a proposed rule from the Obama administration that airlines disclose baggage fees.[153] Trump reduced enforcement of regulations against airlines; fines levied by the administration in 2017 were less than half of what the Obama administration did the year before.[154]

Criminal justice

Trump signed new anti-sex-trafficking legislation on April 16, 2018.
The New York Times summarized the Trump administration's "general approach to law enforcement" as "cracking down on violent crime", "not regulating the police departments that fight it", and overhauling "programs that the Obama administration used to ease tensions between communities and the police".[155] Trump reversed a ban on providing federal military equipment to local police departments[156] and reinstated the use of civil asset forfeiture.[157] The administration stated that it would no longer investigate police departments and publicize their shortcomings in reports, a policy previously enacted under the Obama administration. Later, Trump falsely claimed that the Obama administration never tried to reform the police.[158][159]

In December, 2017, the DOJ, under orders from Trump's first Attorney General, Jeff Sessions, rescinded guidelines put in place during the Obama administration intended to warn local courts against imposing excessive fines and fees on poor defendants.[160]


Trump pays tribute to fallen police officers on May 15, 2017
Despite Trump's pro-police rhetoric, his 2019 budget plan proposed nearly fifty percent cuts to the COPS Hiring Program which provides funding to state and local law enforcement agencies to help hire community policing officers.[161] Trump appeared to advocate police brutality in a July 2017 speech to police officers, prompting criticism from law enforcement agencies.[162] In 2020, the DOJ Inspector General criticized the Trump administration for reducing police oversight and eroding public confidence in law enforcement.[163]

In December 2018, Trump signed the First Step Act, a bipartisan criminal justice reform bill which sought to rehabilitate prisoners and reduce recidivism, notably by expanding job training and early-release programs, and lowering mandatory minimum sentences for nonviolent drug offenders.[164] Trump's proposed 2020 budget underfunded the new law; the law was intended to receive $75 million annually for five years, but Trump's budget proposed only $14 million.[165]

Beginning during his campaign and continuing into his presidency, Trump called for a sweeping investigation into alleged wrongdoing by Hillary Clinton.[166][167] In November 2017, Attorney General Sessions appointed a federal attorney to review a wide array of issues, including the Clinton Foundation, the Uranium One controversy and the FBI's handling of its investigation into Hillary Clinton's emails. In January 2020, the investigation was reported to be winding down after no evidence was found to warrant the opening of a criminal investigation.[168] Special Counsel Robert Mueller's April 2019 report documented that Trump pressured Sessions and the DOJ to re-open the investigation into Clinton's emails.[169]

The number of prosecutions of child-sex traffickers has showed a decreasing trend under the Trump administration relative to the Obama administration.[170][171] Under the Trump administration, the SEC charged the fewest number of insider trading cases since the Reagan administration.[172]

Presidential pardons and commutations
Main article: List of people granted executive clemency by Donald Trump
During his presidency, Trump pardoned or commuted the sentences of 237 individuals.[173] Most of those pardoned had personal or political connections to Trump.[174] A significant number had been convicted of fraud or public corruption.[175] Trump circumvented the typical clemency process, taking no action on more than ten thousand pending applications, using the pardon power primarily on "public figures whose cases resonated with him given his own grievances with investigators".[176]

Drug policy
Main article: Cannabis policy of the Donald Trump administration
In a May 2017 departure from the Obama DOJ's policy to reduce long jail sentencing for minor drug offenses and contrary to a growing bipartisan consensus, the administration ordered federal prosecutors to seek maximum sentencing for drug offenses.[177] In a January 2018 move that created uncertainty regarding the legality of recreational and medical marijuana, Sessions rescinded a federal policy that had barred federal law enforcement officials from aggressively enforcing federal cannabis law in states where the drug is legal.[178] The administration's decision contradicted then-candidate Trump's statement that marijuana legalization should be "up to the states".[179] That same month, the VA said it would not research cannabis as a potential treatment against PTSD and chronic pain; veterans organizations had pushed for such a study.[180]

Capital punishment
During Trump's term (in 2020 and in January 2021), the federal government executed thirteen people in 2020 and January 2021; the first executions since 2002.[181] In this time period, Trump oversaw more federal executions than any president in the preceding 120 years.[182]

Disaster relief

Trump signs the Hurricane Harvey relief bill at Camp David, September 8, 2017
Hurricanes Harvey, Irma and Maria
Three hurricanes hit the U.S. in August and September 2017: Harvey in southeastern Texas, Irma on the Florida Gulf coast, and Maria in Puerto Rico. Trump signed into law $15 billion in relief for Harvey and Irma, and later $18.67 billion for all three.[183] The administration came under criticism for its delayed response to the humanitarian crisis on Puerto Rico.[184] Politicians of both parties had called for immediate aid for Puerto Rico, and criticized Trump for focusing on a feud with the NFL instead.[185] Trump did not comment on Puerto Rico for several days while the crisis was unfolding.[186] According to The Washington Post, the White House did not feel a sense of urgency until "images of the utter destruction and desperation – and criticism of the administration's response – began to appear on television."[187] Trump dismissed the criticism, saying distribution of necessary supplies was "doing well". The Washington Post noted, "on the ground in Puerto Rico, nothing could be further from the truth."[187] Trump also criticized Puerto Rico officials.[188] A BMJ analysis found the federal government responded much more quickly and on a larger scale to the hurricane in Texas and Florida than in Puerto Rico, despite the fact that the hurricane in Puerto Rico was more severe.[183] A 2021 HUD Inspector General investigation found that the Trump administration erected bureaucratic hurdles which stalled approximately $20 billion in hurricane relief for Puerto Rico.[189]

At the time of FEMA's departure from Puerto Rico, one third of Puerto Rico residents still lacked electricity and some places lacked running water.[190] A New England Journal of Medicine study estimated the number of hurricane-related deaths during the period September 20 to December 31, 2017, to be around 4,600 (range 793–8,498)[191] The official death rate due to Maria reported by the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico is 2,975; the figure was based on an independent investigation by George Washington University commissioned by the governor of Puerto Rico.[192] Trump falsely claimed the official death rate was wrong, and said the Democrats were trying to make him "look as bad as possible".[193]

California wildfires
Trump misleadingly blamed the destructive wildfires in 2018 in California, on "gross" and "poor" "mismanagement" of forests by California, saying there was no other reason for these wildfires. The fires in question were not "forest fires"; that most of the forest was owned by federal agencies; and that climate change in part contributed to the fires.[194]

In September 2020, California's worst wildfires in history prompted Trump to visit the state. In a briefing to state officials, Trump said that federal assistance was necessary, and again baselessly asserted that the lack of forestry, not climate change, is the underlying cause of the fires.[195]

Economy
Main article: Economic policy of Donald Trump
See also: 2018 United States federal budget and Trump tariffs
Economic indicators and federal finances under the Obama and Trump administrations
$ represent U.S. trillions of unadjusted dollars
Year	Unemploy-
ment[196]	GDP[197]	Real GDP
growth[198]	Fiscal data[199][200]
Receipts	Outlays	Deficit	Debt
ending	Dec 31 (calendar year)	Sep 30 (fiscal year)[1]
2016*	4.9%	$18.695	1.7%	$3.268	$3.853	– $0.585	$14.2
2017	4.4%	$19.480	2.3%	$3.316	$3.982	– $0.665	$14.7
2018	3.9%	$20.527	2.9%	$3.330	$4.109	– $0.779	$15.8
2019	3.7%	$21.373	2.3%	$3.463	$4.447	– $0.984	$16.8
2020	8.1%	$20.894	–3.4%	$3.421	$6.550	– $3.129	$21.0
Trump's economic policies have centered on cutting taxes, deregulation, and trade protectionism.

One of Trump's first actions was to indefinitely suspend a cut in fee rates for federally-insured mortgages implemented by the Obama administration which saved individuals with lower credit scores around $500 per year on a typical loan.[201] Upon taking office, Trump halted trade negotiations with the European Union on the Transatlantic Trade and Investment Partnership, which had been underway since 2013.[202]

The administration proposed changes to the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (food stamps), which if implemented would lead millions to lose access to food stamps and limit the amount of benefits for remaining recipients.[203]

During his tenure, Trump repeatedly sought to intervene in the economy to affect specific companies and industries.[204] Trump sought to compel power grid operators to buy coal and nuclear energy, and sought tariffs on metals to protect domestic metal producers.[204] Trump also publicly attacked Boeing and Lockheed Martin, sending their stocks tumbling.[205] Trump repeatedly singled out Amazon for criticism and advocated steps that would harm the company, such as ending an arrangement between Amazon and the USPS and raising taxes on Amazon.[206][207] Trump expressed opposition to the merger between Time Warner (the parent company of CNN) and AT&T.[208]

The Trump campaign ran on a policy of reducing America's trade deficit, particularly with China.[209] The overall trade deficit increased during Trump's presidency.[210] The goods deficit with China reached a record high for the second consecutive year in 2018.[211]

A 2021 study, which used the synthetic control method, found no evidence Trump had an impact on the U.S. economy during his time in office.[212] Analysis conducted by Bloomberg News at the end of Trump's second year in office found that his economy ranked sixth among the last seven presidents, based on fourteen metrics of economic activity and financial performance.[213] Trump repeatedly and falsely characterized the economy during his presidency as the best in American history.[214]


Trump and Boeing CEO Dennis Muilenburg at the 787-10 Dreamliner rollout ceremony
In February 2020, amid the COVID-19 pandemic, the U.S. entered a recession.[215][216]

Taxation
In September 2017, Trump proposed the most sweeping federal tax overhaul in many years.[217] Trump signed the tax legislation on December 22, 2017, after it passed Congress on party-line votes.[218][219][220] The tax bill was the first major legislation signed by Trump.[221] The $1.5 trillion bill reduced the corporate federal tax rate from 35% to 21%,[219] its lowest point since 1939.[220] The bill also cut the individual tax rate, reducing the top rate from 39.6% to 37%, although these individual tax cuts expire after 2025;[219] as a result, "by 2027, every income group making less than $75,000 would see a net tax increase."[221] The bill doubled the estate tax exemption (to $22 million for married couples); and allowed the owners of pass-through businesses to deduct 20% of business income.[219] The bill doubled the standard deduction while eliminating many itemized deductions,[221] including the deduction for state and local taxes.[219] The bill also repeated the individual health insurance mandate contained in the Affordable Care Act.[221]

According to The New York Times, the plan would result in a "huge windfall" for the very wealthy but would not benefit those in the bottom third of the income distribution.[217] The nonpartisan Tax Policy Center estimated that the richest 0.1% and 1% would benefit the most in raw dollar amounts and percentage terms from the tax plan, earning 10.2% and 8.5% more income after taxes respectively.[222] Middle-class households would on average earn 1.2% more after tax, but 13.5% of middle class households would see their tax burden increase.[222] The poorest fifth of Americans would earn 0.5% more.[222] Treasury Secretary Steven Mnuchin argued that the corporate income tax cut would benefit workers the most, while the nonpartisan Joint Committee on Taxation, the Congressional Budget Office and many economists estimated that owners of capital would benefit vastly more than workers.[223] A preliminary estimate by the Committee for a Responsible Federal Budget found that the tax plan would add more than $2 trillion over the next decade to the federal debt,[224] while the Tax Policy Center found that it would add $2.4 trillion to the debt.[222] A 2019 Congressional Research Service analysis found that the tax cuts had "a relatively small (if any) first-year" growth effect on the economy.[225] A 2019 analysis by the Committee for a Responsible Federal Budget concluded that Trump's policies will add $4.1 trillion to the national debt from 2017 to 2029. Around $1.8 trillion of debt is projected to eventually arise from the 2017 Tax Cuts and Jobs Act.[226]

Trade

Trump signs the United States–Mexico–Canada Agreement (USMCA) alongside Mexican President Enrique Peña Nieto and Canadian Prime Minister Justin Trudeau in Buenos Aires, Argentina, November 30, 2018
In March 2018, Trump imposed tariffs on solar panels and washing machines of 30–50%.[227] In March 2018, he imposed tariffs on steel (25%) and aluminum (10%) from most countries,[228][229] which covered an estimated 4.1% of U.S. imports.[230] On June 1, 2018, this was extended to the European Union, Canada, and Mexico.[229] In separate moves, the Trump administration has set and escalated tariffs on goods imported from China, leading to a trade war.[231] The tariffs angered trading partners, who implemented retaliatory tariffs on U.S. goods,[232] and adversely affected real income and GDP.[233] A CNBC analysis found that Trump "enacted tariffs equivalent to one of the largest tax increases in decades", while Tax Foundation and Tax Policy Center analyses found the tariffs could wipe out the benefits of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 for many households.[234][235] The two countries reached a "phase one" truce agreement in January 2020. The bulk of the tariffs remained in place until talks were to resume after the 2020 election. Trump provided $28 billion in cash aid to farmers affected by the trade war.[236][237][238] Studies have found that the tariffs also adversely affected Republican candidates in elections.[239] An analysis published by The Wall Street Journal in October 2020 found the trade war did not achieve the primary objective of reviving American manufacturing, nor did it result in the reshoring of factory production.[240]

Three weeks after Republican Senator Chuck Grassley, chairman of the Senate Finance Committee, wrote an April 2019 Wall Street Journal op-ed entitled "Trump's Tariffs End or His Trade Deal Dies", stating "Congress won't approve USMCA while constituents pay the price for Mexican and Canadian retaliation," Trump lifted steel and aluminum tariffs on Mexico and Canada.[241] Two weeks later, Trump unexpectedly announced he would impose a 5% tariff on all imports from Mexico on June 10, increasing to 10% on July 1, and by another 5% each month for three months, "until such time as illegal migrants coming through Mexico, and into our Country, STOP".[242] Grassley commented the move as a "misuse of presidential tariff authority and counter to congressional intent".[243] That same day, the Trump administration formally initiated the process to seek congressional approval of USMCA.[244] Trump's top trade advisor, U.S. Trade Representative Robert Lighthizer, opposed the new Mexican tariffs on concerns it would jeopardize passage of USMCA.[245] Treasury secretary Steven Mnuchin and Trump senior advisor Jared Kushner also opposed the action. Grassley, whose committee is instrumental in passing USMCA, was not informed in advance of Trump's surprise announcement.[246] On June 7, Trump announced the tariffs would be "indefinitely suspended" after Mexico agreed to take actions, including deploying its National Guard throughout the country and along its southern border.[247] The New York Times reported the following day that Mexico had actually agreed to most of the actions months earlier.[248]

Education

Trump and Secretary of Education Betsy DeVos visit Saint Andrew's Catholic School in Orlando, Florida, March 3, 2017
Trump appointed Betsy DeVos as his Secretary of Education. Her nomination was confirmed on a 50–50 Senate vote with Vice President Pence called upon to break the tie (the first time a vice president had cast a tie-breaking vote on a Cabinet nomination).[249] Democrats opposed DeVos as underqualified, while Republicans supported DeVos because of her strong support of school choice.[249]

In 2017, Trump revoked an Obama administration memo which provided protections for people in default on student loans.[250] The Education Department cancelled agreements with the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau (CFPB) to police student loan fraud.[251] The administration rescinded a regulation restricting federal funding to for-profit colleges unable to demonstrate that college graduates had a reasonable debt-to-earnings ratio after entering the job market.[252] Seth Frotman, the CFPB student loan ombudsman, resigned, accusing the Trump administration of undermining the CFPB's work on protecting student borrowers.[253] DeVos marginalized an investigative unit within the Department of Education that under Obama investigated predatory activities by for-profit colleges. An investigation started under Obama into the practices of DeVry Education Group, which operates for-profit colleges, was halted in early 2017, and the former dean at DeVry was made into the supervisor for the investigative unit later that summer. DeVry paid a $100 million fine in 2016 for defrauding students.[254]

In 2017, DeVos said the Obama administration's guidance for how campuses address sexual assault "failed too many students" and she announced that she intended to replace the current approach "with a workable, effective and fair system".[255] Consequently, the administration scrapped an Obama administration guidance on how schools and universities should combat sexual harassment and sexual violence. DeVos criticized the guidance for undermining the rights of those accused of sexual harassment.[256]

Election integrity
On the eve of the 2018 midterm elections, Politico described the Trump administration's efforts to combat election propaganda as "rudderless". At the same time, U.S. intelligence agencies warned about "ongoing campaigns" by Russia, China, and Iran to influence American elections.[257]

Energy
Further information: Infrastructure policy of Donald Trump § Energy
The administration's "America First Energy Plan" did not mention renewable energy and instead focused on fossil fuels.[258] The administration enacted 30% tariffs on imported solar panels. The American solar energy industry is highly reliant on foreign parts (80% of parts are made abroad); as a result, the tariffs could raise the costs of solar energy, reduce innovation and reduce jobs in the industry – which in 2017 employed nearly four times as many American workers as the coal industry.[259][260] The administration reversed standards put in place to make commonly used lightbulbs more energy-efficient.[261]

Trump rescinded a rule requiring oil, gas and mining firms to disclose how much they paid foreign governments,[262] and withdrew from the international Extractive Industries Transparency Initiative (EITI) which required disclosure of payments by oil, gas and mining companies to governments.[263]

In 2017, Trump ordered the reversal of an Obama-era ban on new oil and gas leasing in the Arctic Ocean and environmentally sensitive areas of the North Atlantic coast, in the Outer Continental Shelf.[264] Trump's order was halted by a federal court, which ruled in 2019 that it unlawfully exceeded his authority.[264] Trump also revoked the 2016 Well Control Rule, a safety regulation adopted after the Deepwater Horizon oil spill; this action is the subject of legal challenges from environmental groups.[265][266][267]


April 2017 Trump rally in Harrisburg, Pennsylvania
In January 2018, the administration singled out Florida for exemption from the administration's offshore drilling plan. The move stirred controversy because it came after Florida Governor Rick Scott, who was considering a 2018 Senate run, complained about the plan. The move raised ethical questions about the appearance of "transactional favoritism" because Trump owns a coastal resort in Florida, and because of the state's status as a crucial "swing state" in the 2020 presidential election.[268] Other states sought similar offshore drilling exemptions,[269] and litigation ensued.[270][271]

Despite rhetoric about boosting the coal industry, coal-fueled electricity generating capacity declined faster during Trump's presidency than during any previous presidential term, falling 15% with the idling of 145 coal-burning units at 75 power plants. An estimated 20% of electricity was expected to be generated by coal in 2020, compared to 31% in 2017.[272]

Environment
Main article: Environmental policy of the Trump administration
By October 2020, the administration had overturned 72 environmental regulations and was in process of reversing an additional 27.[273] A 2018 American Journal of Public Health study found that in Trump's first six months in office, the EPA adopted a pro-business attitude unlike that of any previous administration, as it "moved away from the public interest and explicitly favored the interests of the regulated industries".[274]

Analyses of EPA enforcement data showed that the Trump administration brought fewer cases against polluters, sought a lower total of civil penalties and made fewer requests of companies to retrofit facilities to curb pollution than the Obama and Bush administrations. According to the New York Times, "confidential internal E.P.A. documents show that the enforcement slowdown coincides with major policy changes ordered by Mr. Pruitt's team after pleas from oil and gas industry executives."[275] In 2018, the administration referred the lowest number of pollution cases for criminal prosecution in 30 years.[276] Two years into Trump's presidency, The New York Times wrote he had "unleashed a regulatory rollback, lobbied for and cheered on by industry, with little parallel in the past half-century".[277] In June 2018, David Cutler and Francesca Dominici of Harvard University estimated conservatively that the Trump administration's modifications to environmental rules could result in more than 80,000 additional U.S. deaths and widespread respiratory ailments.[278] In August 2018, the administration's own analysis showed that loosening coal plant rules could cause up to 1,400 premature deaths and 15,000 new cases of respiratory problems.[279] From 2016 to 2018, air pollution increased by 5.5%, reversing a seven-year trend where air pollution had declined by 25%.[280]

All references to climate change were removed from the White House website, with the sole exception of mentioning Trump's intention to eliminate the Obama administration's climate change policies.[281] The EPA removed climate change material on its website, including detailed climate data.[282] In June 2017, Trump announced U.S. withdrawal from the Paris Agreement, a 2015 climate change accord reached by 200 nations to cut greenhouse gas emissions.[283] In December 2017, Trump – who had repeatedly called scientific consensus on climate a "hoax" before becoming president – falsely implied that cold weather meant climate change was not occurring.[284] Through executive order, Trump reversed multiple Obama administration policies meant to tackle climate change, such as a moratorium on federal coal leasing, the Presidential Climate Action Plan, and guidance for federal agencies on taking climate change into account during National Environmental Policy Act action reviews. Trump also ordered reviews and possibly modifications to several directives, such as the Clean Power Plan (CPP), the estimate for the "social cost of carbon" emissions, carbon dioxide emission standards for new coal plants, methane emissions standards from oil and natural gas extraction, as well as any regulations inhibiting domestic energy production.[285] The administration rolled back regulations requiring the federal government to account for climate change and sea-level rise when building infrastructure.[286] The EPA disbanded a 20-expert panel on pollution which advised the EPA on the appropriate threshold levels to set for air quality standards.[287]


Official portrait of Scott Pruitt as EPA Administrator
The administration has repeatedly sought to reduce the EPA budget.[288] The administration invalidated the Stream Protection Rule, which limited dumping of toxic wastewater containing metals, such as arsenic and mercury, into public waterways,[289] regulations on coal ash (carcinogenic leftover waste produced by coal plants),[290] and an Obama-era executive order on protections for oceans, coastlines and lakes enacted in response to the Deepwater Horizon oil spill.[291] The administration refused to act on recommendations from EPA scientists urging greater regulation of particulate particulate pollution.[292]

The administration rolled back major Clean Water Act protections, narrowing the definition of the "waters of the United States" under federal protection.[293] Studies by the Obama-era EPA suggest that up to two-thirds of California's inland freshwater streams would lose protections under the rule change.[294] The EPA sought to repeal a regulation which required oil and gas companies to restrict emissions of methane, a potent greenhouse gas.[295] The EPA rolled back automobile fuel efficiency standards introduced in 2012.[296] The EPA granted a loophole allowing a small set of trucking companies to skirt emissions rules and produce trucks that emit 40 to 55 times the air pollutants of other new trucks.[297] The EPA rejected a ban on the toxic pesticide chlorpyrifos; a federal court then ordered the EPA to ban chlorpyrifos, because the EPA's own extensive research showed it caused adverse health effects in children.[277] The administration scaled back the ban on the use of the solvent methylene chloride,[298] and lifted a rule requiring major farms to report pollution emitted through animal waste.[299]

The administration suspended funding on several environmental research studies,[300][301] a multi-million-dollar program that distributed grants for research the effects of chemical exposure on children[302][303] and $10-million-a-year research line for NASA's Carbon Monitoring System.[304] including an unsuccessful attempt to kill aspects of NASA's climate science program.[304]

The EPA expedited the process for approving new chemicals and made the process of evaluating the safety of those chemicals less stringent; EPA scientists expressed concerns that the agency's ability to stop hazardous chemicals was being compromised.[305][306] Internal emails showed that Pruitt aides prevented the publication of a health study showing some toxic chemicals endanger humans at far lower levels than the EPA previously characterized as safe.[307] One such chemical was present in high quantities around several military bases, including groundwater.[307] The non-disclosure of the study and the delay in public knowledge of the findings may have prevented the government from updating the infrastructure at the bases and individuals who lived near the bases to avoid the tap water.[307]

The administration weakened enforcement the Endangered Species Act, making it easier to start mining, drilling and construction projects in areas with endangered and threatened species.[308][309] The administration has actively discouraged local governments and businesses from undertaking preservation efforts.[309]

The administration sharply reduced the size of two national monuments in Utah by approximately two million acres, making it the largest reduction of public land protections in American history.[310] Shortly afterwards, Interior Secretary Zinke advocated for downsizing four additional national monuments and changing the way six additional monuments were managed.[311] In 2019, the administration sped up the process for environmental reviews for oil and gas drilling in the Arctic; experts said the speeding up made reviews less comprehensive and reliable.[312] According to Politico, the administration sped up the process in the event that a Democratic administration was elected in 2020, which would have halted new oil and gas leases in the Arctic National Wildlife Refuge.[312] The administration sought to open up more than 180,000 acres of the Tongass National Forest in Alaska, the largest in the country, for logging.[313]

In April 2018, Pruitt announced a policy change prohibiting EPA regulators from considering scientific research unless the raw data of the research was made publicly available. This would limit EPA regulators' use of much environmental research, given that participants in many such studies provide personal health information which is kept confidential.[314] The EPA cited two bipartisan reports and various nonpartisan studies about the use of science in government to defend the decision. However, the authors of those reports dismissed that the EPA followed their instructions, with one author saying, "They don't adopt any of our recommendations, and they go in a direction that's opposite, completely different. They don't adopt any of the recommendations of any of the sources they cite."[315]

In July 2020, Trump moved to weaken the National Environmental Policy Act by limiting public review to speed up permitting.[316]

Government size and regulations
The administration imposed far fewer financial penalties against banks and major companies accused of wrong-doing relative to the Obama administration.[317]

In the first six weeks of his tenure, Trump suspended – or in a few cases, revoked – more than 90 regulations.[318] In early 2017, Trump signed an executive order directing federal agencies to slash two existing regulations for every new one (without spending on regulations going up).[319] A September 2017 Bloomberg BNA review found that due to unclear wording in the order and the large proportion of regulations it exempts, the order had had little effect since it was signed.[320] The Trump OMB released an analysis in February 2018 indicating the economic benefits of regulations significantly outweigh the economic costs.[321] The administration ordered one-third of government advisory committees for federal agencies eliminated, except for committees that evaluate consumer product safety or committees that approve research grants.[322]

Trump ordered a four-month government-wide hiring freeze of the civilian work force (excluding staff in the military, national security, public safety and offices of new presidential appointees) at the start of his term.[323] He said he did not intend to fill many of the governmental positions that were still vacant, as he considered them unnecessary;[324] there were nearly 2,000 vacant government positions.[325]

The administration ended the requirement that nonprofits, including political advocacy groups who collect so-called dark money, disclose the names of large donors to the IRS; the Senate voted to overturn the administration's rule change.[326]

Guns
The administration banned bump stocks after such devices were used by the gunman who perpetrated the 2017 Las Vegas shooting.[327] In the wake of several mass shootings during the Trump administration, including August 2019 shootings in El Paso, Texas and Dayton, Ohio, Trump called on states to implement red flag laws to remove guns from "those judged to pose a grave risk to public safety".[328] By November 2019, he abandoned the idea of red-flag laws.[329] Trump repealed a regulation that barred gun ownership from approximately 75,000 individuals who received Social Security checks due to mental illness and who were deemed unfit to handle their financial affairs.[330] The administration ended U.S. involvement in the UN Arms Trade Treaty to curb the international trade of conventional arms with countries having poor human rights records.[331]

Health care
Further information: 2017 Affordable Care Act replacement proposals

HHS Secretary Alex Azar

The CBO estimated in May 2017 that the Republican AHCA would reduce the number of people with health insurance by 23 million during 2026, relative to current law.[332]
The 2010 Affordable Care Act (also known as "Obamacare" or the ACA) elicited major opposition from the Republican Party from its inception, and Trump called for a repeal of the law during the 2016 election campaign.[333] On taking office, Trump promised to pass a healthcare bill that would cover everyone and result in better and less expensive insurance.[334] Throughout his presidency, Trump repeatedly asserted that his administration and Republicans in Congress supported protections for individuals with preexisting conditions; however, fact-checkers noted the administration supported attempts both in Congress and in the courts to roll back the ACA (and its protections for preexisting conditions).[335][336][337][338]

Congressional Republicans made two serious efforts to repeal the ACA. First, in March 2017, Trump endorsed the American Health Care Act (AHCA), a Republican bill to repeal and replace the ACA.[339] Opposition from several House Republicans, both moderate and conservative, led to the defeat of this version of the bill.[339] Second in May 2017, the House narrowly voted in favor of a new version of the AHCA to repeal the ACA, sending the bill to the Senate for deliberation.[339] Over the next weeks the Senate made several attempts to create a repeal bill; however, all the proposals were ultimately rejected in a series of Senate votes in late July.[339] The individual mandate was repealed in December 2017 by the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act. The CBO estimated in May 2018 that repealing the individual mandate would increase the number of uninsured by eight million and that individual healthcare insurance premiums had increased by ten percent between 2017 and 2018.[340] The administration later sided with a lawsuit to overturn the ACA, including protections for individuals with pre-existing conditions.[341]

Trump repeatedly expressed a desire to "let Obamacare fail",[342] and the Trump administration undermined Obamacare through various actions.[343] The open enrollment period was cut from twelve weeks to six, the advertising budget for enrollment was cut by 90%, and organizations helping people shop for coverage got 39% less money.[344][345][346] The CBO found that ACA enrollment at health care exchanges would be lower than its previous forecasts due to the Trump administration's undermining of the ACA.[344] A 2019 study found that enrollment into the ACA during the Trump administration's first year was nearly thirty percent lower than during 2016.[347] The CBO found that insurance premiums would rise sharply in 2018 due to the Trump administration's refusal to commit to continuing paying ACA subsidies, which added uncertainty to the insurance market and led insurers to raise premiums for fear they will not get subsidized.[344]

The administration ended subsidy payments to health insurance companies, in a move expected to raise premiums in 2018 for middle-class families by an average of about twenty percent nationwide and cost the federal government nearly $200 billion more than it saved over a ten-year period.[348] The administration made it easier for businesses to use health insurance plans not covered by several of the ACA's protections, including for preexisting conditions,[336] and allowed organizations not to cover birth control.[349] In justifying the action, the administration made false claims about the health harms of contraceptives.[350]

The administration proposed substantial spending cuts to Medicare, Medicaid and Social Security Disability Insurance. Trump had previously vowed to protect Medicare and Medicaid.[351][352] The administration reduced enforcement of penalties against nursing homes that harm residents.[353] As a candidate and throughout his presidency, Trump said he would cut the costs of pharmaceuticals. During his first seven months in office, there were 96 price hikes for every drug price cut.[354] Abandoning a promise he made as candidate, Trump announced he would not allow Medicare to use its bargaining power to negotiate lower drug prices.[355]

Reproductive rights
Trump reinstated the Mexico City policy prohibiting funding to foreign non-governmental organizations that perform abortions as a method of family planning in other countries.[356] The administration implemented a policy restricting taxpayer dollars given to family planning facilities that mention abortion to patients, provide abortion referrals, or share space with abortion providers.[357][358] As a result, Planned Parenthood, which provides Title X birth control services to 1.5 million women, withdrew from the program.[359] Throughout his presidency, Trump pressed for a ban on late-term abortions and made frequent false claims about them.[360][361][362]

In 2018, the administration prohibited scientists at the National Institutes of Health (NIH) from acquiring new fetal tissue for research,[363] and a year later stopped all medical research by government scientists that used fetal tissue.[364]

The administration geared HHS funding towards abstinence education programs for teens rather than the comprehensive sexual education programs the Obama administration funded.[365]

Opioid epidemic

Drug overdoses killed 70,200 in the United States in 2017.[366]

Trump at the 15th Annual Opioid Takeback Day
Trump nominated Tom Marino to become the nation's drug czar but the nomination was withdrawn after an investigation found he had been the chief architect of a bill that crippled the enforcement powers of the DEA and worsened the opioid crisis in the United States.[367]

Kellyanne Conway led White House efforts to combat the opioid epidemic; Conway had no experience or expertise on matters of public health, substance abuse, or law enforcement.[368] Conway sidelined drug experts and opted instead for the use of political staff. Politico wrote in 2018 that the administration's "main response" to the opioid crisis "so far has been to call for a border wall and to promise a 'just say no' campaign".[368]

In October 2017, the administration declared a 90-day public health emergency over the opioid epidemic and pledged to urgently mobilize the federal government in response to the crisis. On January 11, 2018, twelve days before the declaration ran out, Politico noted that "beyond drawing more attention to the crisis, virtually nothing of consequence has been done."[369] The administration had not proposed any new resources or spending, had not started the promised advertising campaign to spread awareness about addiction, and had yet to fill key public health and drug positions in the administration.[369] One of the top officials at the Office of National Drug Control Policy, which is tasked with multi-billion-dollar anti-drug initiatives and curbing the opioid epidemic, was a 24-year old campaign staffer from the Trump 2016 campaign who lied on his CV and whose stepfather went to jail for manufacturing illegal drugs; after the administration was contacted about the official's qualifications and CV, the administration gave him a job with different tasks.[370]

COVID-19 pandemic
Main article: COVID-19 pandemic in the United States

Trump receives a briefing on COVID-19 in the White House Situation Room
In 2018, before the COVID-19 pandemic, the Trump administration reorganized the Global Health Security and Biodefense unit at the NSC, by merging it with other related units.[371] Two months prior to the outbreak in Wuhan China, the Trump Administration had cut nearly $200 million in funding to Chinese research scientists studying animal coronaviruses.[372] Throughout his presidency he also proposed budget cuts to global health.[373] The Trump administration ignored detailed plans on how to mass-produce protective respirator masks under a program that had been launched by the Obama administration to alleviate a mask shortage for a future pandemic.[374]

From January 2020 to mid-March 2020, Trump consistently downplayed the threat posed by COVID-19 to the United States, giving many optimistic public statements.[375] He accused Democrats and media outlets of exaggerating the seriousness of the situation, describing Democrats' criticism of his administration's response as a "hoax".[376][377] By March 2020, however, Trump had adopted a more somber tone on the matter, acknowledging for the first time that COVID-19 was "not under control".[378][379] Although the CDC recommended people wear face masks in public when social distancing is not possible, Trump continually refused to wear one.[380] He praised and encouraged protesters who violated stay-at-home orders in Democratic states, as well as praised Republican governors who violated the White House's own COVID-19 guidelines regarding re-opening their economies.[381][382]

The White House Coronavirus Task Force was led by Vice President Mike Pence, Coronavirus Response Coordinator Deborah Birx, and Trump's son-in-law Jared Kushner.[383] Congress appropriated $8.3 billion in emergency funding, which Trump signed into law on March 6.[384] During his oval office address on March 11, Trump announced an imminent travel ban between Europe and the U.S. The announcement caused chaos in European and American airports, as Americans abroad scrambled to get flights back to the U.S. The administration later had to clarify that the travel ban applied to foreigners coming from the Schengen Area, and later added Ireland and the UK to the list.[385][386] Previously, in late January 2020, the administration banned travel to the U.S. from China; prior to the decision, major U.S. carriers had already announced that they would no longer fly to and from China.[387] On March 13, Trump designated COVID-19 pandemic as a national emergency, as the number of known cases of COVID-19 in the country exceeded 1,500, while known deaths exceeded 40.[388]

Although the U.S. government was initially quick to develop a diagnostic test for COVID-19, U.S. COVID-19 testing efforts from mid-January to late-February lost pace compared to the rest of the world.[389] ABC News described the testing as "shockingly slow".[390] When the WHO distributed 1.4 million COVID-19 tests in February, the U.S. chose instead to use its own tests. At that time, the CDC had produced 160,000 COVID-19 tests, but many were defective. As a result, fewer than 4,000 tests were done in the U.S. by February 27, with U.S. state laboratories conducting only about 200. In this period, academic laboratories and hospitals had developed their own tests, but were not allowed to use them until February 29, when the Food and Drug Administration issued approvals for them and private companies.[391] A comprehensive New York Times investigation concluded that "technical flaws, regulatory hurdles, business-as-usual bureaucracies and lack of leadership at multiple levels" contributed to the testing failures.[392] An Associated Press investigation found the administration made its first bulk orders for vital health care equipment, such as N95 respirator masks and ventilators, in mid-March.[393]


Trump was hospitalized at the Walter Reed National Military Medical Center following his COVID-19 diagnosis on October 3, 2020.
On March 26, the U.S. became the country with the highest number of confirmed COVID-19 infections, with over 82,000 cases.[394] On April 11, the U.S. became the country with the highest official death toll for COVID-19, with over 20,000 deaths.[395] The HHS Inspector General released a report in April of its survey of 323 hospitals in late March; reporting severe shortages of test supplies and extended waits for results, widespread shortages of personal protective equipment (PPE), and other strained resources due to extended patient stays while awaiting test results.[396][397] Trump called the IG's report "just wrong", and subsequently Trump replaced the Inspector General.[398]

In May 2020, five months into the pandemic, Trump announced that the U.S. would withdraw from the WHO.[399] In July 2020, Trump's Secretary of State, Mike Pompeo, formally notified the UN of U.S. decision to withdraw from the WHO, to take effect on July 6, 2021.[400][401] Biden reversed Trump's decision to withdraw the U.S. from the WHO on January 20, 2021, on his first day in office.[400]

In June 2020, amid surges in COVID-19 case numbers, Trump administration officials falsely claimed that the steep rise was due to increased testing; public health experts disputed the administration's claims, noting that the positivity rate of tests was increasing.[402][403]

In October 2020, after a superspreader event at the White House, Trump announced that he and Melania Trump had tested positive for COVID-19 and would begin quarantining at the White House.[404] Despite having the virus, Trump did not self-isolate and did not abstain from unnecessary risky behaviors. Trump was criticized for leaving his hospital room at Walter Reed National Military Medical Center to go on a joyride to greet his supporters, thus exposing Secret Service agents to the disease.[405]

According to sources in the Biden administration, the Trump administration left a non-existent plan for vaccine distribution to the Biden administration, however, Anthony Fauci rejected this, stating that were "certainly not starting from scratch, because there is activity going on in the distribution," and that the new administration was improving upon existing distribution efforts.[406] In the last quarter of 2020, Trump administration officials lobbied Congress not to provide extra funding to states for vaccine rollout, thus hindering the vaccination rollout. One of those officials, Paul Mango, the deputy chief of staff for policy at the Department of Health and Human Services, claimed that states didn't need extra money because they hadn't spent all the previously allocated money for vaccines given by the CDC.[407]

Housing and urban policy

Secretary of Housing and Urban Development Ben Carson, first day on the job
In December 2017, The Economist described the Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD), led by Ben Carson, as "directionless".[408] Most of the top HUD positions were unfilled and Carson's leadership was "inconspicuous and inscrutable".[408] Of the policies HUD was enacting, The Economist wrote, "it is hard not to conclude that the governing principle at HUD is to take whatever the Obama administration was doing, and do the opposite."[408] HUD scaled back the enforcement of fair housing laws, halted several fair housing investigations started by the Obama administration[409] and removed the words "inclusive" and "free from discrimination" from its mission statement.[409] The administration designated Lynne Patton, an event planner who had worked on the Trump campaign and planned Eric Trump's wedding, to lead HUD's New York and New Jersey office (which oversees billions of federal dollars).[410]

Immigration
Main article: Immigration policy of Donald Trump
See also: Immigration reform and Trump wall

Chad Wolf, acting Secretary of the Department of Homeland Security
Trump has repeatedly characterized illegal immigrants as criminals, although multiple studies have found they have lower crime and incarceration rates than native-born Americans.[411] Prior to taking office, Trump promised to deport the estimated eleven million illegal immigrants living in the United States and to build a wall along the Mexico–U.S. border.[412] During his presidency, Trump reduced legal immigration substantially while the illegal immigrant population remained the same.[413] The administration took several steps to limit the rights of legal immigrants, which included attempted revocations of Temporary Protected Status for Central American refugees,[414] 60,000 Haitians (who emigrated following the 2010 Haiti earthquake),[415] and 200,000 Salvadorans (who emigrated following a series of devastating earthquakes in 2001)[416] as well as making it illegal for refugees and asylum seekers,[417] and spouses of H-1B visa holders to work in the U.S.[418] A federal judge blocked the administration's attempt to deport the TPS recipients, citing what the judge said was Trump's racial "animus against non-white, non-European immigrants".[419] The administration slashed refugee admissions to record low levels (since the modern program began in 1980).[420] The administration made it harder non-citizens who served in the military to receive necessary paperwork to pursue U.S. citizenship.[421] The administration's key legislative proposal on immigration was the 2017 RAISE Act, a proposal to reduce legal immigration levels to the U.S. by fifty percent by halving the number of green cards issued, capping refugee admissions at 50,000 a year and ending the visa diversity lottery.[422] In 2020, the Trump administration set the lowest cap for refugees in the modern history of the United States for the subsequent year: 15,000 refugees.[423] The administration increased fees for citizen applications, as well as caused delays in the processing of citizen applications.[424]

By February 2018, arrests of undocumented immigrants by ICE increased by forty percent during Trump's tenure. Arrests of noncriminal undocumented immigrants were twice as high as during Obama's final year in office. Arrests of undocumented immigrants with criminal convictions increased only slightly.[425] In 2018, experts noted that the Trump administration's immigration policies had led to an increase in criminality and lawlessness along the U.S.–Mexico border, as asylum seekers prevented by U.S. authorities from filing for asylum had been preyed upon by human smugglers, organized crime and corrupt local law enforcement.[426] To defend administration policies on immigration, the administration fudged data and presented intentionally misleading analyses of the costs associated with refugees (omitting data that showed net positive fiscal effects),[427] as well as created the Victims of Immigration Crime Engagement to highlight crimes committed by undocumented immigrants (there is no evidence undocumented immigrants increase the U.S. crime rate).[428] In January 2018, Trump was widely criticized after referring to Haiti, El Salvador, and African nations in general as "shithole countries" at a bipartisan meeting on immigration. Multiple international leaders condemned his remarks as racist.[429]

Upon taking office, Trump directed the DHS to begin work on a wall.[430] An internal DHS report estimated Trump's wall would cost $21.6 billion and take 3.5 years to build (far higher than the Trump 2016 campaign's estimate ($12 billion) and the $15 billion estimate from Republican congressional leaders).[431] In a January 2017 phone call between Trump and Mexican president Enrique Peña Nieto, Trump conceded that the U.S. would pay for the border wall, not Mexico as he promised during the campaign, and implored Nieto to stop saying publicly the Mexican government would not pay for the border wall.[432] In January 2018, the administration proposed spending $18 billion over the next ten years on the wall, more than half of the $33 billion spending blueprint for border security.[433] Trump's plan would reduce funding for border surveillance, radar technology, patrol boats and customs agents; experts and officials say these are more effective at curbing illegal immigration and preventing terrorism and smuggling than a border wall.[433]

The administration sought to add a citizenship question to the 2020 census, which experts warned would likely result in severe undercounting of the population and faulty data,[434] with naturalized U.S. citizens, legal immigrants, and undocumented immigrants all being less likely to respond to the census.[435] Blue states were estimated to get fewer congressional seats and lower congressional appropriations than they would otherwise get, because they have larger non-citizen populations.[436] Thomas B. Hofeller, an architect of Republican gerrymandering, had found adding the census question would help to gerrymander maps that "would be advantageous to Republicans and non-Hispanic whites" and that Hofeller had later written the key portion of a letter from the Trump administration's Justice Department justifying the addition of a citizenship question by claiming it was needed to enforce the 1965 Voting Rights Act.[437] In July 2019, the Supreme Court in Department of Commerce v. New York blocked the administration from including the citizenship question on the census form.[438]

During the 2018 mid-term election campaign, Trump sent nearly 5,600 troops to the U.S.–Mexico border for the stated purpose of protecting the United States against a caravan of Central American migrants.[439] The Pentagon had previously concluded the caravan posed no threat to the U.S. The border deployment was estimated to cost as much as $220 million by the end of the year.[440] With daily warnings from Trump about the dangers of the caravan during the mid-term election campaign, the frequency and intensity of the caravan rhetoric nearly stopped after election day.[441]

Family separation policy
Main article: Trump administration family separation policy
See also: Protests against Trump administration family separation policy

June 2018 protest against the Trump administration family separation policy, in Chicago, Illinois
In May 2018, the administration announced it would separate children from parents caught unlawfully crossing the southern border into the United States. Parents were routinely charged with a misdemeanor and jailed; their children were placed in separate detention centers with no established procedure to track them or reunite them with their parent after they had served time for their offence, generally only a few hours or days.[442] Later that month, Trump falsely accused Democrats of creating that policy, despite it originating from his own administration, and urged Congress to "get together" and pass an immigration bill.[443] Members of Congress from both parties condemned the practice and pointed out that the White House could end the separations on its own.[444] The Washington Post quoted a White House official as saying Trump's decision to separate migrant families was to gain political leverage to force Democrats and moderate Republicans to accept hardline immigration legislation.[445]

Six weeks into the implementation of the "zero tolerance" policy, at least 2,300 migrant children had been separated from their families.[446] The American Academy of Pediatrics, the American College of Physicians and the American Psychiatric Association condemned the policy, with the American Academy of Pediatrics saying the policy was causing "irreparable harm" to the children.[447][445] The policy was extremely unpopular, more so than any major piece of legislation in recent memory.[448] Videos and images of children held in cage-like detention centers, distraught parents separated from their children, and sobbing children caused an outcry.[446] After criticism, DHS secretary Kirstjen Nielsen falsely claimed that "We do not have a policy of separating families at the border."[449]

On June 20, 2018, amid worldwide outrage and enormous political pressure to roll back his policy, Trump reversed the family-separation policy by signing an executive order,[446] despite earlier having said "you can't do it through an executive order."[446] Six days later, as the result of a class-action lawsuit filed by the American Civil Liberties Union, U.S. District Judge Dana Sabraw issued a nationwide preliminary injunction against the family-separation policy, and required the government to reunite separated families within 30 days.[450] By November 2020, the parents of 666 children still had not been found.[451] The administration has refused to provide funds to cover the expenses of reuniting families, and volunteer organizations continue to provide both volunteers and funding.[452][453][454] The administration also refused to pay for mental health services for the families and orphaned children traumatized by the separations.[455]

Travel bans
See also: Executive Order 13769, Executive Order 13780, and s:Proclamation 9645

Trump signs Executive Order 13769 at the Pentagon. Vice President Mike Pence (left) and Secretary of Defense James Mattis look on, January 27, 2017.
In January 2017, Trump signed an executive order which indefinitely suspended admission of asylum seekers fleeing the Syrian Civil War, suspended admission of all other refugees for 120 days, and denied entry to citizens of Iraq, Iran, Libya, Somalia, Sudan, Syria and Yemen for 90 days. The order also established a religious test for refugees from Muslim nations by giving priority to refugees of other religions over Muslim refugees.[456] Later, the administration seemed to reverse a portion of part of the order, effectively exempting visitors with a green card.[457] After the order was challenged in the federal courts, several federal judges issued rulings enjoining the government from enforcing the order.[457] Trump fired acting Attorney General Sally Yates after she said she would not defend the order in court; Yates was replaced by Dana Boente, who said the DOJ would defend the order.[458]

A new executive order was signed in March which limited travel to the U.S. from six different countries for 90 days, and by all refugees who do not possess either a visa or valid travel documents for 120 days.[459] The new executive order revoked and replaced the executive order issued in January.[460]

In June, the Supreme Court partially stayed certain injunctions that were put on the order by two federal appeals courts earlier, allowing the executive order to mostly go into effect. In October, the Court dismissed the case, saying the orders had been replaced by a new proclamation, so challenges to the previous executive orders are moot.[461]

In September, Trump signed a proclamation placing limits on the six countries in the second executive order and added Chad, North Korea, and Venezuela.[462] In October 2017, Judge Derrick Watson, of the U.S. District Court for the District of Hawaii issued another temporary restraining order.[463] In December 2017, the Supreme Court allowed the September 2017 travel restrictions to go into effect while legal challenges in Hawaii and Maryland are heard. The decision effectively barred most citizens of Iran, Libya, Syria, Yemen, Somalia, Chad and North Korea from entry into the United States along with some government officials from Venezuela and their families.[464]

In January 2020, Trump added Nigeria, Myanmar, Eritrea, Kyrgyzstan, Sudan, and Tanzania to the visa ban list.[465][466]

Amid the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic, Trump further restricted travel from Iran on February 29, 2020, and advised American citizens not to travel to specific regions in Italy and South Korea in response to COVID-19.[467] In March 2020, the Trump administration later issued a ban on entrants from all Schengen Area countries, eventually including Ireland and the UK.[468]

2018–2019 federal government shutdown
Main article: 2018–2019 United States federal government shutdown
The federal government was partially shut down from December 22, 2018, until January 25, 2019, (the longest shutdown in U.S. history) over Trump's demand that Congress provide $5.7 billion in federal funds for a U.S.–Mexico border wall.[469] The House and Senate lacked votes necessary to support his funding demand and to overcome Trump's refusal to sign the appropriations last passed by Congress into law.[470] In negotiations with Democratic leaders leading up to the shutdown, Trump commented he would be "proud to shut down the government for border security".[471] By mid-January 2019, the White House Council of Economic Advisors estimated that each week of the shutdown reduced GDP by 0.1 percentage points, the equivalent of 1.2 points per quarter.[472]

In September 2020, Brian Murphy – who until August 2020 was the Under Secretary of Homeland Security for Intelligence and Analysis – asserted in a whistleblower complaint[473] that during the shutdown senior DHS officials sought to inflate the number of known or suspected terrorists who had been apprehended at the border, to increase support for funding the wall. NBC News reported that in early 2019 a DHS spokeswoman, Katie Waldman, pushed the network to retract a story that correctly cited only six such apprehensions in the first half of 2018, compared to the nearly four thousand a year the administration was publicly claiming. The story was not retracted, and Waldman later became the press secretary for Vice President Pence and wife of Trump advisor Stephen Miller.[474][475]

LGBT rights
Main article: Social policy of Donald Trump § LGBT issues
See also: LGBT rights in the United States
The administration rolled back numerous LGBT protections, in particular those implemented during the Obama administration, covering issues such as health care, education, employment, housing, military, and criminal justice, as well as foster care and adoption.[476][477] The administration rescinded rules prohibiting taxpayer-funded adoption and foster care agencies from discriminating against LGBT adoption and foster parents.[478] The DOJ reversed its position on whether the Civil Rights Act's workplace protections covered LGBT individuals, and the DOJ argued in state and federal courts for a constitutional right for businesses to discriminate on the basis of sexual orientation and gender identity.[476] The administration exempted government contractors from following federal workplace discrimination rules, as long as they could cite religious reasons for doing so.[476]

The administration rescinded a directive that public schools treat students according to their gender identity.[476] The administration rescinded a federal policy that allowed transgender students to use bathrooms corresponding to their gender identity, and dropped a lawsuit against North Carolina's "bathroom bill".[479] The administration rescinded rules that prohibited discrimination against LGBT patients by health care providers.[476][480] Rules were rescinded to give transgender homeless people equal access to homeless shelters, and to house transgender prison inmates according to their gender identity "when appropriate".[476] HHS stopped collecting information on LGBT participants in its national survey of older adults,[481] and the Census Bureau removed "sexual orientation" and "gender identity" as proposed subjects for possible inclusion on the Decennial Census and/or American Community Survey.[481] The DOJ and the Labor Department cancelled quarterly conference calls with LGBT organizations.[481]

Trump said he would not allow "transgender individuals to serve in any capacity in the U.S. Military", citing disruptions and medical costs.[476] In March 2018, he signed a Presidential Memorandum to prohibit transgender persons, whether transitioned or not, with a history or diagnosis of gender dysphoria from military service, except for individuals who have had 36 consecutive months of stability "in their biological sex before accession" and currently serving transgender persons in military service.[476] Studies have found that allowing transgender individuals to serve in the military has "little or no impact on unit cohesion, operational effectiveness, or readiness"[482] and that medical costs associated with transgender service members would be "minimal".[483]

In 2017, the Treasury Department imposed sanctions on Chechen President Ramzan Kadyrov and a Chechen law enforcement official, citing anti-gay purges in Chechnya.[484] In February 2019, the administration launched a global campaign to end the criminalization of homosexuality; the initiative was pushed by Richard Grenell, the U.S. Ambassador to Germany. Asked about the administration's campaign, Trump appeared to be unaware of it.[485] In February 2020, Trump appointed Grenell acting Director of National Intelligence (DNI), marking the first time in history an openly gay official served in a Cabinet Level position. [486]

George Floyd protests
Further information: Reactions to the George Floyd protests § Federal
Donald Trump official portrait (cropped 2).jpg	Donald J. Trump	Twitter
@realDonaldTrump
Replying to @realDonaldTrump

....These THUGS are dishonoring the memory of George Floyd, and I won't let that happen. Just spoke to Governor Tim Walz and told him that the Military is with him all the way. Any difficulty and we will assume control but, when the looting starts, the shooting starts. Thank you!

May 29, 2020[487]

In response to the 2020 rioting and looting amid nationwide protests against racism and police brutality after a white Minneapolis police officer murdered an African American man named George Floyd, Trump tweeted a quote, "when the looting starts, the shooting starts", coined in 1967 by a Miami police chief that has been widely condemned by civil rights groups.[488][489] Trump later addressed protestors outside the White House by saying they "would have been greeted with the most vicious dogs, and most ominous weapons, I have ever seen" if they breached the White House fence.[489]

Photo-op at St. John's Episcopal Church
Main article: Donald Trump photo op at St. John's Church

Trump returns to the White House after posing for a photo op at St. John's Episcopal Church, June 2020
On June 1, 2020, hundreds of police officers, members of the National Guard and other forces, in riot gear used smoke canisters, rubber bullets, batons and shields to disperse a crowd of peaceful protesters outside St. John's Episcopal Church across Lafayette Square from the White House.[490][491] A news crew from Australia was attacked by these forces[492] and clergy on the church's porch suffered effects of the gas and were dispersed along with the others.[493] Trump, accompanied by other officials including the Secretary of Defense, then walked across Lafayette Square and posed for pictures while he was holding a Bible up for the cameras, outside the church which had suffered minor damage from a fire started by arsonists the night before.[494][495][496] Mariann Edgar Budde, Bishop of the Episcopal Diocese of Washington said she was "outraged" by Trump's actions,[497] which also received widespread condemnation from other religious leaders.[498][499][500] However, the reaction from the religious right and evangelicals generally praised the visit.[501][502][503]

Deployment of federal law enforcement to cities
Main article: 2020 deployment of federal forces in the United States
In July 2020, federal forces were deployed to Portland, Oregon, in response to rioting during protests against police brutality, which had resulted in vandalism to the city's federal courthouse.[504] The Department of Homeland Security cited Trump's June 26 executive order to protect statues and monuments as allowing federal officers to be deployed without the permission of individual states.[505][506] Federal agents fired pepper spray or tear gas at protesters who got too close to the U.S. courthouse.[507] The heavily armed officers were dressed in military camouflage uniforms (without identification) and used unmarked vans to arrest protestors, some of whom were nowhere near the federal courthouse.[508][509][510]

The presence and tactics of the officers drew widespread condemnation. Oregon officials including the governor, the mayor of Portland, and multiple members of Congress asked the DHS to remove federal agents from the city.[511][512][513] The mayor said the officers were causing violence and "we do not need or want their help."[511] Multiple Congressional committees asked for an investigation, saying "Citizens are concerned that the Administration has deployed a secret police force."[514][515] Lawsuits against the administration were filed by the American Civil Liberties Union[516] and the Attorney General of Oregon.[517] The inspectors general for the Justice Department and Homeland Security announced investigations into the deployment.[518]

Trump said he was pleased with the way things were going in Portland and said that he might send federal law enforcement to many more cities, including New York, Chicago, Philadelphia, Detroit, Baltimore, and Oakland – "all run by liberal Democrats".[519] Albuquerque and Milwaukee were also named as potential targets.[520][521]

Under a deal worked out between Governor Kate Brown and the Trump administration, federal agents withdrew to standby locations on July 30, while state and local law enforcement forces took over responsibility for protecting the courthouse; they made no arrests and mostly stayed out of sight. Protests that night were peaceful. A DHS spokesperson said federal officers would remain in the area at least until the following Monday.[522]

Science
Main article: Trump administration political interference with science agencies
See also: Politicization of science § Trump administration
The administration marginalized the role of science in policymaking, halted numerous research projects, and saw the departure of scientists who said their work was marginalized or suppressed.[303] In 2018, 19 months after Trump took office, meteorologist Kelvin Droegemeier became the Science Advisor to the President; this was the longest period without a science advisor since the 1976 administration.[523] While preparing for talks with Kim Jong-un, the White House did not do so with the assistance of a White House science adviser or senior counselor trained in nuclear physics. The position of chief scientist in the State Department or the Department of Agriculture was not filled. The administration nominated Sam Clovis to be chief scientist in the U.S. Department of Agriculture, but he had no scientific background and the White House later withdrew the nomination. The administration successfully nominated Jim Bridenstine, who had no background in science and rejected the scientific consensus on climate change, to lead NASA. The U.S. Department of the Interior, the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, and the Food and Drug Administration (FDA) disbanded advisory committees,[524] while the Department of Energy prohibited use of the term "climate change".[525][526] In March 2020, The New York Times reported that an official at the Interior Department has repeatedly inserted climate change-denying language into the agency's scientific reports, such as those that affect water and mineral rights.[527]

During the 2020 COVID-19 pandemic, the Trump administration replaced career public affairs staff at the Department of Health and Human Services with political appointees, including Michael Caputo, who interfered with weekly Centers for Disease Control (CDC) scientific reports and attempted to silence the government's most senior infectious disease expert, Anthony Fauci, "sowing distrust of the FDA at a time when health leaders desperately need people to accept a vaccine in order to create the immunity necessary to defeat the novel coronavirus".[528] One day after Trump noted that he might dismiss an FDA proposal to improve standards for emergency use of a COVID-19 vaccine, the Presidents of the National Academies of Sciences and Medicine issued a statement expressing alarm at political interference in science during a pandemic, "particularly the overriding of evidence and advice from public health officials and derision of government scientists".[529][530]

Space

Vice President Mike Pence, Second Lady Karen Pence and President Donald Trump watch the Crew Dragon Demo-2 Falcon 9 rocket launch from Kennedy Space Center
The Artemis program began in December 2017 under the Trump administration, with its initial focus on returning the Moon, including commercial mining and research expedition, to ensure the leading position in the emerging commercial space race. He also promoted the United States Space Force. On 20 December 2019, the Space Force Act developed by Democratic Representative Jim Cooper and Republican Representative Mike Rogers, was signed as part of the National Defense Authorization Act, reorganizing Air Force Space Command into the United States Space Force, and creating the first new independent military service since the Army Air Forces.

Surveillance
In 2019, Trump signed into law a six-year extension of Section 702 of the Foreign Intelligence Surveillance Act, allowing the NSA to conduct searches of foreigners' communications without any warrant. The process incidentally collects information from Americans.[531]

Veterans affairs
Prior to David Shulkin's firing in April 2018, The New York Times described the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs (VA) as a "rare spot of calm in the Trump administration". Shulkin built upon changes started under the Obama administration to do a long-term overhaul of the VA system.[532] In May 2018, legislation to increase veterans' access to private care was stalled, as was a VA overhaul which sought to synchronize medical records.[533] In May 2018, there were reports of a large number of resignations of senior staffers and a major re-shuffling.[532]

In August 2018, ProPublica reported that three wealthy patrons of Trump's Mar-a-Lago club, formed an "informal council" that strongly influenced VA policy, including reviewing a confidential $10 billion contract to modernize the VA's records.[534] The Government Accountability Office announced in November 2018 that it would investigate the matter.[535]

In 2018, Trump signed into law the VA MISSION Act, which expanded eligibility for the Veterans Choice program, allowing veterans greater access to private sector healthcare.[536] Trump falsely asserted more than 150 times that he created the Veterans Choice program, which has in fact existed since being signed into law by president Obama in 2014.[537][538]

Voting rights
Under the Trump administration, the Justice Department limited enforcement actions to protect voting rights, and in fact often defended restrictions on voting rights imposed by various states that have been challenged as voter suppression.[539][540] The Justice Department under Trump has filed only a single new case under the Voting Rights Act of 1965.[540] Trump's Justice Department opposed minority voters' interests in all of the major voting litigation since 2017 in which the Justice Department Civil Rights Division Voting Section has been involved.[540]

Trump has repeatedly alleged, without evidence, there was widespread voter fraud.[541] The administration created a commission with the stated purpose to review the extent of voter fraud in the wake of Trump's false claim that millions of unauthorized votes cost him the popular vote in the 2016 election. It was chaired by Vice President Pence, while the day-to-day administrator was Kris Kobach, best known for promoting restrictions on access to voting. The commission began its work by requesting each state to turn over detailed information about all registered voters in their database. Most states rejected the request, citing privacy concerns or state laws.[542] Multiple lawsuits were filed against the commission. Maine Secretary of State Matthew Dunlap said Kobach was refusing to share working documents and scheduling information with him and the other Democrats on the commission. A federal judge ordered the commission to hand over the documents.[543] Shortly thereafter, Trump disbanded the commission, and informed Dunlap that it would not obey the court order to provide the documents because the commission no longer existed.[544] Election integrity experts argued that the commission was disbanded because of the lawsuits, which would have led to greater transparency and accountability and thus prevented the Republican members of the commission from producing a sham report to justify restrictions on voting rights.[543] It was later revealed the commission had, in its requests for Texas voter data, specifically asked for data that identifies voters with Hispanic surnames.[545]

White nationalists and Charlottesville rally
See also: Unite the Right rally

Anti-Trump protest in Greensboro by the anti-fascist groups Democratic Socialists of America and Industrial Workers of the World
On August 13, 2017, Trump condemned violence "on many sides" after a gathering of hundreds of white nationalists in Charlottesville, Virginia, the previous day (August 12) turned deadly. A white supremacist drove a car into a crowd of counter-protesters, killing one woman and injuring 19 others. According to Sessions, that action met the definition of domestic terrorism.[546] During the rally there had been other violence, as some counter-protesters charged at the white nationalists with swinging clubs and mace, throwing bottles, rocks, and paint.[547][548][549] Trump did not expressly mention Neo-Nazis, white supremacists, or the alt-right movement in his remarks on August 13,[550] but the following day condemned "the KKK, neo-Nazis, white supremacists, and other hate groups".[551] On August 15, he again blamed "both sides".[552]

Many Republican and Democratic elected officials condemned the violence and hatred of white nationalists, neo-Nazis and alt-right activists. Trump came under criticism from world leaders[553] and politicians,[554][550] as well as a variety of religious groups[555] and anti-hate organizations[556] for his remarks, which were seen as muted and equivocal.[554] The New York Times reported Trump "was the only national political figure to spread blame for the 'hatred, bigotry and violence' that resulted in the death of one person to 'many sides'",[554] and said Trump had "buoyed the white nationalist movement on Tuesday as no president has done in generations".[557]

Foreign affairs
Main article: Foreign policy of the Donald Trump administration
See also: List of international presidential trips made by Donald Trump

Trump and North Korea's Communist Party leader Kim Jong-un shake hands at the Korean Demilitarized Zone, June 30, 2019
The foreign policy positions expressed by Trump during his presidential campaign changed frequently, so it was "difficult to glean a political agenda, or even a set of clear, core policy values ahead of his presidency".[558] Under a banner of "America First", the Trump administration distinguished itself from past administrations with frequent open admiration of authoritarian rulers and rhetorical rejections of key human rights norms.[559]

Despite pledges to reduce the number of active duty U.S. military personnel deployed overseas, the number was essentially the same three years into Trump's presidency as they were at the end of Obama's.[560]

On October 27, 2019, ISIS leader Abu Bakr al-Baghdadi killed himself and three children by detonating a suicide vest during the Barisha raid conducted by the U.S. Delta Force in Syria's northwestern Idlib Province.[561]

Trump withdrew from the Open Skies Treaty, a nearly three-decade old agreement promoting transparency of military forces and activities.[562]

Afghanistan
The number of U.S. troops deployed to Afghanistan decreased significantly during Trump's presidency. By the end of Trump's term in office troop levels in Afghanistan were at the lowest levels since the early days of the war in 2001.[563] Trump's presidency saw an expansion of drone warfare and a massive increase in civilian casualties from airstrikes in Afghanistan relative to the Obama administration.[564]

In February 2020, the Trump administration signed a deal with the Taliban, which if upheld by the Taliban, would result in the withdrawal of United States troops from Afghanistan by May 2021 (Trump's successor Joe Biden later extended the deadline to September 2021).[565][566] As part of the deal, the U.S. agreed to the release of 5,000 Taliban members who were imprisoned by the Afghan government; some of these ex-prisoners went on to join the 2021 Taliban offensive that felled the Afghan government.[567][568]

In 2020, US casualties in Afghanistan reached their lowest level for the entire war.[569] In Iraq, casualties increased, being significantly higher in Trump's term than Obama's second term.[570]

Following the collapse of the Afghan government and the fall of Kabul in August 2021, accusations by Olivia Troye surfaced on Twitter of the Trump Administration deliberately obstructing the visa process for Afghans who had helped U.S. efforts in Afghanistan.[571]

China
On January 19, 2021, Secretary of State Mike Pompeo announced that the Department of State had determined that "genocide and crimes against humanity" had been perpetrated by China against the Uyghur Muslims and other ethnic minorities in Xinjiang.[572] The announcement was made on the last day of Trump's presidency. The incoming president, Joe Biden, had already declared during his presidential campaign, that such a determination should be made.[572] On January 20, 2021, Pompeo along with other Trump administration officials were sanctioned by China.[573]

Cuba
This section is an excerpt from Cuba–United States relations § Trump administration.[edit]
With the election of Republican Donald Trump as U.S. president, the state of relations between the United States and Cuba was unclear as of January 2017. While a candidate for the presidency, Trump criticized aspects of the Cuban Thaw, suggesting he could suspend the normalization process unless he can negotiate "a good agreement".[574]

On 16 June 2017, President Trump announced that he was suspending what he called a "completely one-sided deal with Cuba". Trump characterized Obama's policy as having granted Cuba economic sanctions relief for nothing in return. Since then, the administration's new policy has aimed to impose new restrictions with regards to travel and funding; however, traveling via airlines and cruise lines has not been prohibited completely. Moreover, diplomatic relations remain intact and embassies in Washington D.C. and Havana stay open.[575][576][577]

On 12 January 2021, the U.S. State Department added Cuba to its list of state sponsors of terrorism. Secretary of State Mike Pompeo stated that Cuba harboured several American fugitives, including Assata Shakur, as well as members of the Colombian National Liberation Army and supported the regime of Nicolás Maduro. This decision was interpreted as being linked to the support of President Trump by the Cuban-American community during the 2020 U.S. election.[578][579][580]
North Korea
After initially adopting a verbally hostile posture[581] toward North Korea and its leader, Kim Jong-un, Trump quickly pivoted to embrace the regime, saying he and Kim "fell in love".[582] Trump engaged Kim by meeting him at two summits, in June 2018 and February 2019, an unprecedented move by an American president, as previous policy had been that a president's simply meeting with the North Korean leader would legitimize the regime on the world stage. During the June 2018 summit, the leaders signed a vague agreement to pursue denuclearization of the Korean peninsula, with Trump immediately declaring "There is no longer a Nuclear Threat from North Korea."[583] Little progress was made toward that goal during the months before the February 2019 summit, which ended abruptly without an agreement, hours after the White House announced a signing ceremony was imminent.[584] During the months between the summits, a growing body of evidence indicated North Korea was continuing its nuclear fuel, bomb and missile development, including by redeveloping an ICBM site it was previously appearing to dismantle – even while the second summit was underway.[585][586][587][588] In the aftermath of the February 2019 failed summit, the Treasury department imposed additional sanctions on North Korea. The following day, Trump tweeted, "It was announced today by the U.S. Treasury that additional large scale Sanctions would be added to those already existing Sanctions on North Korea. I have today ordered the withdrawal of those additional Sanctions!"[589] On December 31, 2019, the Korean Central News Agency announced that Kim had abandoned his moratoriums on nuclear and intercontinental ballistic missile tests, quoting Kim as saying, "the world will witness a new strategic weapon to be possessed by the DPRK in the near future."[590][591] Two years after the Singapore summit, the North Korean nuclear arsenal had significantly expanded.[592][593]

During a June 2019 visit to South Korea, Trump visited the Korean Demilitarized Zone and invited North Korean leader Kim Jong-un to meet him there, which he did, and Trump became the first sitting president to step inside North Korea.[594][a]

Turkey

Trump with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan in the Oval Office, November 13, 2019
In October 2019, after Trump spoke to Turkish president Recep Tayyip Erdoğan, the White House acknowledged that Turkey would be carrying out a planned military offensive into northern Syria; as such, U.S. troops in northern Syria were withdrawn from the area to avoid interference with that operation. The statement also passed responsibility for the area's captured ISIS fighters to Turkey.[596] Congress members of both parties denounced the move, including Republican allies of Trump like Senator Lindsey Graham. They argued that the move betrayed the American-allied Kurds, and would benefit ISIS, Russia, Iran and Bashar al-Assad's Syrian regime.[597] Trump defended the move, citing the high cost of supporting the Kurds, and the lack of support from the Kurds in past U.S. wars.[598] Within a week of the U.S. pullout, Turkey proceeded to attack Kurdish-controlled areas in northeast Syria.[599] Kurdish forces then announced an alliance with the Syrian government and its Russian allies, in a united effort to repel Turkey.[600]

Iran
In 2020, the Trump administration asserted that the U.S. remained a “participant” in the Iran Deal, despite having formally withdrawn in 2018, to persuade the United Nations Security Council to reimpose pre-agreement sanctions on Iran for its breaches of the deal after the U.S. withdrawal. The agreement provided for a resolution process among signatories in the event of a breach, but that process had not yet played out. The Security Council voted on the administration's proposal in August, with only the Dominican Republic joining the U.S. to vote in favor.[601][602]

Saudi Arabia
See also: 2017 United States–Saudi Arabia arms deal

Trump with Prince Mohammad bin Salman, Washington, D.C., March 14, 2017
Trump actively supported the Saudi Arabian-led intervention in Yemen against the Houthis.[603][604][605] Trump also praised his relationship with Saudi Arabia's powerful Crown Prince Mohammad bin Salman.[603] On May 20, 2017, Trump and Saudi Arabia's King Salman bin Abdulaziz Al Saud signed a series of letters of intent for the Kingdom of Saudi Arabia to purchase arms from the United States totaling $110 billion immediately,[606][607] and $350 billion over ten years.[608][609] The transfer was widely seen as a counterbalance against the influence of Iran in the region[610][611] and a "significant" and "historic" expansion of United States relations with Saudi Arabia.[612][613][614][608][615] By July 2019, two of Trump's three vetoes were to overturn bipartisan congressional action related to Saudi Arabia.[616]

In October 2018, amid widespread condemnation of Saudi Arabia for the murder of prominent Saudi journalist and dissident Jamal Khashoggi, the Trump administration pushed back on the condemnation.[617] After the CIA assessed that Saudi Crown Prince Mohammad bin Salman ordered the murder of Khashoggi, Trump rejected the assessment and said the CIA only had "feelings" on the matter.[618]

Israel / Palestine
Since the Six Day War in 1967, the United States had considered Israeli settlements in the occupied West Bank to be "illegitimate". This status changed in November 2019 when the Trump administration shifted U.S. policy and[619] declared "the establishment of Israeli civilian settlements in the West Bank is not per se inconsistent with international law."[620]

Trump unveiled his own peace plan to resolve the Israeli–Palestinian conflict on January 28, 2020.[621] His first official diplomatic success was realized in August 2020 with the first of the Abraham Accords, when Israel and the United Arab Emirates agreed to begin normalizing relations in an agreement brokered by Jared Kushner.[622][623] The following month, Israel and Bahrain agreed to normalize diplomatic relations in another deal mediated and brokered by the Trump administration.[624][625][626] A month later, Israel and Sudan agreed to normalize relations in a third such agreement in as many months. On December 10, 2020, Trump announced that Israel and Morocco had agreed to establish full diplomatic relations, while also announcing that the United States recognized Morocco's claim over the disputed territory of Western Sahara.[627]

United Arab Emirates
As Donald Trump lost the election bid against Joe Biden, the U.S. State Department notified Congress about its plans to sell 18 sophisticated armed MQ-9B aerial drones to the United Arab Emirates, under a deal worth $2.9 billion. The drones were expected to be equipped with maritime radar, and the delivery was being estimated by 2024.[628] Besides, another informal notification was sent to the Congress regarding the plans of providing the UAE with $10 billion of defense equipment, including precision-guided munitions, non-precision bombs and missiles.[629]

Defense
Further information: Foreign policy of the Donald Trump administration § Military

Trump and Vice President Mike Pence at the welcoming ceremony for Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff Mark Milley (left) on September 30, 2019. Outgoing chairman General Joseph Dunford (right) and Secretary of Defense Mark Esper (center-right) are present.
As a candidate and as president, Trump called for a major build-up of American military capabilities Trump announced in October 2018 that America would withdraw from the Intermediate-Range Nuclear Forces Treaty with Russia to enable America to counter increasing Chinese intermediate nuclear missile capabilities in the Pacific.[630] In December 2018, Trump complained about the amount America spends on an "uncontrollable arms race" with Russia and China. Trump said the $716 billion America is now spending on the "arms race" was "Crazy!", after praising his increased defense spending five months earlier. The total fiscal 2019 defense budget authorization was $716 billion, although missile defense and nuclear programs made up about $10 billion of the total.[631][632]

During 2018, Trump falsely asserted he had secured the largest defense budget authorization ever, the first military pay raise in ten years, and that military spending was at least 4.0% of GDP, "which got a lot bigger since I became your president".[633]

Controversy arose in November 2019 after Trump pardoned or promoted three soldiers accused or convicted of war crimes.[634] The most prominent case involved Eddie Gallagher, a Navy SEAL team chief who had been reported to Navy authorities by his own team members for sniping at an unarmed civilian girl and an elderly man. Gallagher faced court martial for the murder of a wounded teenage combatant, among other charges, and the medic of his SEAL team was granted immunity to testify against him, but on the witness stand the medic reversed what he had previously told investigators and testified that he himself had murdered the terrorist suspect. Gallagher was subsequently acquitted of the murder charge against him, and the Navy demoted him to the lowest possible rank due to his conviction on another charge. The Navy later moved to strip Gallagher of his Trident pin and eject him from the Navy. Trump intervened to restore Gallagher's rank and pin. Many military officers were enraged by Trump's intervention, as they felt it disrupted principles of military discipline and justice. Secretary of the Navy Richard Spencer protested Trump's intervention and was forced to resign; in his resignation letter, he sharply rebuked Trump for his judgment in the matter. Trump told a rally audience days later, "I stuck up for three great warriors against the deep state."[635][636][637]

The Trump administration sharply increased the frequency of drone strikes compared to the preceding Obama administration, in countries such as Afghanistan, Iraq, Somalia, Syria and Yemen,[638][639] rollbacked transparency in reporting drone strike deaths,[640] and reduced accountability.[641] In March 2019, Trump ended the Obama policy of reporting the number of civilian deaths caused by U.S. drone strikes, claiming that this policy was unnecessary.[642]

Russia and related investigations
See also: Links between Trump associates and Russian officials, Business projects of Donald Trump in Russia, and Operation Crossfire Hurricane

Robert Mueller in the Oval Office c. 2012
American intelligence sources found the Russian government attempted to intervene in the 2016 presidential election to favor the election of Trump,[643] and that members of Trump's campaign were in contact with Russian government officials both before and after the election.[644] In May 2017, the Department of Justice appointed Robert Mueller as special counsel to investigate "any links and/or coordination between Russian government and individuals associated with the campaign of President Donald Trump, and any matters that arose or may arise directly from the investigation".[645]

During his January 2017 confirmation hearings as the attorney general nominee before the Senate, then-Senator Jeff Sessions appeared to deliberately omit two meetings he had in 2016 with Russian Ambassador Sergey Kislyak, when asked if he had meetings involving the 2016 election with Russian government officials. Sessions later amended his testimony saying he "never met with any Russian officials to discuss issues of the campaign".[646] Following his amended statement, Sessions recused himself from any investigation regarding connections between Trump and Russia.[647]

In May 2017, Trump discussed highly classified intelligence in an Oval Office meeting with the Russian foreign minister Sergey Lavrov and ambassador Sergey Kislyak, providing details that could expose the source of the information and how it was collected.[648] A Middle Eastern ally provided the intelligence which had the highest level of classification and was not intended to be shared widely.[648] The New York Times reported, "sharing the information without the express permission of the ally who provided it was a major breach of espionage etiquette, and could jeopardize a crucial intelligence-sharing relationship."[648] The White House, through National Security Advisor H. R. McMaster, issued a limited denial, saying the story "as reported" was incorrect[649] and that no "intelligence sources or methods" were discussed.[650] McMaster did not deny that information had been disclosed.[651] The following day Trump said on Twitter that Russia is an important ally against terrorism and that he had an "absolute right" to share classified information with Russia.[652] Soon after the meeting, American intelligence extracted a high-level covert source from within the Russian government, on concerns the individual could be at risk due, in part, to Trump and his administration repeatedly mishandling classified intelligence.[653]

In October 2017, former Trump campaign advisor George Papadopoulos pleaded guilty to one count of making false statements to the FBI regarding his contacts with Russian agents. During the campaign he had tried repeatedly but unsuccessfully to set up meetings in Russia between Trump campaign representatives and Russian officials.[654]

Trump went to great lengths to keep details of his private conversations with Russian president Putin secret, including in one case by retaining his interpreter's notes and instructing the linguist to not share the contents of the discussions with anyone in the administration. As a result, there were no detailed records, even in classified files, of Trump's conversations with Putin on five occasions.[655][656]

Of Trump's campaign advisors and staff, six of them were indicted by the special counsel's office; five of them (Michael Cohen, Michael Flynn, Rick Gates, Paul Manafort, George Papadopoulos) pleaded guilty, while one has pleaded not guilty (Roger Stone).[657] As of December 2020, Stone, Papadopoulos, Manafort, and Flynn have been pardoned by Trump, but not Cohen or Gates.[658]

On June 12, 2019, Trump asserted he saw nothing wrong in accepting intelligence on his political adversaries from foreign powers, such as Russia, and he could see no reason to contact the FBI about it. Responding to a reporter who told him FBI director Christopher Wray had said such activities should be reported to the FBI, Trump said, "the FBI director is wrong." Trump elaborated, "there's nothing wrong with listening. If somebody called from a country, Norway, 'we have information on your opponent' – oh, I think I'd want to hear it." Both Democrats and Republicans repudiated the remarks.[659][660][661][662]

The New York Times reported in June 2021 that in 2017 and 2018 the Justice Department subpoenaed metadata from the iCloud accounts of at least a dozen individuals associated with the House Intelligence Committee, including that of Democrat ranking member Adam Schiff and Eric Swalwell, and family members, to investigate leaks to the press about contacts between Trump associates and Russia. Records of the inquiry did not implicate anyone associated with the committee, but upon becoming attorney general Bill Barr revived the effort, including by appointing a federal prosecutor and about six others in February 2020. The Times reported that, apart from corruption investigations, subpoenaing communications information of members of Congress is nearly unheard-of, and that some in the Justice Department saw Barr's approach as politically motivated.[663][664] Justice Department inspector general Michael Horowitz announced an inquiry into the matter the day after the Times report.[665]

Special Counsel's report
Main article: Mueller Report
In February 2018, when Special Counsel Mueller indicted more than a dozen Russians and three entities for interference in the 2016 election, Trump's response was to assert that the indictment was proof his campaign did not collude with the Russians.[666] The New York Times noted Trump "voiced no concern that a foreign power had been trying for nearly four years to upend American democracy, much less resolve to stop it from continuing to do so this year".[666]

In July 2018, the special counsel indicted twelve Russian intelligence operatives and accused them of conspiring to interfere in the 2016 U.S. elections, by hacking servers and emails of the Democratic Party and the Hillary Clinton campaign.[667] The indictments were made before Trump's meeting with Putin in Helsinki, in which Trump supported Putin's denial that Russia was involved and criticized American law enforcement and intelligence community (subsequently Trump partially walked back some of his comments).[668] A few days later, it was reported that Trump had actually been briefed on the veracity and extent of Russian cyber-attacks two weeks before his inauguration, back in December 2016, including the fact that these were ordered by Putin himself.[668] The evidence presented to him at the time included text and email conversations between Russian military officers as well as information from a source close to Putin.[668]


The redacted version of the Mueller report was released to the public by the Department of Justice on April 18, 2019.
On March 22, 2019, Special Counsel Robert Mueller submitted the final report to Attorney General William Barr. Two days later, Barr sent Congress a four-page letter, describing what he said were the special counsel's principal conclusions in the Mueller Report. Barr added that since the special counsel "did not draw a conclusion" on obstruction,[669] this "leaves it to the Attorney General to determine whether the conduct described in the report constitutes a crime".[670] Barr continued: "Deputy Attorney General Rod Rosenstein and I have concluded that the evidence developed during the Special Counsel's investigation is not sufficient to establish that the President committed an obstruction-of-justice offense."[671][672]

On April 18, 2019, a two-volume redacted version of the Special Counsel's report titled Report on the Investigation into Russian interference in the 2016 Presidential Election was released to Congress and to the public. About one-eighth of the lines in the public version were redacted.[673][674][675]

Volume I discusses about Russian interference in the 2016 presidential election, concluding that interference occurred "in sweeping and systematic fashion" and "violated U.S. criminal law".[676][677] The report detailed activities by the Internet Research Agency, a Kremlin-linked Russian troll farm, to create a "social media campaign that favored presidential candidate Donald J. Trump and disparaged presidential candidate Hillary Clinton",[678] and to "provoke and amplify political and social discord in the United States".[679] The report also described how the Russian intelligence service, the GRU, performed computer hacking and strategic releasing of damaging material from the Clinton campaign and Democratic Party organizations.[680][681] To establish whether a crime was committed by members of the Trump campaign with regard to Russian interference, investigators used the legal standard for criminal conspiracy rather than the popular concept of "collusion", because a crime of "collusion" is not found in criminal law or the United States Code.[682][683]

According to the report, the investigation "identified numerous links between the Russian government and the Trump campaign", and found that Russia had "perceived it would benefit from a Trump presidency" and the 2016 Trump presidential campaign "expected it would benefit electorally" from Russian hacking efforts. Ultimately, "the investigation did not establish that members of the Trump campaign conspired or coordinated with the Russian government in its election interference activities."[684][685] However, investigators had an incomplete picture of what had really occurred during the 2016 campaign, due to some associates of Trump campaign providing either false, incomplete or declined testimony (exercising the Fifth Amendment), as well as having deleted, unsaved or encrypted communications. As such, the Mueller Report "cannot rule out the possibility" that information then unavailable to investigators would have presented different findings.[686]

Volume II covered obstruction of justice. The report described ten episodes where Trump may have obstructed justice as president, plus one instance before he was elected.[687][688] The report said that in addition to Trump's public attacks on the investigation and its subjects, he had also privately tried to "control the investigation" in multiple ways, but mostly failed to influence it because his subordinates or associates refused to carry out his instructions.[689][690] For that reason, no charges against the Trump's aides and associates were recommended "beyond those already filed".[687] The Special Counsel could not charge Trump himself once investigators decided to abide by an Office of Legal Counsel (OLC) opinion that a sitting president cannot stand trial,[691][692] and they feared charges would affect Trump's governing and possibly preempt his impeachment.[692][693] In addition, investigators felt it would be unfair to accuse Trump of a crime without charges and without a trial in which he could clear his name,[691][692][689] hence investigators "determined not to apply an approach that could potentially result in a judgment that the President committed crimes".[692][694][695][696]

Since the Special Counsel's office had decided "not to make a traditional prosecutorial judgment" on whether to "initiate or decline a prosecution", they "did not draw ultimate conclusions about the President's conduct". The report "does not conclude that the president committed a crime",[678][697] but specifically did not exonerate Trump on obstruction of justice, because investigators were not confident that Trump was innocent after examining his intent and actions.[698][699] The report concluded "that Congress has authority to prohibit a President's corrupt use of his authority in order to protect the integrity of the administration of justice" and "that Congress may apply the obstruction laws to the president's corrupt exercise of the powers of office accords with our constitutional system of checks and balances and the principle that no person is above the law".[695][699][689]

On May 1, 2019, following publication of the Special Counsel's report, Barr testified before the Senate Judiciary Committee, during which Barr said he "didn't exonerate" Trump on obstruction as that was not the role of the Justice Department.[700] He declined to testify before the House Judiciary Committee the following day because he objected to the committee's plan to use staff lawyers during questioning.[701] Barr also repeatedly[702] failed to give the unredacted Special Counsel's report to the Judiciary Committee by its deadline of May 6, 2019.[703] On May 8, 2019, the committee voted to hold Barr in contempt of Congress, which refers the matter to entire House for resolution.[704] Concurrently, Trump asserted executive privilege via the Department of Justice in an effort to prevent the redacted portions of the Special Counsel's report and the underlying evidence from being disclosed.[705] Committee chairman Jerry Nadler said the U.S. is in a constitutional crisis, "because the President is disobeying the law, is refusing all information to Congress".[706] Speaker Nancy Pelosi said Trump was "self-impeaching" by stonewalling Congress.[707]

Following release of the Mueller Report, Trump and his allies turned their attention toward "investigating the investigators".[708] On May 23, 2019, Trump ordered the intelligence community to cooperate with Barr's investigation of the origins of the investigation, granting Barr full authority to declassify any intelligence information related to the matter. Some analysts expressed concerns that the order could create a conflict between the Justice Department and the intelligence community over closely guarded intelligence sources and methods, as well as open the possibility Barr could cherrypick intelligence for public release to help Trump.[709][710][711][712]

Upon announcing the formal closure of the investigation and his resignation from the Justice Department on May 29, Mueller said, "If we had had confidence that the president clearly did not commit a crime, we would have said so. We did not, however, decide as to whether the president did commit a crime."[713] During his testimony to Congress on July 24, 2019, Mueller said that a president could be charged with obstruction of justice (or other crimes) after the president left office.[714]

Counter-investigations
Amid accusations by Trump and his supporters that he had been subjected to an illegitimate investigation, in May 2019 attorney general Bill Barr appointed federal prosecutor John Durham to review the origins of the Crossfire Hurricane investigation.[715] By September 2020, Durham's inquiry had expanded to include the FBI's investigation of the Clinton Foundation during the 2016 campaign.[716] A previous two-year review of earlier Clinton investigations by another Trump Justice Department federal prosecutor, John Huber, was wound-down in January 2020 after finding no improper activity.[717]

Ethics
See also: Lobbying in the United States, List of lawsuits involving Donald Trump, Trump–Ukraine scandal, and Donald Trump sexual misconduct allegations
The Trump administration has been characterized by a departure from ethical norms.[718][719] Unlike previous administrations of both parties, the Trump White House has not observed a strict boundary between official government activities and personal, political, or campaign activities.[718][720][721]

Role of lobbyists
During the 2016 campaign, Trump promised to "drain the swamp" – a phrase that usually refers to entrenched corruption and lobbying in Washington, D.C. – and he proposed a series of ethics reforms.[722] However, according to federal records and interviews, there has been a dramatic increase in lobbying by corporations and hired interests during Trump's tenure, particularly through the office of Vice-President Mike Pence.[723] About twice as many lobbying firms contacted Pence, compared to previous presidencies, among them representatives of major energy firms and drug companies.[723] In many cases, the lobbyists have charged their clients millions of dollars for access to the vice president, and then have turned around and donated the money to Pence's political causes.[723]

Among the administration's first policies was a five-year ban on serving as a lobbyist after working in the executive branch.[722] However, as one of his final acts of office, Trump rolled back that policy, thus allowing administration staff to work as lobbyists.[724]

A number of former Trump associates, fundraisers and aides had faced criminal charges. In July 2021, one of his high-profile associates and a close friend, Thomas J. Barrack Jr. was arrested on federal charges for acting as an unregistered foreign lobbyist, obstructing justice and giving false statements to the FBI. The 74-year-old private equity investor was accused in a seven-count indictment of illegally lobbying and exerting influence over Trump on behalf of the United Arab Emirates. Federal prosecutors said Barrack had to complete the “wish list” given by the Emirati officials, stating what foreign policy changes they expected from the US. A former top executive at Barrack's firm, Matthew Grimes, and an Emirati businessman, Rashid al-Malik, also faced federal charges of acting as Emirati agents without registering with the Justice Department. Barrack pleaded not guilty and was released from custody after posting $250 million bail with a cash security of $5 million.[725][726][727]

Potential conflicts of interest

Tayyip Erdoğan, then the prime minister of Turkey, attended the opening of the Trump Towers Istanbul AVM in 2012.
Trump's presidency has been marked by significant public concern about conflict of interest stemming from his diverse business ventures. In the lead up to his inauguration, Trump promised to remove himself from the day-to-day operations of his businesses.[728] Trump placed his sons Eric Trump and Donald Trump Jr. at the head of his businesses claiming they would not communicate with him regarding his interests. However, critics noted that this would not prevent him from having input into his businesses and knowing how to benefit himself, and Trump continued to receive quarterly updates on his businesses.[729] As his presidency progressed, he failed to take steps or show interest in further distancing himself from his business interests resulting in numerous potential conflicts.[730] Ethics experts found Trump's plan to address conflicts of interest between his position as president and his private business interests to be entirely inadequate.[731] Unlike every other president in the last 40 years, Trump did not put his business interests in a blind trust or equivalent arrangement "to cleanly sever himself from his business interests".[731] In January 2018, a year into his presidency, Trump owned stakes in hundreds of businesses.[732]

After Trump took office, the watchdog group Citizens for Responsibility and Ethics in Washington, represented by a number of constitutional scholars, sued him[733] for violations of the Foreign Emoluments Clause (a constitutional provision that bars the president or any other federal official from taking gifts or payments from foreign governments), because his hotels and other businesses accept payment from foreign governments.[733][734][735] CREW separately filed a complaint with the General Services Administration (GSA) over Trump International Hotel Washington, D.C.; the 2013 lease that Trump and the GSA signed "explicitly forbids any elected government official from holding the lease or benefiting from it".[736] The GSA said it was "reviewing the situation".[736] By May 2017, the CREW v. Trump lawsuit had grown with additional plaintiffs and alleged violations of the Domestic Emoluments Clause.[737] In June 2017, attorneys from the Department of Justice filed a motion to dismiss the case on the grounds that the plaintiffs had no right to sue[738] and that the described conduct was not illegal.[739] Also in June 2017, two more lawsuits were filed based on the Foreign Emoluments Clause: D.C. and Maryland v. Trump,[740][741] and Blumenthal v. Trump, which was signed by more than one-third of the voting members of Congress.[742] United States District Judge George B. Daniels dismissed the CREW case on December 21, 2017, holding that plaintiffs lacked standing.[743][744] D.C. and Maryland v. Trump cleared three judicial hurdles to proceed to the discovery phase during 2018,[745][746][747] with prosecutors issuing 38 subpoenas to Trump's businesses and cabinet departments in December before the Fourth Circuit Court of Appeals issued a stay days later at the behest of the Justice Department, pending hearings in March 2019.[748][749][750] NBC News reported that by June 2019 representatives of 22 governments had spent money at Trump properties.[751] In January 2021, the U.S. Supreme Court dismissed the lawsuits as Trump was no longer president.[752]

Saudi Arabia
See also: Saudi Arabia lobby in the United States
In March 2018, The New York Times reported that George Nader had turned Trump's major fundraiser Elliott Broidy "into an instrument of influence at the White House for the rulers of Saudi Arabia and the United Arab Emirates ... High on the agenda of the two men ... was pushing the White House to remove Secretary of State Rex W. Tillerson," a top defender of the Iran nuclear deal in Donald Trump's administration, and "backing confrontational approaches to Iran and Qatar".[753]

Transparency and data availability
The Washington Post reported in May 2017, "a wide variety of information that until recently was provided to the public, limiting access, for instance, to disclosures about workplace violations, energy efficiency, and animal welfare abuses" had been removed or tucked away. The Obama administration had used the publication of enforcement actions taken by federal agencies against companies as a way to name and shame companies that engaged in unethical and illegal behaviors.[754]

The Trump administration stopped the Obama administration policy of logging visitors to the White House, making it difficult to tell who has visited the White House.[754][755] Nathan Cortez of the Southern Methodist University's Dedman School of Law, who studies the handling of public data, said the Trump administration, unlike the Obama administration, was taking transparency "in the opposite direction".[754]

Hatch Act violations
In the first three and a half years of Trump's term, the Office of Special Counsel, an independent federal government ethics agency, found 13 senior Trump administration officials in violation of the Hatch Act of 1939, which restricts the government employees' involvement in politics; 11 of the complaints were filed by the activist group Citizens for Responsibility and Ethics in Washington (CREW).[718][720] By comparison, CREW stated that it was aware of only two findings of Hatch Act violations during the eight years of the Obama administration.[718]

Security clearances
In March 2019, Tricia Newbold, a White House employee working on security clearances, privately told the House Oversight Committee that at least 25 Trump administration officials had been granted security clearances over the objections of career staffers. Newbold also asserted that some of these officials had previously had their applications rejected for "disqualifying issues", only for those rejections to be overturned with inadequate explanation.[756][757][758]

After the House Oversight Committee subpoenaed former head of White House security clearances Carl Kline to give testimony, the administration instructed Kline not to comply with the subpoena, asserting that the subpoena "unconstitutionally encroaches on fundamental executive branch interests".[759][760] Kline eventually gave closed-door testimony before the committee in May 2019, but House Democrats said he did not "provide specific details to their questions".[761]

Impeachment inquiry
Main article: Impeachment inquiry against Donald Trump
See also: Trump–Ukraine scandal
On August 12, 2019, an unnamed intelligence official privately filed a whistleblower complaint with Michael Atkinson, the Inspector General of the Intelligence Community (ICIG), under the provisions of the Intelligence Community Whistleblower Protection Act (ICWPA).[762] The whistleblower alleged that Trump had abused his office in soliciting foreign interference to improve his own electoral chances in 2020. The complaint reports that in a July 2019 call, Trump had asked Ukrainian president Volodymyr Zelensky to investigate potential 2020 rival presidential candidate Joe Biden and his son Hunter Biden, as well as matters pertaining to whether Russian interference occurred in the 2016 U.S. election with regard to Democratic National Committee servers and the company Crowdstrike. Trump allegedly nominated his personal lawyer Rudy Giuliani and Attorney General William Barr to work with Ukraine on these matters. Additionally, the whistleblower alleged that the White House attempted to "lock down" the call records in a cover-up, and that the call was part of a wider pressure campaign by Giuliani and the Trump administration to urge Ukraine to investigate the Bidens. The whistleblower posits that the pressure campaign may have included Trump cancelling Vice President Mike Pence's May 2019 Ukraine trip, and Trump withholding financial aid from Ukraine in July 2019.[763][764][765][766]

Inspector General Atkinson found the whistleblower's complaint both urgent and credible, so he transmitted the complaint on August 26 to Joseph Maguire, the acting Director of National Intelligence (DNI). Under the law, Maguire was supposed to forward the complaint to the Senate and House Intelligence Committees within a week. Maguire refused, so Atkinson informed the congressional committees of the existence of the complaint, but not its content.[767][768] The general counsel for Maguire's office said that since the complaint was not about someone in the intelligence community, it was not an "urgent concern" and thus there was no need to pass it to Congress. Later testifying before the House Intelligence Committee on September 26, Maguire said he had consulted with the White House Counsel and the Justice Department's Office of Legal Counsel, of which the latter office gave him the rationale to withhold the complaint.[769] Maguire also testified: "I think the whistleblower did the right thing. I think he followed the law every step of the way."[770]

On September 22, Trump confirmed that he had discussed with Zelensky how "we don't want our people like Vice President Biden and his son creating to the corruption already in the Ukraine."[771] Trump also confirmed that he had indeed temporarily withheld military aid from Ukraine, offering contradicting reasons for his decision on September 23 and 24.[772]


Open hearing testimony of Fiona Hill and David Holmes on November 21, 2019
On September 24, House Speaker Nancy Pelosi announced the start of a formal impeachment inquiry.[773] On September 25, the White House released a non-verbatim transcript of the call between Trump and Zelensky; while the members and staff of congressional intelligence committees were allowed to read whistleblower complaint.[768] On September 26, the White House declassified the whistleblower's complaint, so Schiff released the complaint to the public.[768] The non-verbatim transcript corroborated the main allegations of the whistleblower's report about the Trump–Zelensky call.[774] The non-verbatim transcript stated that after Zelensky discussed the possibility of buying American anti-tank missiles to defend Ukraine, Trump instead asked for a favor, suggesting an investigation of the company Crowdstrike, while later in the call he also called for an investigation of the Bidens, and cooperation with Giuliani and Barr.[775][776] On September 27, the White House confirmed the whistleblower's allegation that the Trump administration had stored the Trump–Zelensky transcript in a highly classified system.[777]

Following these revelations, members of congress largely divided along party lines, with Democrats generally in favor of impeachment proceedings and Republicans defending the president.[778] Ukraine envoy Kurt Volker resigned and three House committees issued a subpoena to Secretary of State Mike Pompeo to schedule depositions for Volker and four other State Department employees, and to compel the release of documents.[779][780] Attention to the issue also led to further revelations by anonymous sources. These included the misuse of classification systems to hide records of conversations with Ukrainian, Russian and Saudi Arabian leaders, and statements made to Sergei Lavrov and Sergey Kislyak in May 2017 expressing disconcern about Russian interference in U.S. elections.[781][782]

Use of the Office of President
Trump often sought to use the office of the presidency for his own interest. Under his leadership, the Justice Department, which is traditionally independent from the President, became highly partisan and acted in Trump's interest.[783][784][785][786] Bloomberg News reported in October 2019 that during a 2017 Oval Office meeting, Trump had asked Secretary of State Rex Tillerson to pressure the Justice Department to drop a criminal investigation of Reza Zarrab, an Iranian-Turkish gold trader who was a client of Trump associate Rudy Giuliani. Tillerson reportedly refused.[787]

Trump attempted to host the 2020 G7 Summit at his Doral Golf Resort, from which he could have made significant profits.[788] Trump has visited his properties 274 times during his presidency. Government officials were charged as much as $650 per night to stay at Trump's properties.[789]

In the lead up to the 2020 election, Trump and Postmaster General Louis DeJoy, a close ally of Trump, sought to hamper the US postal service by cutting funding and services, a move which would prevent postal votes from being counted during the COVID-19 pandemic.[790]

Trump has fired, demoted or withdrawn numerous government officials in retaliation for actions that projected negatively on his public image, or harmed his personal or political interests, including Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) Director James Comey,[791] Deputy FBI Director Andrew McCabe, U.S. Attorney General Jeff Sessions,[792] and Director of National Intelligence Joseph Maguire.[793]

In December 2020, shortly before Christmas and in his last month in office, Trump granted 26 people full pardons and commuted the sentences of three others convicted of federal crimes. Those who benefitted included his former campaign advisor Paul Manafort, advisor and personal friend Roger Stone and Charles Kushner, father of Trump's son-in-law and confidant Jared Kushner.[794] In the final hours of his presidency, Donald Trump pardoned nearly 74 people, including rappers, financiers, and former members of congress. Those pardoned include his former senior adviser Steve Bannon, Jared Kushner's friend charged with cyberstalking, Ken Kurson; a real estate lawyer, Albert Pirro; and rappers prosecuted on federal weapons offenses, Lil Wayne and Kodak Black. Trump also pardoned his former fundraiser Elliott Broidy, who worked for China, the UAE, and Russia at the White House. Broidy also lobbied the US government to end the investigations in the 1MDB scandal.[795]

Cost of trips
According to several reports, Trump's and his family's trips in the first month of his presidency cost U.S. taxpayers nearly as much as former president Obama's travel expenses for an entire year. When Obama was president, Trump frequently criticized him for taking vacations which were paid for with public funds.[796] The Washington Post reported that Trump's atypically lavish lifestyle is far more expensive to the taxpayers than what was typical of former presidents and could end up in the hundreds of millions of dollars over the whole of Trump's term.[797]

A June 2019 analysis by the Washington Post found that federal officials and GOP campaigns had spent at least $1.6 million at businesses owned by Trump during his presidency.[798] This was an undercount, as most of the data on spending by government officials covered only the first few months of Trump's presidency.[798]

Elections during the Trump presidency
Republican seats in Congress
Congress	Senate	House
115th[b]	52	241
116th	53	200
117th[b]	51[c]	211[d]
2018 mid-term elections
Main article: 2018 United States elections
In the 2018 mid-term elections, Democrats had a blue wave, winning control of the House of Representatives, while Republicans expanded their majority in the Senate.[799]

2020 re-election campaign
Main article: 2020 United States presidential election
Further information: 2020 United States elections, Donald Trump 2020 presidential campaign, 2020 Republican Party presidential primaries, and 2020 Republican National Convention

Democrat Joe Biden defeated Trump in the 2020 presidential election.
On June 18, 2019, Trump announced that he would seek re-election in the 2020 presidential election.[800] Trump did not face any significant rivals for the 2020 Republican nomination, with some state Republican parties cancelling the presidential primaries in the states.[801] Trump's Democratic opponent in the general election was former Vice President Joe Biden of Delaware. The election on November 3 was not called for either candidate for several days. On November 7, the Associated Press – along with major TV networks including CNN, ABC News, CBS News, NBC News, and Fox News – called the race for Joe Biden.[802]

Transition
Trump refused to concede, and the administration did not begin cooperating with president-elect Biden's transition team until November 23.[803][804] In late December 2020, Biden and his transition team criticized Trump administration political appointees for hampering the transition and failing to cooperate with the Biden transition team on national security areas, such as the Defense and State departments, as well as on the economic response to the COVID-19 pandemic.[805][806] Biden also said that "many of the agencies that are critical to our security have incurred enormous damage" and "have been hollowed out – in personnel, capacity and in morale."[805]

Throughout December and January, Trump continued to insist that he had won the election. He filed numerous lawsuits alleging election fraud, tried to persuade state and federal officials to overturn the results, and urged his supporters to rally on his behalf.[807]

Storming of the U.S. Capitol
Main article: 2021 storming of the United States Capitol
File:Trump remarks on Capitol storming, January 6 2021 0417PM EST.webm
Trump's statement during the storming of the Capitol on January 6, 2021. The video was originally posted on Twitter and shared on other social media before being removed from all platforms for violating various policies.
On January 6, 2021, rioters supporting Trump stormed the U.S. Capitol in an effort to thwart a joint session of Congress during which the Electoral College vote was to be certified, affirming the election of Joe Biden as president.

During an initial rally earlier that morning, Trump encouraged his supporters to march to the U.S. Capitol.[808][809] Subsequently, pro-Trump attendees marched to the Capitol building, joined other protesters, and stormed the building.[810] Congress was in session at the time, conducting the Electoral College vote count and debating the results of the vote. As the protesters arrived, Capitol security evacuated the Senate and House of Representatives chambers and locked down several other buildings on the Capitol campus.[811] Later that evening, after the Capitol was secured, Congress went back into session to discuss the Electoral College vote, finally affirming at 3:41 a.m. that Biden had won the election.[812]

Five people died or were fatally injured during the event: one was a Capitol Police officer, and four were among those who stormed or protested at the Capitol, including one rioter shot by police inside the building.[813] At least 138 police officers (73 Capitol Police officers, 65 Metropolitan Police Department officers) were injured,[814] including at least 15 who were hospitalized, some with severe injuries.[815][816] Three improvised explosive devices were reported to have been found: one on Capitol grounds, and one each at the Republican National Committee and Democratic National Committee offices.[817]

Aftermath
Following the storming of the Capitol, several cabinet-level officials and White House staff resigned, citing the incident and Trump's behavior.[818] On January 6, the night of the storming, a number of White House officials submitted their resignations, including Stephanie Grisham (chief of staff to the first lady), Deputy National Security Advisor Matt Pottinger, White House Social Secretary Anna Cristina Niceta Lloyd, and Deputy White House Press Secretary Sarah Matthews.[819] More officials continued to resign, including Secretary of Transportation Elaine Chao, Secretary of Education Betsy DeVos, chair of the Council of Economic Advisers Tyler Goodspeed, and former White House chief of staff and special envoy to Northern Ireland Mick Mulvaney.[820][821][822][823]

On January 7, the day after the Electoral College results were certified by Congress, Trump tweeted a video in which he stated, "A new administration will be inaugurated on January 20th. My focus now turns to ensuring a smooth, orderly and seamless transition of power."[824] The State Department subsequently told diplomats to affirm Biden's victory.[825]

On January 12, the House voted in favor of requesting that the vice president remove Trump from office per the Twenty-fifth Amendment; hours earlier, Pence had indicated that he opposed such a measure.[826] The next day, the House voted 232–197 to impeach Trump on a charge of "incitement of insurrection". Ten Republican representatives joined all Democratic representatives in voting to impeach Trump. Trump is the first and only president to be impeached twice.[827] On February 13, the Senate voted 57–43 to convict Trump on a charge of inciting insurrection, ten votes short of the required two-thirds majority, and he was acquitted. Seven Republican senators joined all Democratic and independent senators in voting to convict Trump.[828][829]

Farewell address
File:Farewell Address of President Donald J. Trump-6h5 d3DUdR4.webm
President Trump's farewell address on January 19, 2021.
Trump gave a farewell address the day prior to the inauguration of Joe Biden. In it he stressed his economic and foreign policy record, and said the country can never tolerate "political violence".[830] Breaking from tradition, Trump did not attend Biden's inauguration, becoming the first departing president in 152 years to refuse to attend his elected successor's inauguration.[831][832] He did honor another tradition by leaving Biden a letter on the Resolute desk in the White House.[833][834]

Historical evaluations and public opinion
Main article: Opinion polling on the Donald Trump administration
See also: United States presidential approval rating
In the sixth Siena College Research Institute's presidential rankings, conducted after Trump had been in office for one year, Trump was ranked as the third-worst president.[835]

C-SPAN's 2021 President Historians Survey ranked Trump as the fourth-worst president overall, with Trump being rated the worst in the leadership characteristics of Moral Authority and Administrative Skills. Trump's best rated leadership characteristic was Public Persuasion, where he ranked 32nd out of the 44 individuals who were previously president.[836]

Popular polling

Gallup approval polling, covering February 2017 – December 2020
  Disapprove
  Unsure
  Approve
At the time of the 2016 election, polls by Gallup found Trump had a favorable rating around 35% and an unfavorable rating around 60%, while Democratic nominee Hillary Clinton held a favorable rating of 40% and an unfavorable rating of 57%.[837] 2016 was the first election cycle in modern presidential polling in which both major-party candidates were viewed so unfavorably.[838][839][840][841]

By January 20, 2017, Inauguration Day, Trump's approval rating average was forty-two percent, the lowest rating average for an incoming president in the history of modern polling;[842] during his term it has been an "incredibly stable (and also historically low)" thirty-six to forty percent.[843][844]

Democratic backsliding
Main article: Democratic backsliding
Since the beginning of the presidency of Donald Trump, ratings of how well U.S. democracy is functioning sharply plunged.[845]

According to the 2018 Varieties of Democracy Annual Democracy Report, there has been "a significant democratic backsliding in the United States [since the Inauguration of Donald Trump] ... attributable to weakening constraints on the executive."[845] Independent assessments by Freedom House and Bright Line Watch found a similar significant decline in overall democratic functioning.[846][847]

See also
flag	United States portal
icon	Politics portal
	Conservatism portal
Bibliography of Donald Trump
Efforts to impeach Donald Trump
List of United States presidential vetoes § Donald Trump
Make America Great Again
Political positions of Donald Trump
List of federal political scandals in the United States (21st century)
Timeline of investigations into Trump and Russia
Timeline of Russian interference in the 2016 United States elections
Timeline of Russian interference in the 2016 United States elections (July 2016–election day)
Timeline of the COVID-19 pandemic in March 2020
From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
Jump to navigationJump to search
For the responses to the pandemic during March, see Responses to the COVID-19 pandemic in March 2020.
See also: COVID-19 pandemic
Main article: Timeline of the COVID-19 pandemic
Part of a series on the
COVID-19 pandemic
Scientifically accurate atomic model of the external structure of SARS-CoV-2. Each "ball" is an atom.
COVID-19 (disease)SARS-CoV-2 (virus)
CasesDeaths
Timeline
2019
2020

January responsesFebruary responsesMarch responsesApril responsesMay responsesJune responsesJuly responsesAugust responsesSeptember responsesOctober responsesNovember responsesDecember responses
2021

January responsesFebruary responsesMarch responsesApril responsesMay responsesJune responsesJuly responsesAugust responsesSeptember responsesOctober responsesNovember responses
Locations
International response
Medical response
Variants
Economic impact and recession
Impacts
SARS-CoV-2 (Wikimedia colors).svg COVID-19 portal
vte
File:COVID-19 Confirmed Cases Animated Map.webm
Animated map showing confirmed COVID-19 cases spreading from 22 January (high resolution)

Date when first case in each first-level administration was reported
This article documents the chronology and epidemiology of SARS-CoV-2 in March 2020, the virus which causes the coronavirus disease 2019 (COVID-19) and is responsible for the COVID-19 pandemic. The first human cases of COVID-19 were identified in Wuhan, Hubei, China, in December 2019.


Contents
1	Case statistics
2	Pandemic chronology
2.1	1 March
2.2	2 March
2.3	3 March
2.4	4 March
2.5	5 March
2.6	6 March
2.7	7 March
2.8	8 March
2.9	9 March
2.10	10 March
2.11	11 March
2.12	12 March
2.13	13 March
2.14	14 March
2.15	15 March
2.16	16 March
2.17	17 March
2.18	18 March
2.19	19 March
2.20	20 March
2.21	21 March
2.22	22 March
2.23	23 March
2.24	24 March
2.25	25 March
2.26	26 March
2.27	27 March
2.28	28 March
2.29	29 March
2.30	30 March
2.31	31 March
3	Summary
3.1	Timeline
4	See also
5	References
Case statistics
Further information: Timeline of the COVID-19 pandemic § Case statistics
Pandemic chronology
1 March
WHO Situation Report 41:[1]


Map of the WHO's regional offices and their respective operating regions.
  Africa; HQ: Brazzaville, Republic of the Congo
  Western Pacific; HQ: Manila, Philippines
  Eastern Mediterranean; HQ: Cairo, Egypt
  South East Asia; HQ: New Delhi, India
  Europe; HQ: Copenhagen, Denmark
  Americas; HQ: Washington, D.C., US
Armenia confirmed its first case, a 29-year-old man returning from Iran.[2]
Australia confirmed the first death in the country, a 78-year-old man from the cruise ship Diamond Princess.[3] One additional case was confirmed, bringing the total number to 26.[4]
Austria confirmed four more cases, bringing the total number to 14.[5]
Bahrain confirmed six more cases, bringing the total number to 47.[6]
Canada confirmed four new cases in Ontario, bringing the total number to 24. All four had travel history to Iran or Egypt.[7] [8]
China confirmed 573 new cases; 570 of which were in Hubei province, bringing the total number to 79,824. Deaths increased by 35 to a total of 2,870.[9]
Czech Republic confirmed the first three cases in the country, individuals that had travelled from Northern Italy.[10]
Dominican Republic confirmed its first case, a 62-year-old Italian tourist.[11]
Ecuador confirmed five more cases, bringing the total to six.[12][13]
Egypt confirmed one more case, bringing the total number to 2.[14]
Finland confirmed two more cases related to woman diagnosed on 27 February, bringing the total number to 6.[15]
France confirmed 30 more cases, bringing the total number to 130.[16]
Germany confirmed 63 more cases, bringing the total number to 129.[17]
Hong Kong confirmed three more cases, bringing the total number to 98.[18]
Iran confirmed 385 new cases with 11 more deaths, bringing the total number to 978 and 54 respectively.[19] A total of 23 members of Parliament of Iran, about 8%, had tested positive for the virus.[20]
Iraq confirmed six more cases, bringing the total number to 19.[21]
Israel confirmed three more cases, bringing the total number to 10.[22]
Italy confirmed 566 new cases and five deaths, bringing the total number to 1,694 and 34 respectively.[23]
Japan confirmed another death from the coronavirus, bringing the total to 6.[24]
Malaysia confirmed four more cases, bringing the total number to 29.[25]
Mexico confirmed one additional case, bringing the total number to 5.[26]
The Netherlands confirmed three more cases, bringing the total number to 10.[27]
Saint Barthélemy confirmed its first case.[28]
Saint Martin confirmed its first case.[28]
San Marino confirmed seven more cases, bringing the total number to 8. The first death was also confirmed.[29]
Scotland confirmed its first case.[30]
Singapore confirmed four more cases, bringing the total number to 106.[31]
South Korea confirmed 376 more cases, bringing the total number to 3,526. Another 210 cases were later confirmed with the 18th death reported, bringing the total number to 3,736.[32]
Spain confirmed 26 more cases, bringing the total number to 84.[33] Spain also confirmed its first death due to the outbreak, in Valencia.[34]
Sweden confirmed one more case, bringing the total number to 14.[35]
Thailand confirmed its first death from the coronavirus, a 35-year-old retail worker who also had dengue fever.[36]
The United Kingdom confirmed an additional thirteen cases of the virus, including one person from Essex who had not travelled to any country previously affected by the virus, bringing the total in the country to 35.[37]
The United States reported the second confirmed death in Washington state. The first cases in Rhode Island, Florida, and New York were confirmed. The authorities confirmed 21 more cases in total, bringing the number to 89.[38][39]
2 March
WHO Situation Report 42:[40]

Andorra confirmed its first case.[41]
Australia confirmed four new cases, bringing the total number to 30, including its first human-to-human transmission.[42]
Bahrain confirmed two more cases, bringing the total number to 49.[43]
Canada confirmed three more cases, all in Ontario, bringing the total number to 27.[44] [45]
China confirmed 202 new cases, bringing the total number to 80,026. Deaths increased by 42 to a total of 2,912.[46]
France confirmed 61 more cases, bringing the total number to 191. The third death was also reported.[47]
Germany confirmed 21 more cases, bringing the total number to 150.[48]
India reported its first cases since the initial outbreak. One case was detected in New Delhi, while the other was from Telangana. Another confirmed case was later detected in Jaipur, bringing the total number to 6.[49][50]
Indonesian president Joko Widodo announced the first two confirmed cases in the country.[51] The two people contracted the virus from a Japanese in Depok, who later tested positive in Malaysia. The mother and daughter are now hospitalised in North Jakarta.[52][53]
Iran's total cases rose to 1,501 with 66 deaths.[54]
Iraq confirmed two more cases, bringing the total number to 21.[55]
Ireland Tourism authorities announced that one of the largest annual events, the 2020 Dublin St Patricks Day Parade, was cancelled.[56]
Israel confirmed two more cases, bringing the total number to 12.[57]
Italy confirmed 342 new cases and 18 deaths, bringing the total number to 2,064 and 52, respectively.[58]
Jordan confirmed its first case.[59]
Kuwait confirmed ten more cases, bringing the total number to 56.[60]
Latvia confirmed its first case, a woman who had flown from Milan to Riga through Munich.[61]
Morocco confirmed its first case.[62]
The Netherlands confirmed eight new cases, bringing the total number to 18.[63]
Portugal confirmed its first two cases, one of whom had returned from Italy, the other from Spain.[64]
Qatar confirmed four new cases, taking their total to 7.[65]
Russia confirmed one additional case, bringing the total to 6 cases.[66]
Saudi Arabia confirmed their first case in a citizen who had travelled to Iran and returned to Saudi Arabia via Bahrain.[67]
Senegal confirmed its first case, where the person had recently travelled from France.[68]
Singapore confirmed two more cases, bringing the total number to 108.[69]
South Korea confirmed 476 more cases, bringing the total number to 4,212. Four more deaths were confirmed, bringing the total to 22.[70] Another 123 cases were later confirmed, bringing the total number to 4,335.[71]
Spain confirmed 36 more cases, bringing the total number to 120.[72]
Sweden confirmed one more case, bringing the total number to 15.[73]
Taiwan confirmed one additional case, bringing the total to 41 cases.[74]
Thailand confirmed one more case, bringing the total number to 43.[75]
Tunisia confirmed its first case.[76]
The United Kingdom confirmed three additional cases, taking the total to 39. An original fourth diagnosis of positive of a person was confirmed later as negative.[77]
The United States confirmed 13 more cases, bringing the total number to 102. Five more deaths were also confirmed, bringing the total number to 6.[78]
3 March
WHO Situation Report 43:[79]

Argentina confirmed its first case, a person who had recently returned from Italy.[80]
Australia confirmed eight more cases, bringing the total number to 38.[81]
Canada confirmed six more cases, two in Ontario and four in British Columbia, bringing the total to 33.[82][83][84]
Chile confirmed its first case.[85]
China confirmed 125 new cases, the lowest number of new cases since January, bringing the total number to 80,151. 31 new deaths were also confirmed, bringing the total to 2,943.[86]
Ecuador confirmed three more cases, bringing the total number to 10.
France confirmed 21 more cases, bringing the total number to 212. The fourth death was also reported.[87]
Germany confirmed 38 more cases, bringing the total number to 188.[88]
Gibraltar confirmed its first case, a person who had travelled back from Northern Italy via Malaga airport.[89]
Iran confirmed that 23 MPs were diagnosed with the virus.[90] The country confirmed 835 more cases with 11 more deaths, bringing the total number to 2,336 and 77, respectively.[91]
Ireland confirmed one more case, bringing the total number to 2.[92]
Italy confirmed 466 new cases and 28 deaths, bringing the total number to 2,502 and 80, respectively.[93]
Liechtenstein confirmed its first case.[94]
Malaysia confirmed seven more cases, bringing the total number to 36.[95]
San Marino confirmed two new cases, bringing the total number to 10.[96]
Singapore confirmed two more cases, bringing the total number to 110.[97]
South Korea confirmed 600 more cases, bringing the total number to 4,812. 12 more deaths were also confirmed, bringing the total to 34.[98] 377 more cases were confirmed in the afternoon, along with two more deaths, taking total to 5,186 cases and 36 deaths.[99]
Spain confirmed the first death in the country, a person who died on 13 February, making him the earliest recorded death in Europe.[100] The country reported 31 more cases, bringing the total number to 151.[101]
Sweden confirmed 15 more cases, bringing the total number to 30.[102]
Ukraine confirmed its first case, a person having travelled from Italy via Romania.[103]
The United Kingdom confirmed 12 new cases, bringing the total number to 51.[104]
The United States confirmed three more deaths, bringing the total to 9.[105] The first case of coronavirus in North Carolina was reported, coming from the nursing home in Washington state responsible for the first deaths from the virus.[106] Another case in Florida was presumptively confirmed positive, bringing the total number of Floridian cases to three.[107] The number of cases stood at 126, increasing by 24 from 102.
4 March
WHO Situation Report 44:[108]

Brazil confirmed two more cases, bringing the total number to 4.[109]
Canada confirmed one more case in British Columbia, bringing the total number to 34.[110]
China confirmed 119 new cases, bringing the total number to 80,270. 38 new deaths were also confirmed, bringing the total to 2,981.[111]
Faroe Islands confirmed its first case.[112]
France confirmed 73 more cases, bringing the total number to 285.[113]
Germany confirmed 52 more cases, bringing the total number to 240.[114]
Hong Kong confirmed a case of human-to-animal transmission involving a pet dog.[115]
Hungary confirmed its first cases, two Iranian students who were asymptomatic.[116]
India confirmed 23 more cases, including 15 Italian tourists, bringing the total number to 29.[117][118]
Iraq confirmed its first death from the coronavirus.[119]
Italy confirmed 28 more deaths, bringing the total to 107. This made it the highest jump in a single day. The country confirmed 587 new cases, bringing the total number to 3,089.[120]
Cases in Japan had topped the 1,000 mark (including 706 cases on the cruise ship Diamond Princess which the World Health Organization classifies as being located "on an international conveyance" and not in Japan) with the first confirmed case in Yamaguchi prefecture.[121]
Malaysia confirmed 14 more cases, bringing the total number to 50.[122]
New Zealand confirmed its second case of the coronavirus. The infected individual had returned the previous week from Italy with her family on an Air New Zealand flight from Singapore to Auckland.[123]
Poland confirmed its first case.[124]
San Marino confirmed five more cases, bringing the total number to 15.[125]
Singapore confirmed two more cases, bringing the total number to 112.[126]
Slovenia confirmed its first case, a person who had travelled through Italy.[127]
South Korea confirmed 516 more cases, bringing the total number to 5,328.[128] Another 293 cases were confirmed in the afternoon, bringing the total number to 5,621.[129]
Sweden confirmed 22 more cases, bringing the total number to 52.[130]
The United Kingdom confirmed 34 new cases, then Northern Ireland confirmed an additional two, bringing the total number to 87.[131]
The United States confirmed 11 total deaths, with the first death outside of Washington state in California. California's total of infections has jumped to 51.[132] The country confirmed 33 new cases, bringing the total number to 159.
5 March
WHO Situation Report 45:[133]

Algeria confirmed nine additional cases, bringing the total number to 17.[134]
Belgium confirmed 27 new cases, bringing the total number to 50.[135]
Brazil confirmed three new cases, bringing the total to 8.[136]
Bosnia and Herzegovina confirmed the first two cases in the country.[137]
Canada confirmed 11 new cases three in Ontario, and the first one in Alberta, bringing the total to 45.[138] [139]
The Canadian province of Quebec has reported two new case.[140]
China confirmed 139 new cases, bringing the total number to 80,409. 31 new deaths were also confirmed (all in Hubei), bringing the total to 3,012.[141]
Ecuador confirmed three more cases, bringing the total number to 13.[142]
Egypt confirmed the first case in an Egyptian national, who had recently travelled from Serbia via France.[143]
France registered 92 new confirmed cases, taking the total number of cases to 377. It also saw deaths rise from 4 to 6.[144] This then rose to 423 total cases and 7 deaths.[145] Jean-Luc Reitzer, was the first Assembly member to be diagnosed with the virus.[146]
Georgia confirmed five new cases, all of whom had recently returned from Italy.[147]
Germany confirmed 87 new cases, taking it to a total of 349.[148]
Greece confirmed its tenth case.[149] It later confirmed an additional 21 cases, taking it to a total of 31.[150]
India confirmed one more case, bringing the total number to 30.[151]
Iran saw its largest daily increase in cases, with 591 new cases, taking it to a total of 3,513 confirmed cases. It also saw 15 new deaths, increasing its total to 107.[152] Hossein Sheikholeslam, a diplomat and a former member of parliament and Iran's former ambassador to Syria died from the virus.[153]
Ireland confirmed six new cases, bringing the total number to 13.[154]
Israel confirmed two new cases, bringing the total to 17. And of these was a bus driver from East Jerusalem who drove a group of Greek tourists in Israel and the West Bank, the other having recently returned from Italy.[155]
Italy reported 769 new cases and 41 new deaths, bringing the total number to 3,850 and 148 respectively.[156]
Malaysia confirmed five more cases, bringing the total number to 55.[157]
Martinique confirmed its first two cases.[158]
The Netherlands confirmed 44 new cases, bringing the total number to 82.[159]
New Zealand confirmed its third case, an Auckland man who had contracted the virus after family members had returned from a trip to Iran. Relatives of the man at two Auckland schools, Auckland Grammar School and Ormiston Junior College, had also been placed into isolation.[160][161]
Norway confirmed six new cases, bringing the total number to 66.[162]
Pakistan confirmed a sixth case, a 69-year-old man in Karachi.[163]
Palestine reported its first cases in the West Bank city of Bethlehem. Seven staff at a hotel were reported to be infected by visiting tourists from Greece.[164] These tourists were the same ones who the Israeli bus driver was infected from.[155]
Russia confirmed one more case, bringing the total number to 7.[165]
Saudi Arabia confirmed three additional cases, bringing the total number to 5.[166]
Scotland confirmed three more cases, bringing the total to 6.[167]
Singapore confirmed five more cases, bringing the total number to 117.[168]
South Africa records its first case in the KwaZulu-Natal province.[169]
South Korea confirmed 145 more cases, bringing the total number to 5,766. The death toll had reached 35.[170] Another 322 more cases and 6 more deaths are confirmed later in the afternoon, bringing the total to 6088 cases and 41 deaths respectively.[171]
Spain had confirmed that the total number of cases had risen to 234.[172]
Sweden confirmed 42 more cases, bringing the total number to 94.[173]
Switzerland reported its first death from the virus.[174]
Thailand confirmed four new cases, bringing the total to 47.[175]
The United Kingdom's total increased to 90. The UK also later confirmed the total number of cases had increased further up to 116, as well as recording the first death in the country, an older person with underlying health conditions.[176]
One additional death in Washington state brought the U.S. total to 12.[177] The United States saw a significant increase in cases, with 31 new cases in Washington state.[178] In New York state, cases doubled to 22.[179] Colorado's first two cases were confirmed.[180] In total, the US confirmed 69 more cases, bringing the total number to 228. Three more deaths were reported, bringing the total number to 14.[citation needed]
6 March
WHO Situation Report 46:[181]

Austria announced 13 new cases, taking its total to 55.[citation needed]
Belgium confirmed 59 new cases, bringing the total to 109.[182]
Bhutan announced its first case, an American tourist who had recently also travelled to India after leaving the United States on 18 February.[183][184]
Brazil confirmed five new cases, bringing the total number to 13.[185]
Cameroon confirmed its first case, a French citizen.[186]
Canada confirmed four new cases in Ontario, bringing the total to 51 with 26 from Ontario. A husband and wife returned from the cruise ship Grand Princess in California and two men returned from Iran and Las Vegas and then two more cases were confirmed later in Ontario bringing the Total to 53.[187][188] [189]
China confirmed 143 new cases, bringing the total number to 80,552. 30 new deaths were also confirmed, bringing the total to 3,042. Hubei had no cases as a result.[190][191] In addition, the country detected 4 new cases in Beijing, all visiting Italian nationals.[192]
Colombia confirmed its first case, a woman who recently travelled from Italy.[193]
Costa Rica has confirmed its first case involving an American from New York.[194]
Egypt confirmed 12 additional cases, bringing the total number to 15.[195]
France confirmed 190 new cases and two additional deaths, bringing the total to 613 cases and 9 deaths.[citation needed]
Germany confirmed 185 new cases, taking it to a total of 534.[196] 105 more cases were later confirmed, bringing the total number to 639.[197]
The cruise ship Grand Princess announced it had 21 people on board testing positive.[citation needed]
Greece confirmed 14 additional cases.[citation needed]
Iceland confirmed six additional cases, bringing the total to 43.[198]
India confirmed one more case, bringing the total number to 31.[199]
Indonesia confirmed two more cases, bringing the total number to four.
Iran confirmed 1,234 new cases and 16 new deaths, taking its totals up to 4,747 cases and 124 deaths. They also reported 913 people had recovered.[200]
Italy announced 778 new cases and 49 new deaths.[201]
Malaysia confirmed 28 new cases,[202] the largest daily increase in the country's number of confirmed cases. This took the country's total to 83.[203]
The Netherlands reported its first death, and 44 new cases, bringing it to a total of 128 cases.[204]
New Zealand confirmed its fourth case: a man who is the partner of the second case confirmed on 3 March.[205][206]
North Macedonia confirmed two additional cases, taking its total to 3.[207]
Peru confirmed its first case.[208]
Poland confirmed four additional cases (two people that travelled from Italy, one person who travelled from United Kingdom and one person who travelled from Germany with the first case confirmed day earlier), taking their total to 5.[209]
Portugal confirmed four additional cases (three in Porto and one in Lisbon), bringing the total to 13. All three cases in Porto had a connection with Italy.[210][211]
Qatar confirmed three new cases, taking it to a total of 11.[212]
Russia confirmed six more cases, bringing the total number to 13.[213]
Serbia confirmed its first case.[214]
Singapore confirmed 13 new cases, bringing the total number to 130. This was the largest increase of cases in a single day so far.[215]
Slovakia confirmed its first case.[216]
South Korea confirmed 196 more cases, bringing the total number to 6,284. One more death was confirmed, bringing the total to 42.[217] Another 309 cases and another death were later confirmed, bringing the total to 6,593 and 43 respectively.[218]
Spain confirmed 104 additional cases, bringing the total number to 360.
Sweden confirmed 43 additional cases, bringing the total number to 137.[219]
Switzerland announced 123 additional cases, raising it to a total of 210 cases and one fatality.
Thailand confirmed one new case, bringing the total to 48.[220]
Togo confirmed its first case.[221]
In the United Kingdom, the total number of cases were confirmed as 163, a rise of 47 and the highest day-on-day increase.[222]
In the United States, the first three cases were confirmed in the state of Maryland.[223] Two deaths in Florida were confirmed.[224] Officials in the US state of Hawaii have confirmed their first case, a former passenger of the cruise ship Grand Princess.[225] In total, the US confirmed 104 more cases, bringing the total number to 332. One more death in Washington State plus two in Florida brought the total number of U.S. deaths to 17.[226][227] In California, a Santa Clara County resident died at home, whose death was attributed later in April to COVID-19.[228] WHO has different data: 19 new cases, 148 in total. 1 new death, 10 in total.[181]
The Vatican City confirmed its first case.[229]
Vietnam confirmed one more case, bringing the total number to 17. It was the first case in three weeks.[230]
7 March
WHO Situation Report 47:[231]

Afghanistan confirmed three additional cases, taking the total to 4.[232]
Argentina confirmed its first death, also the first in South America, a 64-year-old man who had travelled to Paris.[233]
Bahrain confirmed 19 new cases, taking the total number to 79.[234]
Belgium confirmed 60 additional cases, bringing the total number to 169.[235]
Brazil confirmed six new cases of COVID-19, raising the total number to 19.[236]
Canada confirmed six additional cases, taking the total to 57.[237]
China confirmed 99 new cases, bringing the total number to 80,651. Deaths increased by 28 to a total of 3,070.[238]
Egypt confirmed 33 new cases on a Nile cruise ship.[239]
France's total rose to 949 cases and 16 deaths.[240]
Germany confirmed 45 new cases, taking it to a total of 684.[241] Another 116 cases were later confirmed, bringing the total number to 800.[242]
Iran confirmed 1,076 new cases and 21 additional deaths, taking it to a total of 5,823 infected and 145 dead. They also confirmed 16,000 cases were hospitalised as suspect cases and 1,669 cases had recovered.[243] Another MP, Fatemeh Rahbar, died. She had recently been elected to the parliament.[244]
Iraq confirmed 8 new cases taking the total to 46.[245]
Italy confirmed 1,247 new cases and 36 new deaths.[citation needed]
Maldives confirmed its first cases, two overseas hotel employees.[246]
Malaysia confirmed 10 more new cases, bringing the total number to 93.[247]
Malta reported its first three cases, an Italian family who were residents in Malta. They had gone on holiday to northern Italy and had been in self-quarantine before being tested for the coronavirus. They were now in isolation at Mater Dei Hospital.[248]
Moldova confirmed its first case, a person taken to hospital after arriving on a flight from Italy.[249]
New Zealand confirmed its fifth case of the coronavirus: a woman who was the partner of the third COVID-19 case confirmed in New Zealand.[250]
Palestine confirms 22 cases.[251]
Paraguay confirmed its first case.[citation needed]
Peru confirmed five more cases, bringing the total to six.[252]
Poland confirmed an additional case, bringing the total to 6.[253]
Singapore confirmed eight more cases, bringing the total number to 138.[254]
South Korea confirmed 174 more cases and one more death, bringing the total number to 6,767 and 44 respectively.[255] Another 274 new cases and 4 new deaths were later confirmed, taking the total to 7,041 and 48 respectively.[256]
Spain confirmed 70 new cases and 2 deaths. The total number of cases was now 516 cases.[257]
Thailand confirmed two new cases, bringing the total to 50.[258]
The United Arab Emirates confirmed 15 additional cases, taking its total to 45.[259]
In the United Kingdom, 42 additional cases and one additional death were confirmed, taking the total to 206 cases and 2 deaths.[260] 3 additional cases were confirmed in Northern Ireland later in the day,[261] taking the total to 209 cases.
In the United States, the number of deaths rose to 19 with 16 in Washington,[262] 1 in California, and 2 in Florida.[263] The total for the country increased to 444 confirmed cases.[264] WHO has different data: 65 new confirmed cases, totalling 213. And 1 new death, 11 in total.[231]
Vietnam confirmed three new cases, bringing the total number to 20.[265]
8 March
WHO Situation Report 48:[266]

Albania confirmed the first two cases in the country.[267]
Austria confirmed 25 additional cases, taking its total to 104.[268]
Bahrain confirmed 17 new cases, taking the total to 94.[269]
Bangladesh confirmed its first three cases, two people who had come from Italy separately, and a contact of one of the cases.[270]
Belgium confirmed 31 additional cases, bringing the total number to 200.[271]
Brazil confirmed six new cases of COVID-19, raising the total number in the country to 25.[272]
Bulgaria confirmed its first four cases.[273][274]
Canada confirmed 12 new cases, bringing the total number to 69.[275]
Ontario reported four new cases, bringing the total number in the province to 32.[276] [277]
Quebec has reported one new case.[278]
China confirmed 44 new cases, bringing the total number to 80,695. Deaths increased by 27 to a total of 3,097.[279]
Egypt confirmed its first death (and the first death in Africa) – a German national who was hospitalised on 1 March and then suffered respiratory failure caused by acute pneumonia on 7 March.[280]
France confirmed that the number of cases had risen to 1,126 and 19 deaths.[281] Elisabeth Toutut-Picard became the second Assembly member to be diagnosed with the virus.[282]
Germany's cases rose to over 1,000 with 1,018 cases confirmed.[283]
Hong Kong confirmed four new cases, taking the total to 114, and a third death.[284]
India confirmed five additional cases, all in Kerala. This took the country's total up to 39.[285]
Indonesia confirmed two additional cases, taking them to 6 cases. One of the new cases was a male crew member from the Diamond Princess.[286]
Iran confirmed 49 additional deaths, the highest daily toll in the country, taking it to a total of 194 deaths.[287] Total cases had risen to 6,566, an increase of 743.
Israel confirmed 11 additional cases, taking its total to 29.[288]
Italy confirmed an additional 1,492 cases and 133 deaths, taking it to a total of 7,375 cases and 366 deaths.[289]
Kuwait confirmed an additional case, taking its total to 62.[290]
Latvia confirmed an additional case.[291]
Lebanon confirmed four more cases, bringing the total number to 32.[292]
Malaysia confirmed six new cases, bringing the total to 99.[293]
Poland confirmed two additional cases, taking the total to 8. In the evening, three more cases were confirmed, bringing the total number to 11.[294]
Portugal confirmed four additional cases.[295]
Qatar confirmed three additional cases, taking their total to 15.[296]
Saudi Arabia confirmed four additional cases, bringing the total number to 11.[297]
Singapore confirmed 12 new cases, bringing the total number to 150.[298]
Spain announced the new total was 616 cases, along with 17 deaths, an increase of seven.[299]
South Africa confirmed its third case, the wife of the first diagnosed case.[300]
South Korea confirmed an additional 93 new cases, taking its total to 7,134[301] and two additional deaths, taking the total to 50.[302] Another 179 cases were later confirmed, bringing the total to 7,313.[303]
Switzerland confirmed there are now 332 confirmed cases, with all those people placed in isolation. There had been two deaths.[304]
The United Kingdom announced an increase of 64 new cases, taking it to a total of 273 cases.[305] The UK also confirmed the third death in the country.[306] Five new cases were additionally confirmed in Northern Ireland.[307]
The United States confirmed 120 more cases, bringing the total number to 564. Two more deaths were confirmed, bringing the total number to 21.[308] According to WHO, the number of confirmed cases was 213, total deaths 11. No new cases, no new deaths were recorded.[266]
Vietnam confirmed ten more cases, bringing the total number to 30.[309][310]
9 March
WHO Situation Report 49:[311]

Australia's number of confirmed cases rose to 80, with six additional cases.[312]
Bahrain confirmed an additional 24 cases, taking the total to 118.[313]
Belgium confirmed 39 additional cases, bringing the total number to 239.[314]
Brazil confirmed five new cases in the state of Rio de Janeiro, raising the total number to 30.[315]
Brunei's health ministry confirmed a first case of a local man who returned from Kuala Lumpur on 3 March. Symptoms began on 7 March and preliminary tests indicate the person is positive.[316]
Canada recorded its first COVID-19-related death.[317] The country also confirmed ten more cases, bringing the total number to 79.[318]
Ontario has reported three new cases.[319] [320]
The Canadian province of Quebec has reported one new case.[321]
China confirmed 40 new cases, bringing the total number to 80,735. Deaths increased by 22 to a total of 3,119. There were no locally transmitted cases outside Hubei.[322]
Colombia confirmed two additional cases.[323]
Cyprus confirmed its first two cases.[324]
Finland confirmed seven new cases, bringing the total number to 30.[325]
France saw Guillaume Vuilletet and Sylvie Tolmont confirmed as infected deputies,[326] before Michèle Victory became the fifth deputy of the Assembly to be diagnosed with the virus.[327] The number of cases increased to 1,412.[328] It was also confirmed that the culture minister, Franck Riester, had tested positive.[329]
Germany reported its first deaths with two fatalities. Cases increased to 1,176.[330]
Guernsey confirmed its first case.[331]
Hungary confirmed two new cases.[332]
India confirmed five additional cases, taking the total to 44.[333]
Indonesia confirmed 13 additional cases, bringing the total number to 19.[334]
Iran announced an update to the total cases to 7,161, with a revised number of deaths to 237. New infections are 595 new cases and 43 additional deaths. Those recovered has reached 2,394.[335]
Ireland confirmed three additional cases, taking the country's total to 24.[citation needed]
Italy saw confirmed cases rise to 9,172 and deaths to 463.[336]
Kuwait announced three additional cases, taking it to a total of 65.[337]
Lebanon reported nine new cases, taking the total to 41.[citation needed]
Malaysia confirmed 18 new cases, taking it to 117.[338]
Malta confirmed its fourth case.[339]
The Netherlands announced 56 additional cases.[340]
Nigeria confirmed its second case, a Nigerian who had contact with the Italian first case.[341]
Norway declared 11 additional cases. By the end of the day 227 cases had been confirmed.[342]
Oman reported two additional cases, both of whom had travelled to Iran. This took the country's total to 18, 17 of whom had travelled to Iran and one to Italy.[343]
Palestine confirmed five new cases in the West Bank.[344]
Panama announced its first COVID-19 case, a 40-year-old Panamanian woman from Spain.[345][346]
The Philippines confirmed 10 additional cases, doubling the current country count to 20.[347] Another four cases were later confirmed, bringing the total number to 24.[348]
Pakistan saw nine new cases, bringing the total number to 16.[349]
Poland confirmed five more cases, bringing the total number to 16.[citation needed]
Saudi Arabia confirmed four additional cases, increasing the total to 15.[350]
Scotland confirmed five additional case, bringing the total to 11.[citation needed]
Singapore confirmed 10 more cases, bringing the total number to 160.[351]
South Africa confirmed another four cases, bringing the total number to 7.[352]
South Korea confirmed 69 new cases and one more death, bringing the total to 7,382 and 51 respectively.[353] Another 96 cases were later confirmed, taking it to a total of 7,478.[354]
Spain's numbers increased to 1,231 cases with 30 deaths, with 32 people having recovered.[355]
Sweden confirmed 45 additional cases, taking its total to 203.[356] This later rose to 252 cases including the first confirmed local transmission case.
Switzerland confirmed 42 new cases, rising to a total of 374.[357]
The United Arab Emirates reported 14 additional cases, taking its total to 59. Four were Emiratis and the remainder from various other nationalities.[358]
The United Kingdom's confirmed cases increased by two, with the confirmation of cases in Wales.[359] Figures released in the afternoon showed the UK had risen to 317 cases. A fourth death was reported,[360] and then a fifth.
The United States confirmed 153 additional cases, bringing the total number to 717. Five more deaths were reported, bringing the total number to 26.[361] According to WHO, the number of confirmed cases is 213, total deaths 11. No new cases, no new deaths were recorded.[311]
Vietnam confirmed an additional case, taking its total to 31.[362]
10 March
WHO Situation Report 50:[363]

Australia reported 14 new cases, taking the country to a total of 107.[citation needed]
Austria confirmed 25 additional cases, taking the total to 182.[364]
Bahrain confirmed one additional case, taking the total to 119.[365]
Belgium confirmed 28 new cases, bringing the total number to 267.[366]
Bolivia confirmed its first cases, two women who had been in Italy, arriving the country without showing any symptoms.[367]
Brazil confirmed four new cases, including the first case in Rio Grande do Sul, raising the total number to 34.[368]
Brunei confirmed five new cases, bringing the total to 6.[369][370][371]
Bulgaria confirmed two additional cases, bringing the total to 6.[372]
Burkina Faso confirmed its first cases with two infections, a couple who had returned from France in February.[373]
The Canadian province of Ontario has reported two new cases.[374] [375] [376]
The Canadian province of Quebec is reporting 2 new cases.[377]
China saw only 19 new infections, 17 in Wuhan and 2 imported from overseas.[378] 17 deaths were reported in Hubei. These brought the total number of cases and deaths to 80,754 and 3,136 respectively.[379][380]
Democratic Republic of Congo reported its first case, a foreigner who flew into Kinshasa from Belgium who tested positive on arrival and was isolated.[381] It was later confirmed by the Ministry of Health that the information they had originally released was incorrect and that the first case was rather a Congolese citizen returning From France, who had contacted the Health Services two days after his arrival in Congo and had been quarantined in a local neighbourhood.[382]
Denmark confirmed 174 additional cases, taking it to 264 cases (including two in the Faroe Islands).[383]
France saw cases rise to 1,784 people and 33 people dead, with 86 people in a serious condition.[384]
Georgia confirmed eight additional cases, bringing the total to 23.[385]
Germany's number of case rose to 1,565, with the death roll remaining at 2. 341 new cases were reported in the previous 24 hours.[386]
Greece confirmed five new cases, bringing the total number to 89.[387]
Hong Kong confirmed an additional five cases, taking the total to 120 confirmed and 1 assumed case.[388]
India saw 18 additional cases, many in Kerala, taking the total to 62.[389]
Indonesia confirmed eight more cases, bringing the total number to 27.[390][391]
Iran's confirmed cases rose by 881 to 8,042 and deaths rose by 54 to 291.[392][393]
Ireland reported 10 additional cases, bringing the total number to 34.[394]
Israel confirmed seven more cases, taking the total to 58.[395] The number of cases later shot up to 75.[396]
Italy confirmed 977 new cases and 168 more deaths, bringing the total to 10,149 and 631 respectively.[397][398]
Jamaica confirmed its first case, a Jamaican national who travelled to the country from the United Kingdom.[399]
Japan confirmed 59 new cases and three new deaths.[400]
Jersey confirmed its first case, a person who returned from Italy.[401]
Kuwait announced four additional cases, increasing the total number to 69.[402]
Lebanon confirmed its first death from the virus.[403]
Malaysia confirmed 12 additional cases, taking the total to 129.[404]
Moldova confirmed two additional cases, taking the total to 3. The male and female, have both visited Italy in late February.[405]
Mongolia announced its first COVID-19 case.[406]
Morocco confirmed its first death, and two additional cases.[407]
The Netherlands confirmed 61 additional cases and a fourth death.[408]
Northern Cyprus reported its first case, a 65-year-old German woman who was visiting as a tourist.[409]
Norway confirmed 147 new cases, with total cases now standing at 374.[410]
Panama announced its first death and seven new cases, bringing the total number to 8.[411][412]
Pakistan confirmed an additional case, bringing the total to 20.[citation needed]
Palestine recorded an additional case, taking the total to 26.[citation needed]
The Philippines confirmed nine more cases, bringing the total number to 33. This comes after the tally was erroneously reported as 35.[413]
Poland confirmed eight additional cases, taking the total to 22.[414]
Qatar confirmed six additional cases, taking it to 24 confirmed cases.[415]
Romania confirmed eight additional cases, bringing the total number to 25.[416]
Russia confirmed four additional cases, bringing the total to 17.[417]
San Marino confirmed 11 new cases, taking it to a total of 62 cases and two deaths.[citation needed]
Saudi Arabia confirmed ten additional cases, taking the total to 20.[418]
Scotland confirmed 7 new cases, bringing the total to 18.
Serbia confirmed three additional cases, taking the total to 5.[419]
Singapore confirmed six more cases, bringing the total number to 166.[420]
Slovenia confirmed 15 additional cases.[421]
South Korea confirmed 35 new cases and three more deaths, bringing the total to 7,513 and 54 respectively.[422]
Spain confirmed 415 new cases and five new deaths. The total number of cases rose to 1,674.[423]
Sweden reported 78 new cases, taking the country's total to 326.[424]
Thailand confirmed three new cases, bringing the total to 53.[425]
Tunisia announced an additional three cases, taking the total to 5.[426]
Turkey confirmed its first case.[427]
The United Arab Emirates confirmed 15 additional cases, taking the total to 74.[428]
The United Kingdom confirmed 54 additional cases, taking it to 373 cases with the sixth confirmed death.[429][430] Later this increased to 382 cases with the nine additional cases in Wales.[431] Nadine Dorries, Health Minister, was diagnosed with the virus.[432]
The United States confirmed 283 additional cases, bringing the total number to 1,000. Five more deaths were reported, bringing the total number to 31.[433]
Vietnam confirmed three new cases, bringing the total number to 34.[434]
11 March
WHO Situation Report 51:[435]

Albania reported three new cases, taking the country's total to 15. The first death in the country was also reported.[436]
Armenia confirmed three new cases, bringing the total number to 4.[437]
Australia reported 19 new cases, taking the country to a total of 126. American actor Tom Hanks and wife Rita Wilson were diagnosed with the illness during the filming of the Baz Luhrmann's upcoming-biographical film Elvis in Australia.[438]
Austria confirmed 24 additional cases, taking the total to 206.[439]
Bahrain confirmed 77 additional cases, citizens evacuated from Iran on a flight. This brought the country's total to 189.[440]
Belgium reported its first death.[citation needed]
Bosnia and Herzegovina confirmed seven additional cases.[441]
Brazil confirmed 34 additional cases, raising the total number to 69.[442]
Bulgaria reported its first death.[443] It also confirmed one additional case, bringing the total to 7.[citation needed]
The Canadian province of Ontario has reported five new cases.[444] [445]
The Canadian province of Quebec is reporting two new cases.[446]
China confirmed 24 new cases (including 13 in Hubei) and 22 new deaths, bringing the total number of cases and deaths to 80,778 and 3,158 respectively.[447]
Colombia confirmed three additional cases, bringing the total to 6.[448] Later on the same day, three more cases were confirmed, bringing the total to 9.[449]
Cuba confirmed its first three cases.[450]
Denmark confirmed 180 additional cases, raising the total to 442.[451]
Egypt confirmed seven additional cases, six of whom were Egyptian. The country now had 67 cases of which eight have recovered.[452]
France reported 487 new cases and 15 fatalities, for a total of 2,281 cases and 48 deaths.[453]
French Polynesia reported its first case. The person is Maina Sage, a member of the French National Assembly.[454]
Georgia reported five additional cases, increasing the total to 23.
Germany saw its cases rise to 1,908.[455]
Greece confirmed 10 additional cases, taking the country's total to 99, 95 of whom were Greek and 4 were foreign nationals.[456]
Guyana confirmed its first two case, from a 52-year-old woman suffering from underlying health conditions, including diabetes and hypertension.[457] The woman died at the Georgetown Public Hospital.[458]
Honduras confirmed its first two cases, one from Spain and one from Switzerland.[459]
Indonesia confirmed seven more cases, bringing the total number to 34.[460] Its first death was also reported,[461][462] confirmed by the United Kingdom's Foreign and Commonwealth Office as a 53-year-old female British national.
Iran announced that there are now 9,000 infected, with 354 deaths. New infections were 958 with 63 additional deaths. Those recovered total 2,959.[463] Iran's first vice-president, Eshaq Jahangiri was reported infected.[464]
Ireland confirmed nine additional cases, bringing the total number to 43. The first death was also confirmed.[465]
Israel confirmed 97 cases.[466]
Italy announced 2,313 new cases and 196 new deaths. Total cases stood at 12,462, with deaths at 827.[467] It was also confirmed Juventus and Italian footballer Daniele Rugani had tested positive for coronavirus.[468]
Ivory Coast declared its first case, a local citizen who had recently been in Italy.[citation needed]
Kuwait reported three additional cases, bringing its total to 72.[469]
Lebanon recorded eight new cases, taking the total to 59, and a second death.[470]
Lithuania confirmed two additional cases, a married couple that came back from Italy, taking the total to 3 cases.[471]
Malaysia confirmed 20 additional cases, taking the total to 149.[472]
Maldives confirmed two additional cases.[473]
Morocco confirmed two additional cases, bringing the total to 5.[474]
The Netherlands' total increased to 503 cases, and one new death was reported.[475]
Norway confirmed 200 additional cases, taking the total number to 602.[476]
Paraguay confirmed three new cases.[477]
Panama confirmed several new cases, bringing the total to 14.[478]
The Philippines confirmed 16 additional cases, bringing the country's total to 49.[479] The second death was also confirmed.[480][481]
Portugal announced 18 new cases.[482]
Qatar reported six new cases, increasing the country's total to 24.[483] It later announced 238 new cases in expatriates who came in contact with three infected people, and had been quarantined.[484] The revised number of cases is now 262.
Réunion confirmed its first case.[485]
Romania confirmed 18 new cases, bringing the total to 47.[486]
Saudi Arabia reported an additional case, an Egyptian, taking the country's total to 21.[487]
Scotland confirmed 18 new cases, bringing the total number to 36.
Singapore confirmed 12 new cases, bringing the total number to 178.[488]
South Africa confirmed six more cases, taking the total to 13.[489]
South Korea confirmed 242 new cases and 6 new deaths, bringing the total to 7,755 and 60 respectively.[490][491]
Spain's cases rose to 2,231, with 54 confirmed deaths.[492]
Sri Lanka announced one additional case, bringing the total number to 2.[493]
Sweden reported 98 additional cases, taking the total to 500, and announced the first death in the country.[494]
Taiwan confirmed one additional case, raising the country's total to 48.[495]
Thailand confirmed six additional cases, taking the country's cases to 59.[496]
The United Kingdom confirmed an additional 86 cases, with its overall total now at 456. Two more deaths were confirmed, bringing the total to 8.[497] The number later increased to 460, with four cases declared in Wales, including the first instance of community transmission in Wales.[498]
The United States confirmed 272 additional cases, bringing the total number to 1,272. Seven more deaths were reported, bringing the total number to 38.[499] The Utah Jazz's Rudy Gobert and Donovan Mitchell were diagnosed with the illness. As a result, the NBA suspended the entire season after the night's games. The Utah Jazz vs Oklahoma City Thunder game was postponed after doctors reported Gobert had the illness.[500] In addition, Michigan confirmed its first two cases, raising concerns on the automobile industry's survival.[501]
Vietnam confirmed four additional cases, raising the country's total to 38.[502][503][504]
The World Health Organization declared COVID-19 a pandemic.[505] The declaration followed extensive criticism that the WHO response had been weak and inappropriately favourable toward the government of China.[506][507]
12 March
WHO Situation Report 52:[508]

Algeria confirmed five additional cases and the first death.[509]
Brazil confirmed 82 new cases, raising the total number to 149.[510][511]
Brunei reported five new cases, bringing the total number to 11.[512]
Bulgaria reported nine new cases from the capital, bringing the total number to 16. They later reported seven more cases, bringing the total number to 23.[citation needed]
The Canadian province of Ontario has reported 18 new cases.[513] [514]
The Canadian province of Quebec has reported eight new cases. [515]
China reports eight new cases and 11 deaths; representing a sharp drop in the number of transmissions and fatalities in China. These brought the total number of cases and deaths to 80,786 and 3,169 respectively.[516][517]
Colombia confirmed four more cases, raising the total to 13.[518]
Egypt confirmed 13 new cases and one new death.[519]
France's total increased to 2,876 and 61 deaths.[520]
Germany announced 546 new cases and two additional deaths, taking the totals to 2,745 cases and 6 deaths.[521]
India confirmed its first death, a 76-year-old Indian national with existing health conditions, who had recently returned from Saudi Arabia.[522]
Italy confirmed 189 more deaths, bringing the total number to 1,016, and 2,651 new cases were also confirmed, bringing the total number to 15,113.[523]
Ireland confirmed 27 new cases, bringing the total to 70. 22 of the new cases were by local transmission.[524]
Japan reported a total of 624 cases, with 23 dead.[525]
Kuwait confirmed eight more cases, taking the total number to 80.[526]
Malaysia confirmed its first sporadic case after 600 tests.[527] Nine new cases were later confirmed, bringing the total number to 158.[528]
Norway reported its first death.[529]
The Philippines confirmed three more cases, bringing the total cases to 52.[530]
Romania confirmed one new case, bringing to total number to 48.[531]
San Marino reported 15 new cases and three additional deaths.[532]
Singapore confirmed nine more cases, bringing the total number to 187.[533]
South Korea confirmed 114 new cases and 6 new deaths, bringing the total to 7,869 and 66 respectively.[534]
Spain confirmed 782 new cases and 31 new deaths, raising the country's total to 3,059 cases and 86 dead.[citation needed]
Sri Lanka confirmed an additional case, taking the total number to 3.[535]
St. Vincent & the Grenadines confirmed its first case.[536]
Switzerland confirmed 212 new cases and 2 additional deaths.[537]
Thailand confirmed 11 new cases, bringing the total to 70.[538]
Trinidad & Tobago confirmed its first case, a Swiss national.[citation needed]
Ukraine reported two new cases, bringing the total number to 3.[539]
The United Kingdom confirmed 136 new cases, bringing the total number to 596. Two more deaths were also confirmed, bringing the total to 10.[540] It was confirmed Arsenal head coach Mikel Arteta had tested positive for COVID-19.[541]
The United States confirmed 373 additional cases, bringing the total number to 1,645. Three more deaths were reported, bringing the total number to 41.[542] The Utah Jazz's Donovan Mitchell tested positive for the virus.[543]
Vietnam confirmed six new cases, bringing the total number to 44.[544][545]
A team member of McLaren tested positive for the coronavirus, throwing the 2020 Australian Grand Prix into disarray.[546]
Brazilian President Jair Bolsonaro's communications secretary Fabio Wajngarten tested positive for COVID-19.[547]
13 March
WHO Situation Report 53:[548]

Antigua and Barbuda confirmed its first case.[549]
Aruba confirmed its first two cases, people who travelled in from New York.[550]
Bulgaria confirmed three new cases, bringing the total number to 26. Bulgaria later confirmed five additional cases, bringing the total to 31.
Brazil confirmed 22 new cases, bringing the total number to 171.[551] President Jair Bolsonaro tested negative for COVID-19.[552][553]
Brunei confirmed 14 new cases, bringing the total number to 25.[554]
The Canadian province of Ontario has reported 19 new cases.[555] [556]
The Cayman Islands confirmed its first case.[citation needed]
Colombia reported three more cases, raising the total to 16.[557]
Costa Rica reported three new cases since 12 March, bringing the total number of cases to 26.[558]
Curaçao reported its first case, a Dutch tourist.[559]
Ethiopia confirmed its first case.[560]
France's numbers increased to 2,876 cases and 81 deaths.[561]
Gabon confirmed its first case.[562]
Germany's case total rose to 3,675.[563]
Ghana confirmed its first two cases, a Norwegian Embassy official and a Turkish citizen.[564]
Guadeloupe confirmed its first case, a citizen who recently returned from France.[565]
Guatemala confirmed its first case, a traveller from Italy.[566]
Guinea reported its first case, an employee of the EU delegation.[567]
Israel reported a total of 126 cases.[568]
Italy's cases rose to 17,660 and deaths rose to 1,266, a rise of 250 deaths in 24 hours.[569]
Kazakhstan confirmed its first two cases, which were also the first in Central Asia.[570]
Kenya confirmed its first case, a Kenyan national who had returned from the United States via London.[571]
Kosovo confirmed its first two cases.[572]
Lithuania confirmed three new cases, bringing the total number to 6. A Spanish citizen from Madrid was confirmed in Vilnius, along with a woman in Klaipėda who arrived from Tenerife, and a man in Kaunas who arrived from Italy on 29 February.[573]
Malaysia confirmed 39 new cases, bringing the total number to 197.[574]
Palestine confirms 35 coronavirus cases.[575]
The Philippines confirmed 12 more cases, bringing the total number to 64.[576]
Panama confirmed several new cases, bringing the total to 27.[577] More new cases were later confirmed, bringing the total to 36.[578]
Puerto Rico confirmed its first three cases, a 71-year-old man and an Italian couple, aged 68 and 70.[579]
Saint Lucia confirmed its first case, a 63-year-old woman who had travelled to the UK.[580]
Singapore confirmed 13 more cases, bringing the total number to 200. The number of imported cases surpassed that of local cases.[581]
Slovakia confirmed 11 new cases, bringing the total number to 32.[582]
South Korea confirmed 110 new cases and one new death, bringing the total to 7,979 and 67 respectively.[583]
Spain's cases rose to 4,231. 35 more deaths were also confirmed, bringing the total to 121.[584][585]
Sri Lanka confirmed three new cases, bringing the total number to 6.[586]
Sudan confirmed its first case and first death, a man in his 50s who travelled to the United Arab Emirates.[587]
Suriname confirmed its first case.[588]
Switzerland reported 1,125 cases (of which 116 are undergoing final analysis),[589] a 31% day-on-day increase.
Thailand confirmed five new cases, bringing the total to 75.[590]
Turkey confirmed its second case.[591] Later in the day, the case count increased to 5. All cases were related to the first case, who contracted the virus from Europe.[592]
Ukraine reported its first death, a 71-year-old woman from Radomyshl, Zhytomyr Oblast who recently travelled to Poland.[593]
The United Kingdom confirmed 202 new cases, bringing the total number to 798. The first death was confirmed in Scotland, bringing the total deaths across the UK to 11.[594]
The United States confirmed 559 additional cases, bringing the total number to 2,204. Eight more deaths were reported, bringing the total number to 49.[595]
U.S. Virgin Islands confirmed the first case in the territory.[596]
Uruguay confirmed its first four cases, all of them having travelled from Milan, Italy.[597]
Venezuela confirmed its first two cases, one a traveller from the United States, and the second who had travelled from Spain.[598]
Vietnam confirmed three additional cases, bringing the total number to 47.[599][600]
14 March
WHO Situation Report 54:[601]

Brazil confirmed seven more cases, bringing the total number to 178.[602][603]
Brunei reported three new cases, bringing the total to 40.[604]
Bulgaria confirmed six new cases bringing the total number to 37. One more death was also confirmed, bringing the total number to 2.
The Canadian province of Ontario has reported 24 new cases.[605] [606]
The Canadian province of Quebec has reported four new cases.[607]
Central African Republic confirmed its first case.[608]
China reported 20 new cases, up from 11 cases a day earlier. 16 of the cases were overseas travellers. In response, the Beijing authorities announced that everyone arriving from overseas would be quarantined for 14 days.[609]
Colombia reported additional eight more cases, taking the total to 24.[610]
Congo Republic confirmed its first case, a person who had travelled from France.[611]
Denmark confirmed the first death in the country, an 81-year-old man.[612]
Equatorial Guinea confirmed its first case, a 42-year-old woman who returned from Madrid.[613]
Eswatini confirmed its first case, a 33-year-old woman, who travelled to the United States and then Lesotho before returning home to Eswatini.[614]
France confirmed 838 new cases, bringing the total number to 4,499. 12 more deaths were confirmed, bringing the total to 91.
Iran confirmed 1,365 new cases, bringing the total number to 12,729. 97 more deaths were confirmed, bringing the total to 611.[615]
Ireland confirmed 39 new cases, the largest to date, and one more confirmed death. 129 total confirmed cases and 2 deaths.[616]
Italy confirmed 3,497 new cases, bringing the total number to 21,157. 175 more deaths were also confirmed, bringing the total to 1,441.[617]
Malaysia confirmed 41 new cases, bringing the total number to 238.[618]
Mauritania confirmed its first case.[619]
Mayotte confirmed its first case.[620]
Moldova confirmed four new cases.[citation needed]
Namibia confirmed its first cases, two tourists visiting the country.[621]
New Zealand confirmed its sixth case, a man who had returned from the United States on 6 March.[622]
Palestine confirms four new cases, bringing the total to 39 cases.[623][624]
The Philippines confirmed 47 more cases, bringing the total number to 111.[625]
Rwanda confirmed its first case.[626]
Saudi Arabia confirmed 17 additional cases, with its total rising to 103.[627]
Seychelles reported its first two cases.[628]
Singapore confirmed 12 more cases, bringing the total number to 212.[629]
South Korea confirmed 107 new cases and five new deaths, bringing the total to 8,086 and 72 respectively.[630]
Spain confirmed 1,522 new cases, raising its total to 5,753 cases. 62 more deaths were confirmed, bringing the total to 183.[585]
Sri Lanka confirmed two new cases, bringing the total number to 8.[631] Another three cases were later confirmed, bringing the total number to 11.[632][633]
Panama confirmed several new cases, bringing the total number to 43.[634]
Thailand confirmed seven more cases, bringing the total number to 82.[635]
The United Kingdom confirmed 342 new cases, bringing the total number to 1,140. 10 more deaths were reported, bringing the total to 21.[636]
The United States confirmed 612 new cases, bringing the total number to 2,816. One of the cases was 24-year-old Christian Wood of the Detroit Pistons.[637][638] Eleven more deaths were reported, bringing the total number to 60.[639]
Vietnam confirmed six additional cases, bringing the total number to 53.[640][641][642]
15 March
Puerto Rico issued the first stay at home order in the United States.[citation needed]
WHO Situation Report 55:[643]

Akrotiri and Dhekelia bases in Cyprus announced the first two cases among British military personnel.[644]
Bahamas confirmed their first case, a person with no recent travel history.[645]
Brunei confirmed ten new cases, bringing the total number to 50.[646]
Bulgaria confirmed eight new cases, bringing the total number to 51.
The Canadian province of Ontario is reporting a new record high of 42 new cases.[647] [648]
The Canadian province of Quebec has reported 15 new cases.[649]
Cambodia confirmed four new cases, bringing the total to 12.[650]
Finland ceased testing for people returning from trips abroad, and all of the people suffering flu symptoms in the country. The tests are reserved for health professionals only.[651]
Guam confirmed its first three cases, two people who arrived from Manila and one other person with no recent travel history.[652]
Indonesia confirmed 21 more cases, bringing the total number to 117. Among the new diagnoses included North Sulawesi[653] and Yogyakarta's[654] first cases.
Ireland confirmed 40 new cases, the largest to date. 169 total confirmed cases and 2 deaths.[655] The government requested all pubs and bars to close permanently from midnight, in advance of the then-upcoming 17 March Saint Patricks Day public holiday.[656]
Italy confirmed 3,590 more cases, bringing the total number to 24,747. The country also recorded 368 new deaths, bringing the total number to 1,809.[657] This was the largest death rate in a day for a country since the pandemic started.[citation needed] In addition, Vittorio Gregotti, the Italian architect that designed the 1992 Barcelona Summer Olympics stadium died at 92.[658]
Malaysia confirmed 190 new cases, bringing the total number to 428. Most of these cases were linked to a gathering in Kuala Lumpur.[659]
Moldova confirmed 11 new cases, bringing the total number to 23.[citation needed]
New Zealand confirmed two new cases, a Wellington man and a Danish woman, bringing the total to 8.[660][661]
Saudi Arabia confirmed 15 new cases, bring the total number to 118[citation needed]
Singapore confirmed 14 new cases, bringing the total number to 226. This was the highest number of new cases in the country in a single day.[662]
South Korea confirmed 76 new cases and three new deaths, bringing the total to 8,162 and 75 respectively.[663]
Sri Lanka confirmed eight more cases, bringing the total to 19. There were 18 active cases with one recovered case.[664][665]
Panama confirmed several new cases, bringing the total number to 55.[666]
Thailand confirmed 32 more cases, bringing the total number to 114.[667]
Turkey confirmed 12 more cases, bringing the total number to 18.[668]
The United Kingdom confirmed 232 new cases, bringing the total number to 1,372. 14 more deaths were reported, bringing the total to 35.[669]
The United States confirmed 669 new cases, bringing the total number to 3,485. Five more deaths were reported, bringing the total number to 65.[670]
Uzbekistan confirmed its first case, a citizen who had returned from France.[671]
Vietnam confirmed four additional cases, bringing the total number to 57.[672][673]
16 March
WHO Situation Report 56:[674]

Benin confirmed its first case, a 49-year-old man who had travelled to Belgium and Burkina Faso.[675]
Bulgaria confirmed two new cases, bringing the total number to 53. Bulgaria later confirmed nine more cases, bringing the final total to 62.[676]
The Canadian province of Ontario has reported 32 new cases.[677] [678]
The Canadian province of Quebec has reported 14 new cases.[679]
Costa Rica confirmed 40 cases.[680]
Cyprus confirmed 13 new cases, taking the total to 46.[681]
Egypt confirmed 40 new cases, taking the total to 166. It also confirmed two additional deaths.[682]
France confirmed that cases had risen to 6,633 with 148 deaths.[683]
Germany's cases rose to 7,272 with 17 deaths.[citation needed]
Greece confirmed 21 new cases for a total of 352.[684][685]
Greenland confirmed its first case.[686]
Guatemala confirmed five more cases, bringing the total to 6 and the first death in the country from the virus.[687]
Indonesia confirmed 17 more cases, 134 in total.
Iran's cases rose to 13,938 with its death toll rising by 129 to 853.[688] The deaths included Hashem Bathaie Golpayenagi, Grand Ayatollah and a representative of the Tehran Province in Iran's Assembly of Experts.[689]
Ireland confirmed 54 new cases, the largest to date. 223 total confirmed cases and 2 deaths.[690]
Italy's confirmed cases rose to 27,980 and deaths to 2,158.[691] This total included 3,233 new cases and 349 new deaths.
Jordan confirmed four new cases, taking its total to 15.[692]
Kuwait confirmed 11 new cases, taking the total to 123.[693]
Liberia confirmed its first case.[694]
Malaysia announced another 125 cases, taking it to a total of 553 with many of the new cases linked to a recent religious festival in the country.[695]
Moldova announced another six cases, taking its total to 29.[citation needed]
Oman confirmed two additional cases, raising the total to 24.[696]
Qatar reported 64 new cases taking it to 401.[697]
Singapore confirmed 17 more cases, bringing the total number to 243. This was the biggest spike of new cases in a single day.[698]
Somalia confirmed its first case.[699]
South Korea confirmed 74 new cases, bringing the total to 8,236.[700]
Spain reported 9,942 cases and 342 deaths.[citation needed]
Sri Lanka confirmed eleven more cases, bringing the total to 29.[701][702]
Tanzania confirmed its first case.[703]
Thailand confirms 33 new cases, bringing the total to 147.[704]
Turkey announced that the number of cases had risen to 47, with 29 new cases confirmed.[705]
The United Kingdom confirmed a total of 1,543 positive tests, up from 1,372.[706]
The United States confirmed 974 new cases, bringing the total number to 4,459. 22 more deaths were reported, bringing the total number to 87.[707]
Ukraine confirmed two new cases: two women, one of whom recently returned from Italy.[708]
Vietnam confirmed four additional cases, bringing the total number to 61.[709][710]
Actor Idris Elba tests positive for COVID-19. This comes after Tom Hanks and Rita Wilson both announced positive results last week.[711]
17 March
WHO Situation Report 57:[712]

Barbados reported its first two cases, people who recently returned from the US.[713]
Bulgaria confirmed five new cases, bringing the number to 67, and then an additional 14 new cases, bringing the total number to 81.[citation needed]
Brazil confirmed the first death in the country, a 62-year-old man in the state of São Paulo.[714]
The Canadian province of Ontario has reported 13 new cases.[715] [716]
The Canadian province of Quebec has reported 24 new cases.[717]
France confirmed 7,730 people had now tested positive with 175 deaths.[718]
Gambia reported its first case.[719]
Hungary reported 11 new cases, bringing the total number to 50.[720]
Indonesia reported 38 new cases, bringing the total number to 172.[721]
Ireland confirmed 69 new cases, the largest to date. 292 total confirmed cases and 2 deaths.[722]
Italy confirmed an increase to 31,506 cases and 2,503 deaths.[723]
Kuwait confirmed seven new cases, taking the total to 130.[724]
Malaysia reported its first two deaths, a 60-year-old pastor in Sarawak and a 34-year-old man from Johor who had attended a Muslim religious gathering. 120 new cases were also confirmed, bringing the total number to 673.[725][726][727]
Montenegro reported its first two cases. One infected was from Podgorica, and the other from Ulcinj.[728] Montenegro was the last country in Europe without any confirmed cases.
The Netherlands confirmed 1,705 cases and 43 deaths.[citation needed]
New Zealand confirmed four new cases, bringing the total to 12.[729][730]
Pakistan confirmed its first death.[731]
Panama confirmed several new cases, bringing the total number to 86.[732]
The Philippines reported 45 new cases, taking the total to 187.[733]
Singapore confirmed 23 new cases, bringing the total number to 266. This was the highest number of new cases in the country in a single day so far.[734]
Sint Maarten confirmed its first case, a 26-year-old local resident who travelled to UK and Miami.[735]
Slovakia confirmed 25 new cases, bringing the total number to 97.[citation needed]
South Korea confirmed 84 new cases and six new deaths, bringing the total to 8,320 and 81 respectively.[736]
Thailand confirmed 30 new cases, bringing the total to 177.[737]
Ukraine reported seven new cases and its second death, bringing the total number of cases to 14.[738]
The United Kingdom reported 407 new cases, with the total rising from 1,543 to 1,950.
The United States confirmed 1,676 new cases, bringing the total number to 6,135. 25 more deaths were reported, bringing the total number to 112.[739] The Brooklyn Nets announced that four of their players had tested positive, including forward Kevin Durant.[740]
Vietnam confirmed five more cases, bringing the total number to 66.[741]
18 March
WHO Situation Report 58:[742]

Bermuda confirmed its first two cases.[743][744]
Bangladesh confirmed its first death.[745]
The Canadian province of Ontario has reported 25 new cases.[746] [747]
The Canadian province of Quebec has reported 20 new cases.[748]
Costa Rica confirmed its first death.[749]
Djibouti confirmed its first case.[750]
El Salvador confirmed its first case.[751]
Guatemala confirmed two additional cases, bringing the total to 8.[752]
Ireland confirmed 74 new cases, the largest to date. 366 total confirmed cases and 2 deaths.[753]
Italy reported 4,207 new cases and 475 new deaths. The total number of cases reached 35,713 and the total death toll rose to 2,978.[754]
Kyrgyzstan reported its first cases, three people who had recently returned from a pilgrimage to Saudi Arabia.[755]
Malaysia confirmed 117 new cases, bringing the total number to 790.[756]
Mauritius announced its first three cases.[757]
Moldova confirmed its first death[758] and six new cases, bringing the total to 36.
Montserrat confirmed its first case, a person who visited the United Kingdom.[759]
New Caledonia confirmed its first two cases.[760]
New Zealand confirmed eight new cases, bringing the total to 20.[761]
Nicaragua confirmed its first case, imported from Panama.[762][763]
Palestine confirms 44 cases.[764][765][766]
Panama confirmed several new cases, bringing the total to 109.[767]
Singapore confirmed 47 new cases, bringing the total number to 313. This was the highest number of new cases in the country in a single day so far.[768]
Slovakia confirmed its first death.[769]
South Korea confirmed 93 new cases and three new deaths, bringing the total to 8,413 and 84 respectively.[770]
Thailand confirmed 35 new cases, bringing the total to 212.[771]
The United Kingdom confirmed 676 new cases, taking it to a total of 2,626.[772] 32 additional deaths were announced, taking the total to 104.[773]
The United States confirmed 2,601 more cases, bringing the total number to 8,736. 37 more deaths were reported, bringing the total number to 149.[774]
Vietnam confirmed ten more cases, bringing the total number to 76.[775][776][777]
Zambia reported its first two cases.[778]
19 March
WHO Situation Report 59:[779]

Angola confirmed its first case, a Chinese businessman.[780]
The Canadian province of Ontario has reported a new record high of 43 new cases.[781] [782]
The Canadian province of Quebec has reported 27 new cases.[783]
Chad confirmed its first case, a Moroccan national who had travelled to the country from Cameroon.[784]
China reported no new cases of local infections but confirmed 34 new cases from overseas arrivals.[785]
Fiji confirmed its first case, a 27-year old flight attendant.[786][787]
Guatemala confirmed one additional case, raising the total to 9.[788]
Haiti reported its first two cases.[789]
Ireland confirmed 191 new cases, the largest to date with more than two and a half times the confirmed cases of 18 March, and a third death, bringing the total number of cases to 557.[790] Approximately 7,000 tests have been administered to date and the Minister for Health, Simon Harris, believes there will be 15,000 tests given a day starting within the next few days.[791]
Isle of Man confirmed its first case, a person who recently returned from Spain.[792]
Italy's number of cases rose to 41,035 from a previous 35,713, up by 5,322, a faster rate of growth than the past three days. They also overtook China as the country with the most deaths, registering 3,405 dead, a rise of 427 from the day before.[793]
Malaysia confirmed 110 new cases, bringing the total number to 900.[794]
New Zealand confirmed eight new cases, bringing the total to 28.[795][796]
Niger confirmed its first case, a local 36-year-old man who travelled a lot to Togo, Ghana, Ivory Coast and Burkina Faso due to work.[797]
Ibrahim Milhem confirmed three new cases bringing the total to 47. He said in the daily briefing that two cases were students returning home from France and quarantined before being in contact with anyone. The third is for a person from Nablus previously suspected of having the disease and was kept in home quarantine.[798]
Palestine confirms three new cases, bringing the total to 47.[798]
Panama reported several new cases, bringing the total number to 137.[799]
Pakistan confirmed 70 additional cases.[800]
Russia confirmed its first death.[801]
Singapore confirmed 32 new cases, bringing the total number to 345.[802]
South Korea confirmed 152 new cases and seven new deaths, bringing the total to 8,565 and 91 respectively.[803]
Spain reported a large increase in cases, with 17,147 cases and 767 deaths.[804]
Thailand confirmed 60 new cases, bringing the total to 272.[805]
The United Kingdom's total of diagnosed cases rose to 3,229, an increase of 603, with the death toll rising to 144.[806]
The United States confirmed 4,397 more cases, bringing the total number to 13,133. 46 more deaths were reported, bringing the total number to 195.[807] The Denver Nuggets, Los Angeles Lakers, Philadelphia 76ers, and the Boston Celtics all reported that some of their players had tested positive for the virus. The players had not been named.[808]
Vietnam confirmed nine more cases, bringing the total number to 85.[809]
20 March
WHO Situation Report 60:[810]

The Canadian province of Ontario has reported a new record high of 60 new cases.[811] [812]
The Canadian province of Quebec has reported 18 new cases.[813]
Cape Verde confirmed its first case, a 62-year-old English tourist.[814]
East Timor confirmed its first case.[815]
Guatemala confirmed three additional cases, bringing the total to 12.[816]
Ireland confirmed 126 new cases, less than that of 19 March. 683 total confirmed cases and 3 deaths.[817]
Madagascar reported its first three cases.[818]
Malaysia confirmed its third death. In addition, 130 new cases were confirmed, bringing the total number to 1,030.[819]
New Zealand confirmed 11 new cases, bringing the total to 39.[820][821]
Palestine confirms a new case, bringing the total to 48. Authorities also report that 17 have recovered.[822][823]
Panama reported over 60 new cases, bringing the total number to 200.[824]
Papua New Guinea confirmed its first case.[825]
Singapore confirmed 40 new cases, bringing the total number to 385.[826]
South Korea confirmed 87 new cases and three new deaths, bringing the total to 8,652 and 94 respectively.[827]
Thailand confirmed 50 new cases, bringing the total to 322.[828]
Uganda confirmed its first case.[829]
Ukraine confirmed 15 new cases, bringing the total number to 41.[830]
The United Kingdom confirmed that positive test results had risen to 3,983 and there had been 177 deaths.[831]
The United States confirmed 5,630 more cases, bringing the total number to 18,763. 63 more deaths were reported, bringing the total number to 258.[832]
Vietnam confirmed six more cases, bringing the total number to 91.[833][834]
Zimbabwe confirmed its first case.[835]
21 March
WHO Situation Report 61:[836]

Åland Islands confirmed their first two cases.[837]
The Canadian province of Ontario has reported 59 new cases.[838] [839]
The Canadian province of Quebec has reported 42 new cases.[840]
China reports no new cases of local infections but confirms 41 new cases from overseas travellers, bringing the total number of overseas infected to 269.[841]
Eritrea confirmed its first case, a 39-year-old Eritrean national with permanent residence in Norway.[842]
Fiji has confirmed its second case and first community case, a relative of the first patient.[843]
Guatemala confirmed five new cases, bringing the total to 17.[844]
Indonesia confirmed 81 new cases, bringing the total to 450. The number of deaths rose by six to 38.[845]
Ireland confirmed 102 new cases, less than that of 20 March, with a total of 785 total confirmed cases and 3 deaths.[846]
Malaysia confirmed five more deaths, bringing the total to 8. Separately, 153 new cases were confirmed, bringing the total number to 1,183.[847]
New Caledonia has confirmed two new cases, bringing the total number to four.[848]
New Zealand reported 13 new cases, bringing the total to 52.[849]
Palestine confirms four new cases, bringing the total to 52.[850]
The Philippines recorded 77 new cases, bringing the total number to 307.[851]
Singapore confirmed its first two deaths, a 64-year-old Indonesian man and a 75-year-old Singaporean woman.[852] 47 new cases were later confirmed, bringing the total number to 432.[853]
South Korea confirmed 147 new cases and eight new deaths, bringing the total to 8,799 and 102 respectively.[854]
Transnistria confirmed its first two cases.[855]
The United Kingdom confirmed that positive test results had risen to 5,018 and there had been 233 deaths.[856]
The United States confirmed 4,886 more cases, bringing the total number to 23,649. 44 more deaths were reported, bringing the total number to 302.[857]
Vietnam confirmed three more cases, bringing the total number to 94.[858][859]
22 March
WHO Situation Report 62:[860]

The Canadian province of Ontario has reported 48 new cases.[861] [862]
The Canadian province of Quebec has reported 38 new cases.[863]
China reported 39 new cases, down from 46 a day earlier. All of these cases were overseas travellers.[864][865]
Dominica confirmed its first case, a 54-year-old man who recently arrived from the United Kingdom.[866]
Grenada confirmed its first case, a woman who recently travelled to the UK.[867]
Indonesia confirmed 64 new cases, bringing the total number to 514.[868]
Ireland confirmed 121 new cases, more than that of 21 March, and a fourth death, with a total of 906 total confirmed cases and 4 deaths.[869]
Malaysia confirmed two more deaths, bringing the total to 10. There were also 123 new cases confirmed, bringing the total number to 1,306.[870]
Mozambique confirmed its first case.[871]
New Zealand reported 14 new cases, bringing the total to 66.[872][873]
Palestine updates the number of cases to 59.[874]
Romania confirmed its first death, a 67-year-old man suffering from cancer. A total of 367 cases had since been recorded.[875]
Singapore confirmed 23 new cases, bringing the total number to 455.[876]
South Korea confirmed 98 new cases and two new deaths, bringing the total to 8,897 and 104 respectively.[877]
Syria recorded its first case.[878]
The United Kingdom confirmed that positive test results had risen to 5,683 and there had been 281 deaths.[879]
The United States confirmed 10,351 more cases, bringing the total number to 34,000. 111 more deaths were reported, bringing the total number to 413.[880]
Ukraine confirmed 26 more cases, bringing the total number to 73.[881]
Vietnam confirmed 19 more cases, bringing the total number to 113.[882][883]
23 March
WHO Situation Report 63:[884]

Belize confirmed its first case, a local resident who recently returned from Los Angeles.[885]
The Canadian province of Ontario has reported a new record high of 78 new cases.[886] [887]
The Canadian province of Quebec has reported 409 new cases.[888]
Fiji confirmed its third case, a one-year-old nephew of the first patient.[889]
Indonesia confirmed 65 new cases, bringing the total number to 579.[890]
Ireland confirmed 219 new cases, the largest increase to date, and two deaths, with a total of 1,125 total confirmed cases and 6 deaths.[891]
Malaysia confirmed four more deaths, bringing the total to 14. There were also 212 new cases confirmed, bringing the total number to 1,518.[892]
Myanmar confirmed its first two cases.[893]
New Zealand confirmed 36 new cases, bringing the total number to 102.[894][895]
Panama confirmed several new cases, bringing the total number to 345. Panama also confirmed several new deaths, bringing the total number to 6.[896]
Singapore confirmed 54 new cases, bringing the total number to 509.[897]
South Korea confirmed 64 new cases and seven new deaths, bringing the total to 8,961 and 111 respectively.[898]
Turks and Caicos Islands confirmed their first case.[899]
The United Kingdom confirmed that positive test results had risen to 6,650 and there had been 335 deaths.[900][901]
Vietnam confirmed 10 more cases, bringing the total number to 123.[902]
24 March
WHO Situation Report 64:[903]

The Canadian province of Ontario has reported a new record high of 85 new cases.[904] [905]
The Canadian province of Quebec has reported 412 new cases.[906]
China reports 78 newly confirmed cases including 74 imported cases, bringing the total number of imported cases to 427.[907] In addition, the NHC reported seven deaths in Wuhan.[908]
Easter Island reports its first case.[909]
Fiji has confirmed its fourth case, which resulted through overseas travel from Sydney and is not related to the first three cases.[910]
Indonesia confirmed 107 new cases, the largest increase it has had to date, bringing the total number of cases to 686.[911]
Ireland confirmed 204 new cases, fewer than that of 23 March, and one death, giving a total of 1,329 total confirmed cases and 7 deaths.[912]
Italy confirmed 5,249 new cases and 743 new deaths, taking the country to a total of 69,176 cases and 6,820 deaths.[913]
Laos reported its first two cases.[914]
Libya confirmed its first case.[915]
Malaysia reported 106 new cases, bringing the total number to 1,624. Malaysia also reported one death, bringing the total number of deaths to 15.[916]
New Caledonia reported two new cases, bringing the total to nine.[917]
New Zealand confirmed 40 new cases, and started including probable cases in its count. The inclusion brings New Zealand's total to 155.[918][919][920]
Palestine reports a new case, bringing the total number to 60.[921][922]
Panama confirmed 98 new cases, bringing the total number to 443, and 2 deaths, bringing the total number to 8.[923]
Singapore confirmed 49 new cases, bringing the total number to 558.[924]
South Korea confirmed 76 new cases and nine new deaths, bringing the total to 9,037 and 120 respectively.[925]
The United Kingdom confirmed that positive test results had risen to 8,077 and there had been 422 deaths. The 8,077 cases included 6,843 in England, 584 in Scotland, 478 in Wales and 172 in Northern Ireland.[926]
25 March
WHO Situation Report 65:[927]

British Virgin Islands reported their first two cases.[928]
The Canadian province of Ontario has reported a new record high of 100 new cases.[929] [930]
The Canadian province of Quebec has reported 299 new cases.[931]
Fiji confirmed its fifth case, a 31-year-old female from Lautoka. She was a close contact of the first case.[932]
Guinea-Bissau reported its first two cases.[933]
Ireland confirmed 235 new cases, the largest increase to date, and two deaths, giving a total of 1,564 total confirmed cases and 9 deaths.[934]
Latvia reported 24 new cases,[935] among them the first five untraceable cases,[936] raising the total number to 221.[935]
Malaysia confirmed four more deaths, bringing the total to 19. There were also 172 new cases confirmed, bringing the total number to 1,796.[937]
Mali reported its first two cases.[938]
New Caledonia has reported four new cases, bringing the total number to 14.[917]
New Zealand reported 50 new cases including probable cases, bringing the total number of confirmed and probable cases to 205.[939][940]
Palestine confirms its first death.[941][942] Authorities also confirm two news cases, bringing the total to 62.[943]
Peru confirmed two deaths, bringing the death toll to 9.[944]
Saint Kitts and Nevis reported its first two cases.[945]
Singapore confirmed 73 new cases, bringing the total number to 631.[946]
South Korea confirmed 100 new cases and six new deaths, bringing the total to 9,137 and 126 respectively.[947]
The United Kingdom confirmed that positive test results had risen to 9,529 and there had been 463 deaths.[948]
26 March
WHO Situation Report 66:[949]

Anguilla reported its first two cases.[950]
The Canadian province of Ontario has reported a new record high of 170 new cases.[951] [952]
The Canadian province of Quebec has reported 290 new cases.[953]
Iran reported 2,389 new cases and 175 deaths within the last 24 hours, bringing Iran's total death toll to 2,234.[954]
Ireland confirmed 255 new cases, the largest increase to date, and ten deaths, the largest jump in deaths to date (previously 2 deaths in one day), giving a total of 1,819 total confirmed cases and 19 deaths.[955]
Malaysia confirmed four more deaths, bringing the total to 23. There were also 235 new cases confirmed, bringing the total number to 2,031.[956]
New Zealand reported 78 confirmed and probable cases, bringing the total to 283. A total of 27 people have recovered from the virus.[957]
Palestine confirmed 13 new cases, bringing the total to 86.[958]
Panama confirmed 116 new cases, bringing the total to 674, and confirmed a new death, bringing the total to 9.[959]
Russia confirmed 182 cases, bringing the total to 842.[954]
Singapore confirmed 52 new cases, bringing the total number to 683.[960]
South Korea confirmed 104 new cases and five new deaths, bringing the total to 9,241 and 131 respectively.[961]
Spain confirmed a further 655 deaths, taking the country's death toll to 4,000.[954]
27 March
WHO Situation Report 67:[962]

China reported 67 new imported cases, bringing the total number of infected cases to 81,285.[963][964][965]
The Canadian province of Ontario has reported 132 new cases.[966] [967]
The Canadian province of Quebec has reported 392 new cases.[968]
Ireland confirmed 302 new cases, the largest increase to date, and 3 deaths. This gave a total of 2,121 confirmed cases and 22 deaths. The government issued strict guidelines beginning at midnight where people must stay at home with specific exceptions such as essential employees for essential businesses. Notably, residents would be allowed to leave solely for going to the grocery store, pharmacy, for a medical appointment, or for exercise with a maximum 2 km radius from their house where social distancing must be practised and exercise time must be kept short.[969]
Italy confirmed a new highest single-day death toll with 919 deaths (surpassing Spain's total released earlier in the day), increasing the country's total to 9,134. Overall confirmed cases of infection rose by 5,959 to 86,498.[970]
Malaysia confirmed its 24th death, a 35-year-old man who travelled to Indonesia earlier in the month.[971] Another two deaths were later confirmed, bringing the total to 26. There were also 130 new cases confirmed, bringing the total number to 2,161.[972]
New Caledonia has reported one new case, bringing the total number of cases to 15.[973]
New Zealand confirmed 85 new confirmed and probable cases, bringing the total to 368.[974]
Palestine confirms seven new cases, bringing the total to 91.[975]
Panama confirmed 112 new cases, bringing the total to 786, and confirmed 5 new deaths, bringing the total to 14.[976]
Singapore confirmed 49 new cases, bringing the total number to 732.[977]
South Africa confirmed its first death at the same time as when the lockdown in the country began.[978]
South Korea confirmed 91 new cases and eight new deaths, bringing the total to 9,332 and 139 respectively.[979]
Spain recorded the highest single-day death toll worldwide to date, with 769 deaths. There were now 64,059 confirmed cases, up from 56,188.[980]
The United States confirmed at least 101,242 cases based on figures collated by Johns Hopkins University, overtaking China (81,782) and Italy (80,589). The US death toll surpassed 1,500.[981][982]
News reports citing a government document reported that a 57-year-old woman, who tested positive for the coronavirus disease on 10 December 2019 and was described in The Wall Street Journal on 6 March 2020, may have been patient zero in the coronavirus pandemic.[983][984]
The first oil refinery shutdowns in India and Europe were announced while global refinery runs drop in response to plunging demand as countries worldwide implement lockdowns.[985]
28 March
WHO Situation Report 68:[986]

The Canadian province of Ontario has reported 151 new cases.[987] [988]
The Canadian province of Quebec has reported 477 new cases.[989]
Ireland confirmed 294 new cases and 14 deaths, the largest death toll to date. This gave a total of 2,415 confirmed cases and 36 deaths.[990]
Italy surpassed 10,000 deaths attributed to the virus.[991]
Malaysia confirmed a new death, bringing the total to 27. There were also 159 new cases confirmed, bringing the total number to 2,320.[992]
New Zealand reported 83 new cases including 78 confirmed and five probable cases, bringing the total to 451.[993]
Palestine confirmed six new cases, bringing the total to 97.[994]
Panama confirmed 115 new cases, bringing the total to 901, and confirmed 3 new deaths, bringing the total to 17.[995]
Singapore confirmed 70 new cases, bringing the total number to 802.[996]
South Korea confirmed 146 new cases and five new deaths, bringing the total to 9,478 and 144 respectively.[997]
The United Kingdom confirmed that positive test results had risen to 17,089 and there had been 260 new deaths, increasing the total to 1,019.[998]
29 March
WHO Situation Report 69:[999]

The Canadian province of Ontario has reported a new record high of 211 new cases.[1000] [1001]
The Canadian province of Quebec has reported 342 new cases.[1002]
Ireland confirmed 200 new cases and 10 deaths. This gives a total of 2,615 confirmed cases and 46 deaths.[1003]
Israel reported 628 new cases, bringing the total to 4,247. The country also reported three new deaths, bring the total number to 15.[1004]
Malaysia reported seven new deaths, bringing the total to 34. The country also confirmed 150 new cases, bringing the total number to 2,470.[1005][1006]
New Zealand reported 60 new confirmed and 3 new probable cases, bringing the total number of confirmed and probable cases to 514. The country also recorded its first death.[1007][1008]
Palestine confirms nine new cases, bringing the total to 108.[1009][1010]
Panama confirmed 88 new cases, bringing the total to 989, and confirmed 7 new deaths, bringing the total to 24.[1011]
Singapore confirmed its third death.[1012] At the same time, 42 new cases were confirmed, bringing the total to 844.[1013]
South Korea confirmed 105 new cases and eight new deaths, bringing the total to 9,583 and 152 respectively.[1014]
30 March
WHO Situation Report 70:[1015]

Botswana recorded its first three cases.[1016]
The Canadian province of Ontario has reported a new record high of 351 new cases.[1017] [1018]
The Canadian province of Quebec has reporting 590 new cases.[1019]
France reported 418 deaths in the past 24 hours, bringing the total number of fatalities to 3,024. France has 44,550 confirmed cases.[1020]
Iran confirmed 2,757 official deaths, with more than 40,000 confirmed cases.[1020]
Ireland confirmed 295 new cases and 8 deaths. This gave a total of 2,910 confirmed cases and 54 deaths.[1021]
Malaysia reported three new deaths, bringing the total to 37. The country also confirmed 156 new cases, bringing the total number to 2,626.[1022]
New Zealand reported 76 new cases, bringing the total number of confirmed and probable cases to 589.[1023][1024]
Palestine confirmed seven new cases, bringing the total number of cases to 115.[1025]
Panama confirmed 86 new cases, bringing the total to 1,075, and reported 27 deaths so far.[1026]
Singapore confirmed 35 new cases, bringing the total number to 879.[1027]
South Korea confirmed 78 new cases and six new deaths, bringing the total to 9,661 and 158 respectively.[1028]
Spain reported that 812 people have died from the coronavirus in the period between Sunday and Monday.[1029]
In the United States, New York's official death toll exceeded 1,000.[1020]
31 March
WHO Situation Report 71:[1030]

Burundi confirmed its first two cases.[1031]
The Canadian province of Ontario has reported 260 new cases.[1032] [1033]
The Canadian province of Quebec has reported 732 new cases.[1034]
China reported 48 new confirmed "imported cases" of the coronavirus but no new domestically transmitted cases on 30 March.[1035]
Guam confirmed two new cases, bringing the total number to 58.[1036]
Ireland confirmed 325 new cases, the most to date, and 17 deaths, the most to date. This gave a total of 3,235 confirmed cases and 71 deaths.[1037]
Malaysia reported six new deaths, bringing the total death toll to 43. In addition, 140 new cases were confirmed, bringing the total number to 2,766.[1038]
New Zealand confirmed 58 new confirmed and probable cases, bringing the total number to 647. 74 people have recovered.[1039][1040]
Palestine confirmed two new cases, bringing the total to 117 including 10 in Gaza.[1041]
Panama confirmed 106 new cases, bringing the total to 1,181, and reported 3 new deaths, bringing the total to 30.[1042]
Sierra Leone confirmed its first case.[1043]
Singapore confirmed 47 new cases, bringing the total number to 926.[1044]
Sint Eustatius confirmed its first two cases.[1045][1046]
Somaliland confirmed its first two cases.[1047]
South Korea confirmed 125 new cases and four new deaths, bringing the total to 9,786 and 162 respectively.[1048]
The captain of a U.S. Navy aircraft carrier USS Theodore Roosevelt that has more than 100 cases of coronavirus wrote a stunning plea for help to senior military officials.[1049]
Summary
Timeline
The list of countries and territories that confirmed their first cases during the period of March 2020:

Date	Country or territory
1 March	 Armenia •  Czechia •  Dominican Republic •  Saint Barthélemy •  Saint Martin
2 March	 Andorra •  Indonesia •  Jordan •  Latvia •  Morocco •  Portugal •  Saudi Arabia •  Senegal •  Tunisia
3 March	 Argentina •  Chile •  Gibraltar •  Liechtenstein •  Ukraine
4 March	 Faroe Islands •  Hungary •  Poland •  Slovenia
5 March	 Bosnia and Herzegovina •  Martinique •  Palestine •  South Africa
6 March	 Bhutan •  Cameroon •  Colombia •  Costa Rica •  Peru •  Serbia •  Slovakia •  Togo •  Vatican City
7 March	 Maldives •  Malta •  Moldova •  Paraguay
8 March	 Albania •  Bangladesh •  Bulgaria
9 March	 Brunei •  Cyprus •  Guernsey •  Panama
10 March	 Bolivia •  Burkina Faso •  DR Congo •  Jamaica •  Jersey •  Mongolia •  Northern Cyprus •  Turkey
11 March	 Cuba •  French Polynesia •  Honduras •  Ivory Coast •  Réunion
12 March	 Saint Vincent and the Grenadines •  Trinidad and Tobago
13 March	 Antigua and Barbuda •  Aruba •  Cayman Islands •  Curaçao •  Ethiopia •  Gabon •  Ghana •  Guadeloupe •  Guatemala •  Guinea •  Kazakhstan •  Kenya •  Kosovo •  Puerto Rico •  Saint Lucia •  Sudan •  Suriname •  U.S. Virgin Islands •  Uruguay •  Venezuela
14 March	 Central African Republic •  Congo •  Equatorial Guinea •  Eswatini •  Mauritania •  Mayotte •  Namibia •  Rwanda •  Seychelles
15 March	 Akrotiri and Dhekelia •  Bahamas •  Guam •  Uzbekistan
16 March	 Benin •  Greenland •  Liberia •  Somalia •  Tanzania
17 March	 Barbados •  Gambia •  Montenegro •  Sint Maarten
18 March	 Bermuda •  Djibouti •  El Salvador •  Kyrgyzstan •  Mauritius •  Montserrat •  New Caledonia •  Nicaragua •  Zambia
19 March	 Angola •  Chad •  Fiji •  Haiti •  Isle of Man •  Niger
20 March	 Cape Verde •  East Timor •  Madagascar •  Papua New Guinea •  Uganda •  Zimbabwe
21 March	 Åland Islands •  Eritrea •  Transnistria
22 March	 Dominica •  Grenada •  Mozambique •  Syria
23 March	 Belize •  Myanmar •  Turks and Caicos Islands
24 March	 Laos •  Libya
25 March	 British Virgin Islands •  Guinea-Bissau •  Mali •  Saint Kitts and Nevis
26 March	 Anguilla
29 March	 Northern Mariana Islands
30 March	 Botswana
31 March	 Burundi •  Sierra Leone •  Sint Eustatius •  Somaliland
By the end of March, only the following countries and territories have not reported any cases of SARS-CoV-2 infections:
